BOOK FIRST.
THE BORDER RISING.
Why, peers of England,
We'll lead 'em on courageously. I read
A triumph over tyranny upon
Their several foreheads.
Ford
.
'Tis a generous mind
That led his disposition to the war;
For gentle love and noble courage are
So near allied, that one begets another.
Cyril Tourneur
.
This lady in the blossom of my youth,
When my first fires knew no adulterate incense,
Nor I no way to flatter but my fondness,
In the best language my true tongue could utter,
And all the broken sighs my sick heart lend me,
I sued and served. Long did I love this lady.
Massinger
.
TO
WILLIAM DUER,
OF OSWEGO,
THESE VOLUMES ARE INSCRIBED
BY HIS EARLY FRIEND,
THE AUTHOR.
Vol. I.B
CHAPTER I.
FOREST HAUNTS AND SYLVAN COMPANY.
Away, away, to forest glades,
Fly, fly with me the haunts of men,
I would not give my sunlit glades,
My talking stream, and silent glen,
For all the pageantry of slaves,
Their fettered lives and trampled graves.
The Indian
,
by
J.
Lawrence
.
Our
story opens amid the depths of an American
forest. It was midsummer; the bright green of
June had departed from lea and meadow, and the
brooks, even where their course lay through some
grassy orchard, half sheltered by the spreading
fruit-trees, had shrunk and dwindled in their
channels
;
but here, amid the dank shadows of
primeval
woods, their currents still danced along with all
the freshness of springtime. Here, too, the shrubs
upon their banks still wore the delicate tints of early
summer; for the canopy of dense foliage above
them shut out the scorching heat. The birds of
song, which, in the opening and closing year, are
seldom
heard in our deep forests, had now left the
clearings, which they delight with their warbling
in the mating season, and flitted through the cool
and verdurous aisles that opened around on every
side; now glancing sportively around the seamed
and columnar trunks of the mossed trees, and now
skimming high in air, but still sheltered by the
cloistering architrave of interlacing boughs above
them. It was noontide, but the freshness of early
dawn and the mellow gloom of deepening twilight
were commingled in those forest glades.
By the foot of an ancient tulip-tree, where a
spring bubbled from beneath a rock, which its
gnarled roots entwined, sat two men, who seemed
the fitting tenants of a spot so wild. The one, a
military veteran of about fifty, brawny and
broad-shouldered
,
with freckled face and sandy hair, was
dressed in the full garb of a Scottish Highlander,
save that a jacket of green cloth, laced and guarded
with bars of silver, like the uniform of a modern
European trooper, was superadded to the tartan
drapery that marks the ancient costume of his
country. His companion, who wore a similar
uniform
jacket, was, in the fashion of his other garments,
apparelled not unlike him; if a belted hunting-shirt
of dressed deerskin, with fringed leggins of the
same, and a scarlet blanket richly embroidered at
the corners with porcupine quills, may be supposed
to bear any resemblance to the kilt, hose, and plaid
of the Scotchman, whose
skene dhu
was imitated by
the terrible leg-knife, worn beneath the beaded
garters
of his companion. With the exception of a
tomahawk secured in the wampum sash of the
latter
,
both were in other respects similarly armed
with pistols and yger.
But the accidental resemblance in the fashion of
their equipments, which extended even to the
ornamented
tobacco-pouch worn at the belt of either,
ceased altogether with a full survey of their persons,
when contrasting these men together. There was
nothing of the Celt or Goth in the swarthy
lineaments
of the American forester. Rising to his feet,
while his blanket, dropping from one shoulder, set
forth a chest of the finest proportions, he stood at
least three inches taller than the European; while
his lithe and well-rounded limbs fell at each motion
into those easy attitudes which, among those who
call themselves civilized, are seldom exhibited in
their full grace by any but mere children, and which
were in striking contrast with the angular
movements
of his sturdy and soldier-like companion.
Well, Sachem, what see you now? said the
Highlander, as the Indian, lightly planting one foot
on a mossed root that pushed through the rotten
sod, stood, with keen eye and dilated nostril, gazing
intently into a deep glade of the forest.
I looked for the return of one of my runners,
but it was only a moose which stirred the leaves,
he replied, quietly resuming his seat.
A moose? ah! I've heard of that kind of deer.
They tell me that they are famous fellows when at
bay. But you should hunt a stag among old Scotia's
mountains to know what sport is, Sachem. You
never got as far, though, as our heathery hills, when
you visited King George.
There was game afoot here that would not have
let me linger in the Highlands, even had I reached
them.
Ah! but even to have set foot upon the bonny
purple heather, though but for once in your life,
would have been something; and yet, perhaps,
'twere better not; it might have made you
discontented
with these gloomy forests that cover up your
whole country.
I saw many bald men among the counsellers of
my British father; but the naked crowns of the
Sagernash
did not put me out of conceit of the long
locks of an Iroquois, replied the forester, dryly,
And then, continuing in a more animated strain,
I have not always, even in my own land, dwelt
among these forests, which you think so gloomy.
I have wandered for months over meadows
laughing
with sunshine and flowers, where the purple
heather of which you speak, unless it outbloom in
richness all that I have seen in an English garden,
were but a dull garniture for the delicious fields.
And yet, though the prairies seemed so fascinating,
when in early youth I followed over them the
warpath
of the great Pontiac, their charms appear to
me now but as the feeble and holyday work of
Nature
,
when compared with a temple like that in
which we stand. Look there, he cried, pointing
upward to the sweeping cone of a pine that towered
some two hundred feet towards the heavens, upon
the lowest branch of which, still a hundred feet
above the soil, an eagle was at the moment
lighting
,
while the frayed bark, slipping from beneath
his talons, floated long in air before reaching the
ground. Look at yon royal pine, Major
MacDonald
;
such trees as that will grow but once in any
soil! they are the production only of Nature in her
prime; and, as one of her doomed children that
must soon pass away, I would fain linger near them
with my people until the last is gone.
Doomed
, Sachem? tut, tut, not a bit of doom
about the matter; we'll soon drive the rebels from
the ancient seats of your tribe; or, should the worst
come to the worst, why not leave this wild land?
You have the king's commission in your pocket, and
can still follow his majesty's banner wherever a
trumpet
shall sound.
Never, never! rejoined the Indian, mournfully;
I have been tutored in your schools; I have
worshipped
in your churches; I have feasted and slept
in your dwellings; I have fought side by side with
your warriors in the field; I have mingled with your
B 2
courtiers in the palace, and your counsellers in the
cabinet: but, my ways are still not your ways, nor
has the heart of Thayendanagea been ever for a
moment
estranged from his tribe.
Why, then, did you lead them to take a part
with us in this quarrel, which, you told me but
yesterday
,
must eventuate in the ultimate success of
the rebel arms?
Why? why did not my countrymen accept the
overtures of the French king, when Frontenac made
his descent upon the cantons with a powerful army,
and our allies, the Hollanders, at whom, through us,
Ononthio struck the blow, were too feeble to aid us
save with their wishes? why, until your
countrymen
,
by their acquisition of this province, became
heirs of the friendship we had sworn to the Dutch,
did we stand by Quidar in his quarrel with England
to the last? Why? why did you, Major
MacDonald
,
who have now, with hundreds like yourself,
taken up arms for King George, why did you
become
an exile by fighting against him when a
stripling
?
The Scotchman sprang to his feet, and paced the
turf in agitation for a moment; then, turning short
in front of the other, exclaimed, as he clasped the
hand of the noble Mohawk in both of his own and
wrung it cordially,
Captain Brant, you are a true and loyal
gentleman
,
every inch of you; worthy to have been out in
the Forty-five with the best of us; and if
Histcrouch, interrupted the Sachem, lightly
pressing the shoulder of MacDonald, who,
obedient
to the motion, sank on one knee beside him.
I see him, whispered the Highlander, glancing
in the direction whither his companion pointed; a
sable roan! A most noble charger; his rider must
be near.
Yo-hah!
a horse of eighteen hands! there are not
many such in the depths of an American forest.
Look again, brother soldier.
Jesu Maria! ejaculated the European, in a tone
that might be thought to partake as much of alarm
as of wonder, if the suspicion had not been belied
by the flashing eye with which he instantly brought
his yger to his shoulder, while the muzzle was as
quickly averted by the hand of the Mohawk striking
up the barrel.
An old hunter looks at his range as well as at
his mark, said Brant, in reply to an inquiring glance
of the other; and the hasty Scot, looking again
beyond
his quarry, saw, for the first time, a half-naked
Indian standing immediately in his line of fire.
I must have those antlers to match a pair from
the peat-moss in my brother's hall, he murmured,
in a tone of disappointment.
They shall be yours, but we must not wake
these echoes with our firearms. Leave my runner
yonder to deal with the moose, and we shall be
certain
of a savoury broil this evening.
The deer-stalker, or
still-hunter
, as we would
term him in this country, seemed to be fully aware
of the neighbourhood of his chief, and the precise
point where he lay; for, gliding now like a shadow
from tree to tree, and more than once fitting an
arrow
to his bow, as if about to shoot, while
continually
approaching the moose, he managed to place
himself so that the two witnesses of the sport could
not be harmed by the shot. The animal, in the
mean time, pestered by the August flies that are
so annoying to the larger tenants of the forest at
this season, kept moving hither and thither within
a small circle, pausing ever and anon to browse for
a moment; and still, while feeding, making the dry
branches crackle with his incessant trampling.
At last he seemed to be more contented, as he
got his feet into a marshy piece of ground, from
which the discoloured water bubbled up gratefully
about his legs, as his hoofs broke the yielding soil.
The Scotchman, who now, for the first time, had a
full view of his huge uncouth form, could not
sufficiently
admire the ease with which the moose used
his ungainly but flexile snout, to twist off the
branches
near him, while lazily catching at those within
his reach.
But now the movements of the still-hunter
equally
claimed the attention of the lookers-on of this
quiet but exciting kind of woodland sport. The
stealthy savage, by flitting from tree to tree in the
manner we have described, occasionally drawing his
body, like a wounded snake, along the ground, had
gained a fallen and decayed trunk within twenty
paces of the moose, and, lying concealed behind
this natural rampart, was watching, with keen eye,
the fitting moment to launch his fatal shaft.
At last the moose, having stripped the boughs
immediately
in front of him, yet unwilling to change
his position, threw back his broad antlers upon his
shoulders, and, twisting his neck obliquely as he
caught at a weeping birch that drooped over his left
shoulder within reach of his uplifted muzzle,
presented
his throat as a fair mark for the arrow of the
hunter. The bow twanged, and the barbed flint
was driven, with unerring aim, through the neck,
severing the swollen artery, and burying itself deep
in the vertebr at the base of the scull. The
stricken
animal uttered a terrific snort of rage and agony,
plunged, reared, and, wheeling on his hind legs, made
a desperate charge at his assailant, but fell dead at
the feet of the Indian, just as the undismayed fellow
was in the act of bounding forward to encounter
him with his tomahawk.
A good shot, Harrowah, cried Brant, moving
leisurely from his covert; while the more ardent
Scot rushed, with drawn dirk, towards the fallen
moose, as if still hoping to have a hand in the death
of so noble a quarry. But the bright eye was
already
fixed in death, though a muscular motion in
the long and drooping muzzle made the Highlander
quickly withdraw the hand which he had placed on
that uncouth appendage.
By Saint Andrew, he cried, but you have an
ugly face to claim kindred with the dun deer of my
own heather.
Yet, major, we foresters think that the woods
afford no choicer morsel than a moose's muzzle;
and your Frenchman of Canada will serve you up
a stew of it that will shame the mock-turtle of a
London coffee-house.
Eat that hideous black thing? said the Scot,
with no feeble signs of aversion; I've dined often
upon horseflesh while serving in Tartary, but I'd
as soon sup upon the trunk of an elephant as make
a meal off that frightful big lip. Zounds! the thing
quivers as if it were still alive; like the tail of one
of your American serpents, which, they tell me,
never dies till sunset.
The still-hunter stood, in the mean time, with
folded arms, gazing listlessly upon the scene, until,
giving a sort of grunt in reply to an order from his
chief, delivered in his own language, he addressed
himself to the care of the carcass. Selecting a
smooth-barked beech for the operation, he prepared
one of the lower limbs, by the aid of props, to
sustain
the weight of the animal. But the sleight of the
slim hunter, and the united strength of his two
stalwart
companions, were all put in requisition to trice
up the ponderous carcass, after the splinters, by
which it was suspended, had been passed through
the tough sinews of the gambles. The head was
then severed from the trunk, and swung by the
palmated
antlers to the crooked arm of an ancient oak;
and the body, after being flayed to the loins, and
relieved
of all superfluities, was wrapped in its own
hide, and raised still higher from the ground, to be
out of the reach of beasts of prey, until otherwise
disposed of.
I will send some of my people to bring the meat
to camp before nightfall; and now, Major
MacDonald
,
let us learn what tidings the runner brings us.
With these words the Sachem moved to the spot
where the reader was first introduced to him and
his companion, and where blanket and tartan, lying
where they had been dropped by the roots of the
shadowy tulip-tree, offered inviting seats for the
councils of this sylvan triumvirate.
CHAPTER II.
FRONTIER FACTIONS.
They left the ploughshare in the mould,
Their flocks and herds without a fold,
The sickle in the unshorn grain,
The corn half garnered on the plain,
And mustered in their simple dress,
For wrongs to seek a stern redress;
To right those wrongs, come weal, come wo,
To perish or o'ercome their foe.
M`Lellan
.
The
information brought to his chieftain by the
Mohawk runner, though of deep import to more
than one actor in the scenes we are about to
describe
,
will hardly be intelligible to the reader,
unless
he revives his historical recollection of the
political
intrigues that distracted the important
province
of New-York, as the drama of the Revolution
was gradually unfolded along her far-spreading
borders.
The long possession of the fur-trade, and the
frequent Indian wars incident to the pursuit of this
hardy and precarious branch of commerce, had at
an early day given an adventurous and enterprising
character to the population of this province. Their
military spirit had been well tested in the arduous
campaigns of the old French war; they had borne
no feeble part in the conquest of Canada; and
when the fall of Quebec, in consummating the glory
of Wolfe, brought peace to the land, it found
almost
every man capable of bearing arms a soldier.
While, therefore, the different parties of Whig and
Tory were almost equally balanced in the province
of New-York throughout the Revolution, that
memorable
political struggle found fewer neutrals here
than in any state of the Union; all men were eager
to bear arms on one side or the other, and it is this
circumstance only which will account for the great
numbers that fell in battle, when the inferior degree
of population, as compared with that of several of
the other colonies, is considered.
But, bitter as were the political animosities
existing
in every part of this province, both before and
after a recourse was had to arms, yet the spirit of
faction
called out in no district the same stormy
feelings
as now distracted the valley of the Mohawk.
The elements of civil dissension had been long
brewing in this beautiful region, where such a
diversity
of origin, of interest, and, we may add, of
religion
,
existed among the heterogeneous population,
that the soul of Discord might well have been
roused even in times the most peaceable.
Here had been the ancient seat of the most
powerful and civilized, yet most warlike nation of
aborigines, upon the northern part of this
hemisphere
,
a large remnant of which still retained their
possessions in the immediate neighbourhood of the
European settlements. Here the sturdy and
adventurous
Dutch trader had at an early day been
tempted to abandon his precarious means of
livelihood
,
and sit down to cultivate the rich alluvial
lands that had been readily granted to him by
the grateful Mohawks, who had ever been treated
as brothers by his countrymen during their sway
over the province. Hither the German soldiers
of Queen Anne's Protestant allies had in large
bodies followed their European neighbours to
settle
upon the extensive tracts, granted to them when
New-York first took its modern name in passing to
the British crown. Here, side by side with these
brave mercenaries, or perched, rather, upon the
northern hills that overlooked their fertile meadows,
hundreds of Catholic Scotch Highlanders, with
many Irish soldiers of fortune, the exiled followers
of the last Stuart, had established themselves;
while successive families of the Cameronian
countrymen
of the former had found their frugal homes
upon the uplands south of the river, whose
cultivation
had been rejected by those who preceded them
in gaining an interest in the soil.
The diversity of feeling which this difference of
origin, of language, and of religion may be
presumed
to have created, was still farther enhanced in
its effects by the difference in tenure throught which
the broad domains of the valley were held. For
while the majority of the old residenters were
freeholders, constituting a large and independent
yeomanry, yet among those of British descent there
were extensive feudal proprietors, holding their
patents
immediately from the crown, who could
number
a powerful array of dependants; and some of
whom (as was actually the case with Colonels
Butler and Johnson both before and during the
war) commanded regiments of militia, raised
exclusively
among their own tenantry.
There was one feature common to this
heterogeneous
people, which will hardly be thought to have
reconciled the jarring elements of strife, though
capacitating them for acting in unison under some
circumstances; and this was that, throughout the
valley, there was scarcely an individual who had
not been in some way trained to the use of arms.
The threatening storm of civil war had at an early
day found both patriot and loyalist upon the alert
to enlist the principles, the prejudices, or affections
of their neighbours upon the side that either was
determined to espouse. The leading gentlemen of
Tryon county, whether Whig or Tory, kept up
indeed
for a long time the most friendly relations
towards
each other, so far as outward seeming was
concerned. Both parties affected to be actuated
by the greatest zeal in preserving the peace of the
country, and particularly in all their public
conferences
agreed to act in unison in preventing the
Indians from taking any part in the impending
controversy
,
should a fatal issue be ultimately joined
between them. But the acts of either faction seem
sufficiently to have belied their words from the first.
Secret clubs and committees were organized
upon the one side; and many of the wealthy upon
the other, keeping open house for their partisans,
made their hospitality a cloak for the dangerous
councils that were rife at the festive board. The
country was traversed by mounted men, bearing
tokens
from one disaffected family to another.
Travellers
upon the highways were stopped by the
myrmidons
of either party, and their papers examined
by these border regulators with the coolest
assumption
of authority; and as, on the one side, the great
landed proprietors soon commenced fortifying their
houses and arming and drilling their tenantry, so,
among the smaller freeholders on the other, several
of the influential Whigs ventured to reorganize the
militia in their own districts, and officers were
deposed
Vol. I.C
and others appointed, according to the
peculiar
tenets and wishes of the people.
This last innovation had been attended with some
danger; though in one instance, Sir John Johnson,
the leading magistrate of the county, met with a
signal discomfiture when rashly intruding upon a
party of villagers whom a lieutenant, elected by
themselves, was engaged in drilling. The baronet
chanced to be taking a drive with his lady when
he came upon this squad of young soldiers; and
incensed at seeing a man in the uniform of an
officer
who he knew did not hold the king's
commission
,
leaped from his barouche, and advancing upon
the patriot lieutenant, rebuked his presumption with
great insolence, and called upon his comrades
instantly
to disperse. Swords were drawn, and Sir
John, being the more skilful fencer of the two,
disarmed
his youthful opponent, but was ultimately
compelled to retire from the levelled muskets which
were instantly presented at his life, when he
attempted
to push his advantage, by seizing the young
man and securing him as a traitor to the king taken
in open arms.
Convinced, by this and similar scenes, of the
unpopularity
in that part of the province of the cause
which he had espoused, the zealous baronet
addressed
himself to the promotion of his royal
master's
interest in another quarter; and, in defiance of
the implied stipulation existing between both
parties
of the whites, that the Indians should not be
permitted to take a part in the family quarrel, as it
was called, he proceeded to avail himself of his
connexion with the tribes, to influence them to raise
the tomahawk against his political opponents. His
brother-in-law, Col. Guy Johnson, the
superintendent
of Indian affairs for all the provinces of British
America, readily lent his powerful aid to the
furtherance
of these intrigues; and the vigilant Whigs,
while keeping a wary eye upon the powerful Tory
families in their neighbourhood, soon became aware
that Indian runners were continually passing and
repassing between the settlements and the
straggling
troops of warriors that hovered on their
border
.
The moose-hunter was one of a hundred
similar
agents of frontier diplomacy, that were
continually
traversing the country between Guy Park, the
seat of the Indian agency, and the different
council-fires
,
or outlying bands of the Six Nations.
Sir John Johnson's numerous tenantry of Scotch
Highlanders were already in arms at Johnstown,
where the baronet had fortified his large mansion
with several brass fieldpieces; and the different
cantons
of the Iroquois, with the single exception of
the Oneidas, were known to be so favourably
disposed
toward the royal cause, that the only
question
was now, how to unite the whole force, both
European and aboriginal, so as to make it most
effective
,
and overwhelm at its first outbreak the least
movement of rebellion; this, however, required no
feeble energies to accomplish.
The yeomanry of the valley had long regarded
Sir John Johnson with a suspicious eye; alike
from the baronial state that he affected upon his
princely domains, and the insolent and dictatorial
assumption with which he more than once
intruded
upon their popular assemblies. Colonel Guy
Johnson, the superintendent of the Indian
department
,
was held in hardly less aversion than his
kinsman, and the celebrated Joseph Brant, or
Thayendanagea
,
as he called himself, who filled the
important
post of secretary of that department for all
his majesty's provinces in North America, had,
from his political connexions, lost much of the
confidence
of his old friends. Brant, indeed, though
living upon the most intimate terms with many of
the leading Whigs of Tryon county, was always
suspected to hold himself in readiness for
employment
more congenial to the tastes of an Indian
warrior
,
who, amid all the allurements of a European
court, and when surrounded by every luxury and
embellishment of civilized life, had made it his pride
and his boast that he was a full-blooded Mohawk.
That haughty chief, who, whether at the
entertainments
of princes and nobles, in the saloons of
fashion, or the palaces of royalty, had always
persisted
in presenting himself in the peculiar costume
of his people, seemed to have brought home but
little from his European intercourse with the
learned
and the polite, save a strong feeling of
attachment
to the British crown: a sentiment of feudal
loyalty, which, notwithstanding his early
New-England
education, had become strangely grafted upon
the peculiar love which he bore to the ancient
republican
institutions of the Five Nations. He
seemed to regard England as the only muniment
of their freedom, and was willing to render a
cordial
allegiance to her as the price of the protection;
and while, in his intercourse with the whites,
arrogating
to himself a full share of that assumption
which induced his semi-barbarous countrymen to
call themselves the
Ongi-honwe
, or men who
surpassed
all others, he was still willing to look up
to the head of the British empire both as the
fountain
of public honours and the guardian of his
country's
welfare.
But while this aspiring and sagacious sachem saw
that the safety of his people and his own
pre-eminence
as a chieftain depended upon their siding with
the royal causefor at a very early day he foretold
the blighting influence which this great
overshadowing
republic would bring upon the aborigines when
its independence was fully establishedyet his
private
partialities were from the first at war with the
dictates of his ambition and his policy. He had
been educated in one of the leading Whig families
of Connecticut; he had fought side by side with
the colonial troops in the old French war; and
though he had derived preferment, fortune, and
influence
from his connexion with the officers of the
crown, yet his old friends and neighbours in the
valley of the Mohawk were adherents of the
popular
cause; and, save among the powerful family of
the Johnsons, his nearest and dearest friends, the
comrades of his hunts, the companions of his youth,
were banded together against the party which he
had joined. What wonder, then, that when the
storm of revolution was about to burst upon his
native
valley, Brant should shrink from imbruing his
hands in the blood of its inhabitants, sprung from
the same soil, though of a different lineage from
himself?
These considerations will sufficiently account for
the noble Mohawk so long endeavouring to
temporize
with the patriot party; and, when finally taking
up arms with the loyalists, presenting himself with
a few followers, instead of bringing his whole power
into the field, after having already made a proud
display of his warriors in his celebrated pacific
interview
with the republican general, Herkimer. It
would appear, however, from some of his numerous
letters still extant, that true Indian policy was not a
little mingled with the unwillingness he showed to
procure the gathering of the tribes, when all of the
Iroquois confederates, with the exception of the
single
canton already mentioned, were eager to lift the
hatchet for the mother country.
Brant thought that the family quarrel was of
doubtful duration, and he was unwilling that the
brunt of it should fall upon his people until England
had tried what she could do to repress the rebellion
in the province of New-York, without having
recourse
to the aid of the Indians. He left it, there
C 2
fore, for Col. Guy Johnson to collect the warriors of
the Six Nations, while he, with a chosen band of his
own Mohawks, hovered near the border, watching
the turn events might take, and still secure in the
deep forests where we have first introduced him to
the reader.
These mountain wilds, which are now chiefly
embraced in the counties of Montgomery,
Herkimer
,
and Hamilton, still preserve much of their
savage and romantic character; but, at the day
of which we write, they were almost inaccessible
to any but an Indian or a hunter of the border.
Here the chieftain held his woodland court, until
the issue should be fairly joined between the high
parties that now so threateningly lowered upon each
other; and here he awaited the fitting moment,
when the contest should be fairly begun, to make
the most advantageous descent upon the lower
country, and, by some brilliant exploit at the first
outbreak of Indian hostilities, make good his
haughty
claim to be considered as the great captain of all
the Indian nations that should take up arms on the
side of the crown.
In the mean time, however, Sir John Johnson had
assiduously kept up his influence with the wary but
aspiring sachem; not only by a constant
correspondence
;
not only through the various Indian runners
who were continually bearing messages between
himself and Brant,
[1]
[1]
The Indians conveyed letters in the heads of their tomahawks
and the ornaments worn about their persons.
Campbell's Annals
of Tryon County
.
but also by placing near him a
zealous and sagacious Scotch officer, who, being
made the bearer of a commission of captain in the
royal army, which had been politically bestowed
upon Brant, made his way to the camp of the
gratified
Mohawk, and remained among his people
under
the easy pretence of wishing to become initiated
in the wild sports of the aborigines.
Leaving these two partisans of the royal faction
to discuss the tidings which had just been brought
them by the moose-hunter, let us now learn their
nature by shifting the scene to the valley of the
Mohawk, and proceed with the action of our story.
CHAPTER III.
THE LIBERTY-TREE.
Deep in the west, as Independence roves,
His banners planting round the land he loves,
Where Nature sleeps in Eden's infant grace,
In Time's full hour shall spring a glorious race.
Sprague
.
Rumours
of the first blood shed at Lexington had
reached the valley of the Mohawk; but the length
of time it required in those days to traverse the
intervening
country, prevented the story from being soon
confirmed in all its particulars; when, one
afternoon
,
it was noised abroad that a messenger, direct
from the scene of action, would address the friends
of liberty at a meeting to be held in front of the
stone church at German Flats. The occasion was
deemed a good one, by the leading Whigs of the
neighbourhood, for carrying into effect a favourite
political ceremony of the day, which should at once
mark their own adherence to the popular cause, and,
by its boldness, encourage and confirm their
wavering
friends. To further which intention, placards
and notices were industriously circulated, inviting
the people to assemble unarmed, for the purpose
of peaceable deliberation, and also
to erect a
liberty-pole
!
The yeomanry of the valley had been frequently
thus convened of late, to pass some vote of censure
upon the acts of the British
ministry
(for here, as
elsewhere throughout the provinces, during the
early
stages of the Revolution, the name of the king
was studiously omitted in all the attacks upon his
government); and, like well-schooled fencers
closely
practised in mock-combat, the thoroughly
organized
community was versed in political discussion
and habituated to public business, long before its
ability for self-government was tested in a real
struggle with established power. But the measure
now in contemplation was a direct assault upon the
dignity of the crown; and the call to assemble
unarmed
for the purpose of
peaceable deliberation
,
was too flimsy a covering for the treasonable deed
to which it was meant only as a precursorthe
raising
openly the great emblem of rebellion.
Many, therefore, shook their heads, and stood
aloof from those who, they thought, were rashly
precipitating matters to a crisis. Some doubted
whether an immediate revulsion of public feeling
might not result from carrying proceedings at once
so far. Some actually felt this revulsion, and stood
prepared to co-operate with the Tory magistracy
in crushing so daring an outbreak of faction. But
others, who, from the first, had counselled more
daring
measures, and had lately hung back in disgust
at the cautious, and, apparently, reluctant movements
with which they thought their leaders had impelled
the ball of revolution, were now emulous to spring
forward and take their place among the most active
in hurrying it onward. While others, again,
knowing
no other principle than the love of change, no
impulse save that of curiosity, were urged, by the
novelty of the occasion, to be spectators of a scene,
where, if sympathetic excitement should impel them
to become actors, circumstances would determine
the part they should play.
Such an assemblage was the true field for a
popular
orator to prove his powers; and tradition still
tells of the eloquence which wrought upon those
materials, and moulded and moved the mass as one
man, on that day. Tradition, too, tells especially
of one speakera youth of scarce twenty summers
a shy student from Schenectady, who, fired by the
impassioned appeals of older and more practised
orators, burst through the bashfulness of
inexperienced
youth, and, leaping upon the rostrum,
poured
forth a flood of eloquence that hurried along the
most sluggish natures upon its irresistible tide.
Who, said a by-stander to a sturdy hunter, who,
with mouth agape, and eyes riveted, as if by magic,
upon the speaker, stood leaning upon his rifle near,
who in all natur is that springald with sich a
tongue?
Why, Adam, is it you, man, that axes me who
young
Greyslaer
, of Hawksnest, is? You've seen
me teaching the boy afore now, when he came up
to Johnstown in his hollowdays, and, thof he be
grown a bit, you ought to know my old scholard.
Lor! Balt, that ain't the bookish chap that you
larnt the rifle to? The bold younker that stood the
brunt, when scapegrace Dirk de Roos got into that
scrape in old Sir William's time?
I tell you it is, though, said the woodsman,
proudly; and a right proper shot I made of him.
You see, now, how he plumps his argerments right
into the bull's-eye of the matter.
Sarting! he does make a clean go-ahead of it.
But when did he come up here to mix in our
doings
?
He? why, man, he's been here this four week,
and came up too with the Congress's commission
in his pocket, to raise a company. Who but him
was it that Sir John raised a rumpus with at the
training last week? Ah! if the boy only had as
good larning with the sword as he has with the
rifle, the baronet could never have filliped it out of
his hands so sarcily as he did.
Oh! yes, I heerd of that, Balt, as also how you
came near having your heels lifted higher than your
head, for threatning to blow Sir John clean through
if he did not let the stripling go.
I'd like to see the day when any of Sir John's
folks would try to back that brag of his'n. I'd a
mounted him upon the spot only for making it, but
the people said 'twas only words, and I must not
mind sich, and go and make further fuss, seeing
we had got young Max out o'his hands. But hist!
what's the lad saying now?
I mistrust that that's the Yankee messenger
he's introducing to the people, said Adam, in a
modest whisper; for the hunter had gained tenfold
in the respect of the simple yeoman since this
popular
display of his pupil.
Behold, cried the speaker, interrupting himself
in the midst of a bold apostrophe to Liberty, whom
he pictured as hovering over the land with wings
that shadowed it but for a moment, until she could
alight in peace and safety: Behold the harbinger
of her first triumph! fevered with haste, worn with
impatient travel, he comes, like the victorious
courier
from Marathon of old, to tell of Freedom's
bloody dawn at Lexington. Up, man, up, and tell
a tale that never can grow old, but freshens from
the frequent telling; and, suiting the action to the
word, the youth, carried away by the enthusiasm
of the moment, seized the courier by the wrist, and
dragged the embarrassed man forward.
Now that awkward loon, Adam, said the
hunter
,
will make a botch of the hull business. A
murrain on the Bosting folks that sent a critter what
couldn't speak.
Why, Balt, I guess they want all their speakers
to hum, and raaly I don't see but this chap has done
all in natur that was required of him, in coming
here so quick. It wan't judgmatical in young Max
to expect more from him, and pull the fellow up
there to gape about like a treed 'possum.
The orator appeared himself to be instantly aware
of his error, and, even while the worthy Adam was
commenting upon it, had, with ready tact, turned
the poor fellow's confusion to advantage. What!
he cried, bewildered, my friend, by the crowd of
heads you see below? This stout array of gallant
yeomen, the bone and sinew of our land, numbers
not half of those devoted to our cause, that will soon
pour from every glen and mountain near; men with
tongues as slow as yours to boast their deeds, but
having still the iron will to work them; men with
arms as strong as yours to raise the tree of Liberty,
and hearts as true to guard it.
A deafening shout of applause burst from the
multitude almost before the last words had passed
the speaker's lips. The stout-limbed
New-Englander
,
changed at once from a shamefaced rustic
into the hero of the scene, threw up his head,
broadened his chest, and displayed his stalwart
frame with honest vanity. Then, as if wit had
been suddenly born of praise so well applied, he
leaped from the scaffold, and seizing a tall hickory,
which, freshly deracinated, was held erect by some
labourers near, he bore it, amid the plaudits of the
crowd, to a hole that had been previously prepared,
and, spurning the aid of some tackle erected upon
the spot, tossed the heavy sapling from his shoulders,
and planted it pointing to the skies.
The centre of attraction was now changed, as
the crowd collected around the spot, while those
who stood nearest were active in throwing earth
and stones around the roots, to secure the tree in
its position. The preconcerted act of rebellion for
which they had chiefly met was fully and
successfully
consummated, but any farther measures which
might have been contemplated by the leaders of the
assemblage, were at this moment summarily
discomfited
.
The trampling of hoofs, and the dust arising from
a large body of horsemen at a turning of the road,
gave the first intimation of the approach of the
royalists
,
while proclaiming that they came in
sufficient
force to crush any violent outbreak of
insurrection
.
There was a momentary panic in the
assemblage, and, before they could recover from the
surprise, Sir John Johnson, with a large body of
retainers armed with sword and pistol, rode into the
midst of the unarmed multitude. He was followed
by Colonels Claus, Butler, and Guy Johnson, a civil
magistrate by the name of Fenton, and other Tory
gentlemen of the county, each backed by a strong
party of followers similarly armed, who
successively
drew up in military array so as nearly to
encircle
the astounded Whigs.
What mummery is this? demanded the haughty
baronet, glancing round fiercely at those who stood
near the Liberty-tree, while more than one,
over-awed
by his bearing, attempted to slink away in
the crowd. A stout Whig, by the name of
Sammons
,
stepped boldly forward to make reply; but,
before he could ascend the stage to place himself
upon a level with his mounted adversaries, Sir John
had thrown himself from his horse, and occupied
the place from which Greyslaer and the Boston
emissary had descended a few moments before.
Without noticing the movement of Sammons, he
at once commenced haranguing the people with
great vehemence. He appealed to the ancient love
they had borne his family, rehearsed the virtues of
his father, once so popular throughout the valley,
and exhorted them still to sustain the established
magistracy, which had ever kept their best interests
at heart. Finding, then, that the attempt to address
their affections and rekindle the faded ashes of
loyalty met with no response, he endeavoured to
awaken their fears. He dwelt upon the strength
and power of the king, and painted in strong
colours
the folly of opposing his officers and
revolting
against the crown. But the assemblage was
still mute; the approving plaudits of his own
partisans
called forth no echo from the moody and
stubborn
Whigs.
Irritated at their sullen obstinacy, Johnson now
turned disdainfully from the motley crew of
would-be patriots, as he in derision termed the
multitude generally, and poured out his invective
upon their leaders. The shrewd New-England
features of the Bostonian next caught his attention,
and the sharp eye of Sir John instantly detected
something in the man's air or apparel which might
have escaped any gentleman but the owner of
beeves and hemlock forests, whose revenue
depends
so much upon the trade of a tanner.
Who, he asked, scornfully levelling his finger
at the stout yeoman, who are the real leaders
of your mongrel crew, the vultures that ye bring
hither to hatch the egg of treason, that creatures
as foul and contemptible have thrust into our nest
of peace and loyalty? An itinerant New-England
leather-dresser! a vagrant pedler of rebellion! that
could only retail his wares to such offscourings of
society as many I see around me, if men whose
education should teach them better, had not
misled
the gallant yeomanry, that I grieve to find in
such disgraceful company. You have had your
musters, too, your military gatherings, your array
of fools, that would fain play the soldier, with such
a beardless stripling as that to lead them. I know
Vol. I.D
the boy! cried he, with a smile of scorn, pointing
to Greyslaer, who stood with folded arms and
compressed
lips, as if with difficulty restraining the ire
that boiled within him. I know the boy; I knew
him in old Sir William's time, who was once dear
to all of you; he was whipped then by my father's
overseer for plundering an orchard! Pity that the
lash had not
Liar and villain! shouted Greyslaer, springing
forward toward the stage.
Seize the traitor! cried Sir John, striking at
the youth with the butt of a loaded whip.
Actively
evading the blow, Greyslaer succeeded in
getting one foot on the scaffold, but the next instant
the sturdy baronet had fastened a grip upon his
throat, and flung him backward into the arms of
one of his myrmidons, who quickly placed himself
astride the prostrate stripling.
She must keep quiet now, or te tirk will pin
her, said the brawny Highlander, who held him
thus in durance, smiling grimly the while at the
ineffectual
efforts of Greyslaer to free himself, in spite
of the drawn dagger that flashed before his eyes.
The trusty Gael, in the mean time, might have felt
less comfortable in his position, had he known that
he was covered by the deadly aim of the hunter
Balt, whose cool discretion prevented him from
firing, save in the last extremity.
The benignant Mr. Fenton pressed near to Sir
John, as if about to intercede in some way, but the
arrogant
soldier heeded not his well-meant offices. An
indignant murmur arose among the Whigs at
witnessing
this scene; and, upon a slight movement
made among them, weapons were drawn, and a
low-browed
,
lank-haired, saturnine man, whose age
might be somewhere about thirty, a trooper in
Colonel
Butler's train, spurring to the front, snapped
his pistol in the face of a bystander. He was
instantly
reprimanded in sharp terms by his superior.
What! fire on an unarmed man, Walter?
Shame on ye for one wearing the king's livery!
May I eat hay with a horse, if I suffer such a thing
among my riders, Watty.
We shall have to cut these rebel throats sooner
or later, replied the man, doggedly, and it matters
not when the business is begun.
Shame, shame, cried Mr. Fenton.
Walter Bradshawe, said Greyslaer, without
making an effort to rise or gain any advantage to
protect himself from the consequences of what he
was about to say, you, though so much my senior,
were for months my mate at school. I knew you,
too, as an aspiring attorney's clerk in my first years at
college; your political career has since made your
name common in the mouths of all men, and there
must be others here who know you full as well as
I; and when I say that, as boy and man, you were
ever a brute and a ruffian, there's not a man present
that can gainsay my words.
Tut, tut, boys, cried Colonel Butler,
restraining
a fierce movement of his subaltern, may I eat
hay with a horse, but this is a foolish pair on ye
here. There's trouble enough without your
brawling
,
and you may soon have an opportunity of
fighting
out your quarrel in the name of king and
country
,
without troubling older people with your
capers
.
A glance of deadly hatred from Bradshawe, which
was returned with one of utter scorn from his
quondam
schoolmate, was all the reply the young men
made to this speech. In the mean time,
notwithstanding
the dismay which the sudden appearance
of the armed royalists had inspired, there were no
signs of dispersion among the patriot assemblage.
A few craven spirits had, indeed, slunk away, but
their absence was more than supplied by a number
of sturdy countrymen, in the guise of hunters, who,
with rifle on shoulder, came straggling into the
scene of action, as if brought thither only by
accident
or curiosity. The Tories, who had trusted only
to their arms to give them a superiority over the
party, which from the first outnumbered them,
began
soon to be aware that they were fast losing their
only advantage; and Colonel Guy Johnson, acting in
his capacity of a county magistrate, saw that it was
true policy to close by an act of civil authority the
duties which had been entered upon with a less
peaceful mission. He therefore addressed the
people
anew, but in terms more soothing than those
which had been adopted by his kinsman the
baronet
;
though, like him, he commenced by trying to
awaken their old feelings of feudal attachment to his
family.
He spoke of the affection which they had always
borne to his father-in-law, Sir William Johnson,
now but a few months deceased, and who was
believed
to have been brought to his grave from
anxiety
of spirit at the perturbation of the times, and
the struggle between loyalty and patriotism, as the
crisis approached when he should be compelled to
decide between his king and his country. He said
that he saw many around him who were the old
friends and playmates of his youth, and who, till the
last, had always been cherished guests at his table.
And he appealed particularly to the influential
families
of the Fondas, the Harpers, the Campbells, and
the Sammonses, several members of which were
afterward
so distinguished in the border war of Tryon
county, to unite with him in his exertions to
prevent
the effusion of blood among their mutual
kindred
and neighbours. Finally, after regretting the
necessity of placing young Greyslaer in the custody
of the sheriff until he could be tried by his country
in fair proceedings at law, he made a signal to Sir
John, who had already placed the prisoner on
horse-back
in the midst of his retainers, and bowing
politely
to the company, the complaisant colonel moved
off in the rear of his retiring party.
The people, in the mean time, either too much
confused by the unexpected events which had
succeeded
each other, or confounded by the fair and
polite words which had last been addressed to
them, made no movement to the rescue. But the
sound of the retiring troopers had scarcely died
upon the ear, before a deep murmur of
disapprobation
pervaded the assemblage. Some reproached
each other with pusillanimity in having looked so
calmly upon the scene which had just been enacted
before them. Those who were armed were told
that they should never have permitted one of their
friends to be thus torn from among them. And
those who had been instrumental in getting up the
meeting without providing for such an exigency,
were rebuked by the riflemen, who had come last
upon the scene of action, because they did not
direct
them what part to take when the difficulty
came on, of whose origin the new-comers were
themselves ignorant. These mutual bickerings and
recriminations, however, which only temporarily
suspended the unanimity of council, resulted at last
in a general call for immediate action. Every one
agreed that young Greyslaer must be at once
delivered
from the hands of the Johnsons, who,
notwithstanding
their promises, would doubtless seize the
first opportunity of transporting the youth to
Canada
,
where, if his fate were a no more cruel one than
perpetual imprisonment, he would be at least
utterly
lost to the cause.
D 2
The hunter Balt, who had stood moodily looking
on without taking any share in these discussions,
seemed to catch new life from the determination,
when announced.
I don't know, said he, looking round, whether
or not ye all mean to stick to what you say; though
I hope so, raaly. But I do know, that if young
Max Greyslaer be not as free as any man here,
afore one wilted leaf of this tree falls to the ground,
I'll water it with the best blood of the best Tory in
the county! That's right, Adam, jist empty another
gourd upon the roots, the poor thing looks thirsty.
How the hunter's vow, and the resolve of his
excited
compatriots, were carried into effect, may be
best told in another chapter.
CHAPTER IV.
THE FIRST SHOT.
From man to man and house to house, like fire
The kindling impulse flew; till every hind,
Searce conscious why, handles his targe and bow,
Still talks of change.
Hillhouse
.
It
was the middle watch of a summer's night.
The shadows lay deep on fell and forest; but
above, the waning moon shone bravely out in the
blue heavens. The night was calm; so calm, so
still, that the murmur of myriads of insects grating
their wings amid the leaves, made, as it were, a
silence
audible. As the moon gradually approached
the horizon, leaving the stars only to gladden the
welkin, this creeping symphony appeared
gradually
to have its concord broken in upon by sounds
which, though similar in character, did not
completely
harmonize with the others. A humming
noise, like that of a huge beetle booming through
the air, first broke the tiny chorus. It was answered
by the harsh discord of a locust, who seemed to rap
his wings with angry impatience, like some old
fellow
jostled by his mate in the midst of a nap. His
ire was reproved by a pert young katydid, whose
shrill tones indicated that her wings were only half
grown, and that the froward thing must be the
earliest
of the season. Then followed sundry
orchestral
croaks of a tree-toad, which in turn were replied
to by the deep diapason of some sturdy bullfrog.
At last the feathered tribe seemed preparing to join
in this nocturnal concert. The timid and delicate
note of the night-sparrow, rising distinctly fine from
a clump of maples, was answered by the shrill and
petulant cry of the whippoorwill from the lower
boughs of a broad-armed oak, that stood singly in
an open glade of the forest.
With the last call the woods became suddenly
mute, but the next moment the spot was alive with
a dozen dusky figures that glided from the adjacent
thickets towards the trysting-tree.
Well answered, my mates, cried an active
woodsman, leaping from the oak into the midst of
them; are we all together? I see nothing around
me but hunting-shirts. Ah! all right, he added,
as some thirty men, in parties of three each, came
cautiously forward from blind by-path and tangled
forest lair, where the hunters had answered each
other's signals while guiding the rest to the place of
rendezvous.
One of the last comers, who were all in the
ordinary
dress of citizens or plain farmers, now advanced
to the first speaker, and, catching his hand, said,
while wringing it cordially, Most neatly managed,
my sturdy Balt. You have brought us safely and
quietly together when I apprehended the worst
from the outlying spies of Sir John's Indian rabble.
And now, gentlemen, as you have chosen me your
leader in this business, I pledge my life to its
accomplishment
under the present auspices.
Why, you see I told you, Major Sammons, that
we hunters didn't live among the Injuns for nothin',
for where'd be the use of consorting with the
redskins
if you didn't catch some of their edication
from the cunning varmints? And you've all seen
to-night
that the woods afford calls, jist as many and
as good calls as a bugle has, for making men act in
concort, where they can't see a signal no how. But
now my say's over; and let's hear the crowing of
the game-cock of Caughnawaughaaxing your
pardon, major, for the freedom.
Are we all armed? said Sammons, glancing
around the group; Colonel Fonda, you and young
Derrick de Roos have, of course, your side-arms
with you.
Ay, ay, sword and pistol both for me. But
carry on, carry on, major, we are all ready, man,
and up to anything; carry on, carry on. The gay
youth who thus spoke with so little show of
deference
to his seniors, was a curly-headed, fair-faced
gallant of about three and twenty. His features
were frank and good-humoured, and certainly
prepossessing
in the main, though something of
sensuality
,
if not of dissoluteness, in their cast, slightly
vulgarized by broadening their natural recklessness
of expression.
Peace for the nonce, mad Dirk, cried
Sammons
,
somewhat impatiently. Kit Lansingh,
he continued, turning to a tall and modest-looking
young hunter in a green rifle frock, you are a
model for such younkers to dress their manners by.
Captain Vischer, Helmer, Veeder, I see you are
prepared. Ah! Adam, that was well thought; you
are not used to a sword, and your pitchfork may do
good service. Bleecker, you must lay aside that
fusee, or draw the charge; not a shot must be fired
unless Balt and his hunters, who are to cover
our
retreat, should find it necessary to use their rifles.
Doctor, we'll trust you with your pistols; but,
remember
,
they must remain in your belt. Clyde,
your axe is well thought of; but where's Wentz
with his crowbar?
Black Jake has the crow, and I've brought along
this suckling trip-hammer with me.
As the brawny blacksmith answered thus, he
raised a ponderous sledge from the sod upon which
it rested, and threw it into the hollow of his arm as
carelessly as if it were some light bawble he was
handling.
With these, and a few more brief and rapidly
given directions, the Whig leader soon marshalled
his zealous forces, a large proportion of which had
come a day's journey or more through the woods to
the place of rendezvous, some two miles west of
Johnstown.
A short walk of a few minutes found the party in
the immediate neighbourhood of Sir John Johnson's
fortified mansion, when a halt was ordered for the
purpose of adopting some new precautions in
making
the circuit of the building.
Now, major, whispered Balt, approaching the
ear of the leader, if you'll only say the word,
we'll make a clean business of it at once. Here
are fifty as good fellows as you'll find in old Tryon.
Sir John has but a hundred of his Highlanders with
him; and when I pick off that sentinel whose
blunderbuss
gleams agin the casement yonder, you've
only to dash right into the hall and take the bloody
Tory, with all his papish crew.
The time is not yet come for that, my worthy
fellow, answered Col. Fonda, who overheard the
request; Sir John is an old neighbour of many of
us. His father was the friend of my father; he
was born here in the valley among us; his mother
was one of our own people; he may yet think
better
of his course, and determine to act with his
countrymen against the tyrannical ministry.
The colonel says right, rejoined Sammons.
And though Sir John has already dealt harshly
with me and my brothers during the troubles, yet I
am not the man to hurry him on to his fate, and make
him irretrievably commit himself on the wrong side
of the quarrel. No; let us pass on, my friend;
we came only to rescue Max Greyslaer, and we will
harm no one save those who interfere in the attempt
to liberate him.
And adding aloud some words, which were
intended
as much to regulate the over-excited zeal of his
younger followers as to repress that of the daring
woodsman, he dismissed the subject by giving the
order to advance. Throwing, then, the old mill that
was in use in Sir William's time, between
themselves
and the hall, the party followed down the
rivulet north of the house, till they reached the little
bridge, memorable for Sir John's horse having fallen
dead upon it while spurring vainly to reach the
bed-side
of his dying father, a few years before the
period
of our story; and shortly after the whole band
entered the village of Johnstown.
The slumbering inhabitants little dreamed of the
bold deed that was meditated in the midst of them, as
the conspirators glided through their silent streets.
The party reached the jail, which stood in rather an
isolated position near the southeastern corner of the
town, and no one was yet disturbed. They drew up
in the shadow of the building, stationing themselves
before an iron wicket within a few yards of the main
entrance; the hunter Balt, at the instance of his
leader, advanced to the outer door to try the effect of
a parley with the jailer. A rap with his ponderous
knuckles upon the oaken door brought only a
hollow
echo from within; and Balt, after vainly
waiting
a moment or two for a more satisfactory answer,
applied his lips to the keyhole.
Mike, Michael, he cried; Michael, I say!
the blasted paddy's asleep. Jake, move hither
with your crowbarsoftly thoughhe hears.
I hear ye, ye loon ye; what the de'il d'ye want
with Mike at this hour of the night; a murrain
upon ye!
Mike, my good fellow, I come with a message
from the hall, and you must let me in instantly.
From the hall, eh? ye landloper; I'll hall ye, if
I get hold of your ugly self the morrow. Sir John
doesn't often send midnight messages to old Mike
in these times; you've come on a fool's business,
and that's your own, misther.
I know, I know you, foolish Mike; but there's
been a rising below of the Whi, I mean the rebels.
Yorpy, the half-breed, has just brought the news
from Caughnawaugha, and Sir John wishes to move
young Greyslaer to the hall for safer keeping.
Let him send the sheriff, then, or a sargeant's
guard of his Scotchmen; the lazy loons have
nothing
better to do than play sodger there from one
week's end to the other. Deil a bit will Michael
open jail till he does. So clear out wi' ye, or I'll
unchain the dog through the wicket.
As the sturdy jailer pronounced these words, a
deep-mouthed mastiff, who had hitherto been
snuffing
impatiently beneath the door, uttered a fierce
growl, and seeing, with the sagacity of his race, that
no exit was to be had this way, ran round to the
wicket and commenced barking furiously at the
party which was crowded near it.
Curse the brute, said Balt; will no one stop
his mouth with a pitchfork?
Balt, your profanity would bring a blight on the
most righteous cause, said the leader, sternly;
stand back, and let Jake heave the door at once
with his crow; no time is to be lost.
A sinewy mulatto, whose muscles, long exercised
in the toil of a journeyman blacksmith, seemed to
have assimilated to the tough material in which he
worked, moved to the spot and struck the crowbar
between the door and the lintel. But the blow,
though repeated for the second and third time, seem
ed to produce but little effect, until his master,
rushing
forward, threw his whole weight into his
gigantic
sledge-hammer, in the same moment that the
mulatto summoned all his force for one more effort.
The door went down crashing inward, while poor
Jake, who pitched himself fairly within the entrance,
was saluted on his sconce by the jailer with a huge
bunch of keys, which would have crushed the scull
of any other than a negro, and which made Jake
measure his length upon the floor.
Harm not the faithful Irishman, cried Colonel
Fonda, arresting with his hand the uplifted hammer
of the blacksmith; the brave fellow has only done
his duty.
Thank yere honour, answered Mike, making a
reverence as he felt his heart touched in the right
place, and quietly submitting to be secured by the
overwhelming force which surrounded him; thank
yere honour kindly; rebel or no rebel, ye're jist the
gintleman that Mike would take service under, if Sir
John was not a kind of third part countryman, and
me beholden to him upon the top o' that, yere
honour
,
added he, raising his voice, as the colonel, who
had seized the jailer's lantern, now gained the top of
the staircase.
Max, my boy, Max Greyslaer, where are you?
shouted Balt; whistle but once from your perch,
my young hawk o' the mountain, andah, Jake,
your toothpick's the thing; and, interrupting himself,
as he suddenly clutched the crowbar from the negro,
he dashed in a panel of the first door near him, and
the liberated young patriot was the next moment
overwhelmed with the congratulations of his friends.
Elated with their success, but still conscious that
these lawless proceedings might recoil severely
Vol. I.E
upon themselves, the band of Whigs unanimously
determined to seize the sheriff, who had been the
willing instrument of the Johnsons in depriving
Greyslaer of his liberty, and hold him as an hostage
for their own safety. This gentleman, a brave and
zealous loyalist, chanced to be absent from home,
passing the night with his friends at the hall. But
his house was left in charge of one of his
myrmidons
,
equally determined in character with the
sheriff
himself.
This redoubtable fellow, of German parentage,
and who, under the name of Wolfert Valtmeyer, or
Red Wolfert, as he was more generally called,
became
afterward the terror of the border, was a
hunter
by profession; and, though impatient of restraint,
reckless of temper, and wholly undisciplined in
character
for the ordinary purposes of social life, he was
well suited, not less by his remarkable strength and
activity, than by his hardihood and love of daring
enterprise
,
to fill the station of a bailiff among the
frontier community around him. In this capacity
he had, in former years, been frequently retained
upon an emergency, when his services were
temporarily
in demand; but the life of a free hunter
was so dear to him that he could never be
persuaded
to undertake the permanent duties of a
sheriff's officer. Indeed, the love of his personal
liberty and freedom from all responsibility was so
strong in Valtmeyer's bosom, that it seemed to
leave room for one only other sentimenta
grasping
desire after gold to procure him immunity from
labour, and the free indulgence of his lawless
pleasures
.
Wolfert Valtmeyer, being such as we have
described
him, was not long in making up his mind
which of the two contending civil factions to side
with. For, while property, and the consequent
means of rewarding his services, was in his
county
chiefly on the side of the Tories, he was already
indebted to some leading individuals among this
party for rescuing him from punishment as a felon,
and conniving at his escape to a distant part of the
country. Rumours of his death were subsequently
put in circulation, while all legal investigation
gradually
died away so completely, that Valtmeyer now
ventured, amid the confusion of the times, to steal
back to his old haunts, and even offer his secret
services to the magistracy of the county. Though
the difficulties with the crown had so lately
commenced
,
yet he had already given signal proofs of
his zeal in sustaining the royal cause; nor was he
wanting in courage and conduct upon the present
occasion.
The house of his principal being sufficiently far
from the jail for Valtmeyer not to overhear the
commotion
that had already taken place, he was
awakened
in the dead of the night by the angry shouts
and imprecations of the crowd that rushed thither,
and called from beneath the windows for the sheriff;
but, undismayed equally by the suddenness of the
attack and the strength of those who came in such
force to assail the person whom he represented,
Valtmeyer only greeted the uproar with a muttered
oath or two, as he prepared to meet the occasion.
Heilege Kreuz Donnerwetter!
but I will make
the hide of one hound smoke for it; and, growling
thus, he leaped half naked from his bed, snatched a
loaded pistol from its case, and threw open the
window-sash
.
Now,
verfluchter kerl
, look well to
thyself, muttered the ruffian, as he singled out for
his aim the leader of the party, who was standing in
the porch apart from his followers. Raising his
voice then, and at the same time imitating, as nearly
as possible, that of the absent sheriff,
Is that you, Sammons? he cried.
Yes, was the prompt reply.
Then take that for a dd burglarious rebel.
A ball whizzed past the head of the sturdy Whig,
and buried itself in the doorpost beside him.
This, says the historian, was the first shot fired
in the Revolution west of the Hudson.
Though happily uninjured by the bullet, yet it
glanced so near that the patriot leader recoiled as it
grazed his temples, and his followers, thinking that
he was about to fall, forgot, in the quick thirst of
vengeance
,
the order they had received from his lips
an hour before. A dozen rifles were instantly
discharged
into the open window, but a scornful shout
from the bold Tory within told that their fire
was ineffectual. A tumultuous rush at the door
was the next movement of the infuriated crowd.
It was quickly burst open, and the fate of
Valtmeyer
turned upon a single cast. The foremost of
the assailing party were already upon the staircase,
and making their way to his bedroom, when the
report
of a distant cannon proclaimed that their volley
of firearms had been heard beyond the precincts of
the village, and that the Tories would soon be upon
them.
Back men, back; heard ye not our signal for
retiring? 'Tis the alarm gun fired at the Hall by
Sir John. Balt, Adam, down with ye at once!
Lansingh, Greyslaer, call off our friends, or we
shall have the bluff Highlanders upon us to spoil
our night's work before we regain the woods.
Don't ye hear the major, Squire Dirk? cried
Balt, throwing his arms around that rash youth, who
still attempted to push through the crowd and mount
the stairs in the very teeth of the order that had just
been given by his leader; and lifting young De Roos
fairly from his feet, the stalwart hunter urged the
others before him through the door, and was
himself
the last to retire from the scene.
CHAPTER V.
EVENING VISITERS.
Our fortress is the good green wood,
Our tent the cypress-tree,
We know the forest round us
As seamen know the sea;
We know its walls of thorny vines,
Its glades of reedy grass,
Its safe and silent islands
Within the deep morass.
Bryant
.
I rayther
guess, quoth Balt, when the party
had all, by different routes, arrived at last at their
place of rendezvous in a moonlit glade of the forest,
I rayther guess that we've stirred the game right in
airnest this night, and the best thing we can do
tomorrow
is to commence running balls for a good
long hunt.
Our sturdy friend speaks truly, gentlemen,
said the leader of the party, gravely, and Heaven
only knows how the `long hunt,' as he terms it, may
terminate.
Be the issue what it may, exclaimed Greyslaer,
in tones of deep fervour, while his earnest eye
kindled with enthusiasm, the game's afoot, and
whether it lead to freedom or the grave, we must
henceforth follow the chase.
Why the devil, Max, do you put on the phiz
of a parson when using the lingo of a sportsman?
cried the gay Derrick de Roos. It becomes the
old cocks, who have drawn apart to prose under
the tree yonder, to look sermons, as well as preach
them; but for us, man, for mettlesome chaps like
us, why,
E 2
`We hunters who follow the chase, the chase
Ride ever with Care a race, a race,
And we reck not,' &c., &c.
And the rattling youngster, to the great delight
of old Balt and some of the juniors, and the equal
annoyance of Greyslaer and other more thoughtful
members of the party, ran through a verse or two
of a popular hunting song, long since forgotten.
Well, Mr. de Roos, said Col. Fonda, coming
forward from the group, in whose councils
Greyslaer
seemed to be taking an active part, from the
impatient glances he from time to time cast over
his shoulder at the singer, from whose side he had
in the mean time withdrawn; well, sir, we have
determined to take decided measures for
ascertaining
the real state of the county, and putting our
friends upon their guard, and your father's house
is spoken of as the place of our next meeting on
Thursday night.
The old man will be proud to entertain your
friends and mine, Col. Fonda; and yet, added the
young man, with a degree of hesitation that
showed
more considerateness than might have been
expected
from his conduct a moment before;
Hawksnest
is the property of my father's ward, Max
Greyslaer there; and, after what has passed this
night, an overt act of rebellion by the present
tenant
,
in harbouring traitors, as the Tories call us,
might make poor Max forfeit his acres, in case the
ministry get the better in this family quarrel; some
of the grasping rogues begin already to talk of
sequestrations
and such matters, you know.
Greyslaer, upon overhearing these remarks,
advanced
,
and whispered to his friend, If you be
not quizzing, according to your wont, Dirk, I
congratulate
you upon the seasonable return to gravity
which your speech evinces. But, gentlemen, he
continued, raising his voice as he turned to his other
compatriots, I shall consider your confidence
withdrawn from me, as one unworthy to share it,
if the hint suggested by my friend De RoosI
doubt not in all kindnessbe allowed to have a
moment's
weight with you. My honour is already
committed in the cause you have espoused; my life
I here pledge to it, and he can be no friend to Max
Greyslaer who holds his fortune dearer than his
life or his honour!
These words, not less than the spirited tone in
which they were pronounced, terminated at once
all doubts as to the propriety of the step that was
meditated; and the discussion, as well as the events
of the evening, seemed at an end. The hunter
Balt, who had lounged about the while, without
venturing to intrude his advice upon those more
fitted by education than himself for council, now
brightened up, and shook off the air of listlessness
that had crept over him. He struck the butt of his
rifle smartly upon the sod, and surveying it
affectionately
for a moment, as he held it thus at arm's
length perpendicular to the ground, as if to catch
inspiration from the gaze, he with becoming
gravity
thus delivered himself: Well, I only wanted
to see folks get through with their parrorching, for
you see I'm no great hand at making a speech; I've
been here to your public meetings and there to
your public meetings, and I never felt in my heart
as if natur called upon me to say anything; for
when natur does call, and right in airnest, she
speaks out of the mouths of hunters as well as of
babes and sucklings. She doesn't care, I say, much,
when she's right in airnest, what sort o' tool she
works with, jist as I've seen a good hunter, who
had got out of powder when ravin distracted hungry,
bring down a buck as slick with a bow and arrow
as if it had been his own rifle, and that, too, when he
had never used the ridiculous thing in his life afore.
Well, as I said, I'm tired of this etarnal parrorching
about the country's troubles; I only wanted to see
folks begin to make a raal thing of it, and then
Tender-TavyI call the iron crittur after this
fashion, gentlemen, partly out o' respect to Miss
Octavia, old Deacon Wingear, the tavern-keeper's
darter, and partly because the barrel is of so soft
a natur that I can chip it with my hunting knife.
I say, that when once there was a raal rising of the
Whigs, then this here rifle interrupting himself
at the word, Balt clapped to his shoulder the
reputable
weapon of which he spake, and glancing
along the barrel as it gleamed in the moonlight,
beckoned with his forefinger to a shadowy figure
that stood motionless beneath a spreading chestnut
within the range of his fire, Come in, ye varmint,
come in, ye lurching mouser from old Nick's
pantry, ye pisoned scum of the devil's copper
caldron
;
come in, ye scouting redskin, or Tender-Tavy
shall blow a hole through ye.
Fire not, Balt, cried Greyslaer and De Roos,
both leaping at the same moment before the
levelled
gun; 'tis the noble Oneida Teondetha. And
the two young men bounded forward with
outstretched
arms to greet their Indian friend.
Bah! only an Oneida, said the rifleman,
dropping
his piece in a tone of sullen disappointment;
I wouldn't harm the boy, pervided he comes as a
friend; but, youngsters, though you seem to be so
mighty fond of him, when you know as much of
the woods as old Balt, you'll larn that the less one
has to do with an Injun the better. Let every man
stick to his colour, is my motto.
The momentary flash of anger that distorted the
smooth and bland features of the Indian, showed that
he partially understood the disparaging words of the
white hunter; but the disturbed expression passed
away as the gentlemen of the party, unheeding the
rude remarks of Balt, advanced with eager
cordiality
successively, and gave their hands to the
newcomer
.
And what news brings my young brother from
his people? said Greyslaer, addressing the Oneida
in his own language.
The song of evil birds has been heard in the
lodges of the Ongwi-Honwi. The Oneidas only,
of all the Six Nations, have shut their ears against
it. Their hearts bleed to know that the rest of their
countrymen are bent upon rooting out the sons of
Corlaer from the land. The Oneidas will not help
to destroy a people born on the same soil with
themselves. Their wise men say, it were better at
once to extinguish the great council fire that has
burned for centuries at Onondaga, and thus dissolve
the league of the Aganuschion. The Oneidas are
unwilling to take up the hatchet against their
former
brothers, whether red or white; but they warn
you that Thayendanagea has sold the Mohawks to
the Sagernash king, and that they now walk with
your enemies.
What! Brant actually up in arms! exclaimed
a dozen voices, when Greyslaer had interpreted the
information to his friends.
He flits along the border like a foul bird in
scent of carrion. He watches the smoke of your
lodges; and, if their hearth-fires be unguarded, he
will swoop like that night-hawk upon your women
and little ones, replied the Indian, as a dusky bird
pounced greedily upon a swarm of gnats that
hovered
near.
The wily knave must be looked after instantly,
gentlemen; we must lose no time in collecting
information
respecting his movements, and determine
upon active measures at the next meeting of our
friends. But as yet we are all in the dark. If you,
Mr. de Roos, will take a scout of a dozen men with
you, and bring us some tidings of this dangerous
chieftain, it will give more shape to our proceedings.
This friendly Oneida will doubtless, with Balt and
some of his comrades, volunteer
Axing your pardon, colonel, Balt don't go
scouting
with an Injun in the party. Tender-Tavy
doesn't know much difference atwixt one copper
face and another, and she'd be jist as like as not,
in a dark swamp, to mistake that sleek chap for one
of Brant's people, and go off of herself. So there's
an eend o' the matter. And the woodsman, crossing
his legs, leaned moodily upon his rifle, with an air
of dogged determination to which there was no
reply
.
If Balt chooses, said Greyslaer, I would
rather have him with me, as I shall find difficulty
in getting my company together without assistance
in time for the meeting.
I don't see that, capting, as folks are now
engaged
in harvesting, and you'll find them pretty
much, here and there, in bunches, holping one
another
.
But I feel sarcy-able in persuading some of
your wild chaps to come along, that I guess won't
move from their homes at this season for your
order, no how.
For God's sake, then, go with Greyslaer, you
self-willed old bear. Let's to other matters,
gentlemen
,
cried De Roos, impatiently.
If I am an old bear, I never hugged you to
harm you, young squire, when I used to carry you
as a petted brat to see me shoot pigeons from a
bough-house; besides lots of dandling in other
ways that you've had in these oldpaws!
True, true, my excellent friend, answered De
Roos, good humouredly, while with difficulty
restraining
a laugh at the ludicrous words and
accompanying
gesture with which the stout-fisted
woodsman
concluded his mortified appeal to the better
feelings of the other. I spoke but in jest, Balt,
or, at least, too hastily. And now, carry on, boys,
carry on; Kit Lansingh, Helmer, Bleecker, Conyne,
which of you lads are ready to take duty under my
command, for twenty-four hours, while we look
after
Brant up by the Garoga lakes?
Twenty voices instantly replied, all expressing
their readiness to go upon the scout; and De Roos's
only difficulty was, to select from the number those
best suited to such an expedition.
Well, gentlemen, said Mr. Sammons, who was
only the temporary leader of the party, and whom
we ought, perhaps, according to the worshipful
custom
of our country, still to distinguish by his militia
title of major, I believe we now all understand
each other, and had better disperse to our houses;
those of us who live near will see if they cannot
furnish
a bed to our friends who have come from a
distance on the good errand of this night.
Perhaps
,
though, Mr. de Roos proposes a night march
with some of you?
The young partisan needed not the hint to spur
his zeal, but, warmly seconded by his followers, he
drew off at once, and took his way through the
woods with his party, trolling as he went a
voyageur's
song of the Mohawk boatmen, in which his
favourite slang phrase seemed to make the burden
of the chorus:
Carry on, carry on, 'tis the word that will bear,
From one bright moment pass'd to another as fair,
So lift the canoe, lads, and traverse the brake,
Though we're leaving the river we'll launch on the lake:
The portage is made, boys, the forest is gone,
Now bend to your oars, carry on, carry on.
The low-voiced chant of the retiring party soon
died away in the distance, and their departure was the
signal for breaking up the assemblage, and the
other
patriots soon dispersed, the majority taking their
route rowards Caughnawaugha, and others moving
off in different directions, two and three together, until
Balt and Greyslaer were soon left the only tenants
of the spot.
It wants yet some hours of the dawn, capting,
and I propose sleeping them off in the woods,
because
it's the best way of getting an airly start in
the morning. And we may perhaps have a good deal
of footing to do about among the farms on the off
settlements to-morrow, afore we can get your men
together. But this here is no sort of place to camp
in, with the trails of fifty men leading to it on all
sides. There's a dry swale on the other side of yon
hill, where one of my old shanties is probably yet
standing, and we'll jist take ourselves there as soon
as may be.
I used to have shanties like this all about
among these hills wherever my traps were set,
though none so near the settlements as this,
continued
the hunter, when they had gained a rocky dell,
where the frame of a wretched wigwam, partially
covered with birch bark, was discernible to
Greyslaer
after he got within a few feet of it. You see,
now, capting, the comfort to a man who shanties
out as much as I do, of having a home all fixed and
ready for you. Here, now, is dried venison in my
katchy (cach), under those leaves, if the
wood-mice
haven't got at it. There, too, I've laid away
somebut darn those gnats, I must make a smudge
afore we do anything else.
With these words, Balt proceeded to strike a
light; and kindling first some dry leaves, he
scraped
the moss from a moist stump near, and
covering
up the flame with the damp material, the
thick fumes of his smudge soon caused the insects
to disappear. Greyslaer, in the mean time, had
stretched himself upon some hemlock boughs, spread
out beneath the shed of bark, which was barely
ample enough to keep off the dews of night; and
having refreshed himself upon the fare which the
hunter drew from his cach, he observed to Balt, as
the latter threw a fresh handful of leaves upon the
smouldering flame, That a hunter's fire was a sort
of company for him, when passing a night in the
solitudes of the wilderness.
Jist the best sort of company a man can have,
capting, if he would exercise a free and independent
privilege of choosing his own. They say, you know,
that the devil hates all flames save those that are
kindled by himself; and in my hunts among the
wild hills away to the north of us, I never shanty
out without a large fire, even in midsummer. I may
be kind o' particular in this matter, but ever since I
got so terribly scared five years ago, I always love
the light of a big fire to sleep by.
Greyslaer, instantly suspecting that the bluff
woodsman, like many a man equally bold, was the
victim of superstitious terrors, asked, with some
curiosity
,
what it was that had thus inspired him with
a fear of sleeping in darkness, when Balt, after a
preliminary hem or two, thus told his story.
Why, you see, I had gone clean up to Racket
Lake to make out a pack of deer-skins for a Scotch
trader at Schenectady, hoping to get a few beaver,
at the same time, on my own account. Well, I
might ha' been in the woods a week or more,
engaged
about my consarns, when, one day, after
trampoosing over a pretty smart space of country,
looking after my different traps, and, not having
seen a single deer through the livelong day, I came,
Vol. I.F
about nightfall, to a bark shanty, where some hunter
had made a pretty good camp for the night, and left
it standing. I was tired and disappinted; and, as
I hadn't spirit enough left in me even to skin a
chipmunk
,
if I hadn't a' found this lodge I should have
laid myself down, like a tired hound, and slept
anywhere
.
But now I began to think that all sorts of luck
hadn't left me, and I spunked up and looked about
to see how I could best make myself
comfortable
for the night. I had shot a brace of ducks
during
the day, and the first thing to do was to build
a fire and cook 'em. But, as I had left my hatchet
at the camp from which I started in the morning,
thinking to return there and sleep, it cost me a heap
of trouble collecting such dead branches as I could
lay my hands upon, and dragging 'em together
before
the shanty. And here was a pretty how-de-do
when I got 'em there; the man that built the shed
must have been a born nateral to choose such a
place for it. For, instead of picking out a patch of
firm airth whereon he might build a fire
judgmatically
,
he had laid the logs right down on a piece of
deep, mucky soil, made up of old roots, rotten leaves,
and sich things as go to make up a soil only fit to
raise toadstools, ghost moccasins, or timber so
spongy
and good for nothing, no one can tell why natur
produces it. Well, true enough, his fire had burned
right down four feet deep into the ground, through
such truck as that; and I, of consekins, must either
remove the shanty, or go to work to get rid of the
hole, before building my fire, if I expected to get
any heat from it; and the night was pison cold, I tell
ye. So, having no shovel to fill up the pit with
airth, and ne'er an axe to fell a tree across it, I goes
mousing about, in the dark, after old rotten stumps
and fallen trunks, whose mossy wrappings keep them
damp through and through the year round, and
slimy
roots, which, if they hadn't snakes under them
to nibble my fingers while tearing them up in the
dark, yet felt, for all the world, like raal sarpents in
the handling. All sich like truck that I could lay my
hands upon, I managed, with pretty hard work, to
drag together, so as nearly to fill up the hole, and,
placing my dry wood upon it, I lit my fire.
Well, after eating one of my ducks, I dressed
and roasted the other, so as to have him ready for
my breakfast in the morning; and then, as I put my
feet to the fire and laid myself down to sleep, I felt
right comfortable. I slept and I slept, and I don't
know for how long, but it must have been a pretty
likely nap, howsomdever. Long enough for my fire
to burn so low as to get pretty deep down the hole.
But the first thing that I remember, before I waked
and diskivered that, was my dreaming of being
chased
by wild Injuns, who came whooping and yelling
after me as if crazy to get my scalp. `
Howh
,'
`
howh
,' `
howh
,' the sound went clean down into my
ears; and, waking with a start, I saw a pair of bright
black eyes glaring at me. Had I used my own
judgmatically, I might have diskivered that these
belonged to a great antlered buck that was standing
with his fore feet fairly upon the ashes of my fire,
which made his eyes gleam unnaterally as he looked
straight into mine. But, half awake, and flurried as
I was, I snatched up a brand and flung it, with all
my might, into his face; and then, as the poor brute
scoured off, `
howh
,' `
howh
,' `
howh
,' a pack of wolves
came ravening on his track; tramp, tramp, I heard
them, nearer and nearer, until, fifty in number, they
dashed furiously by my fire, making the bushes fairly
winkle
as their black troop swept howling on.
Sarting, capting! I trembled like a leaf that
time, I did, until the opposite mountain threw back
the last shrieking echo from its side. I don't think
I ever knew exactly what a raal scaring was afore
that night; but, since then, I always keep up light
enough to let inquiring varmint see that it's Balt
the hunter who is sleeping in the neighbourhood,
with Tender-Tavy by his side. What, capting,
snoring
already! Well, if my story has put the lad to
sleep, it hasn't been wasted to no purpose,
howsomdever
.
And with these last muttered words, after
mending
his smudge with a few handfuls of fresh moss,
the good-natured hunter lay down, and was soon
dreaming with his comrade.
CHAPTER VI.
PREPARATIONS FOR A FORAY.
Fiercely they trim their crested hair,
The sanguine battle stains prepare,
And martial gear, while over all
Proud waves the feathery coronal.
Their peg belts are girt for fight,
Their loaded pouches slung aright,
The musket's tube is bright and true,
The tomahawk is sharped anew,
And counsels stern and flashing eyes
Betoken dangerous enterprise.
Yamoyden
.
Let
us now return to the wild-wood scenery of
our opening chapter. The events recorded in those
which have followed it, were, as the reader will
readily imagine, the tidings which had been brought
to Thayendanagea by the Indian runner. The
daring
acts of the Whigs had equally awakened the
indignation and the alarm of the royalist, and the
message from Sir John declared the country to be
in a state of actual revolution, and called upon Brant,
as an adherent to the government, to move at once
with his power to its support. It conveyed, too,
some slight reproach for the coolness with which
he had hitherto held himself aloof from the troubles
which an armed force might have awed into quiet;
and hinted that the best service that the chief could
now render to approve his loyalty, would be to seize
upon some prominent disaffected persons of the
county, and hand them over to the king's
magistrates
as hostages for the conduct of their friends
F 2
and kindred. The heir of Hawksnest, especially,
was mentioned as a fierce zealot and turbulent young
demagogue, whom it was well to remove from his
present sphere of mischief as soon as possible.
The task thus enjoined upon Brant was a
favourite
proceeding with the Tories throughout the war of
the Revolution, and was often but too successful in
its results. In the province of New-York, hundreds
were, from time to time, suddenly and secretly torn
from among their friends, and carried away to
captivity
or death. Nor was there any feature of the
civil war, during that painful seven years' struggle,
more appalling than this. The boldness of the act
for it was frequently practised in the most populous
districts, in an armed neighbourhood, in the very
capital of the province itselfstruck dismay into the
families of those who were thus abducted, and the
cruel doubt and mystery which shrouded their fate
was not less frightful; for while some, with
shattered
constitutions and spirits broken by
confinement
,
returned from the prisons of Canada after the
war was over, yet many were never heard of by their
friends from the moment of their disappearance, and
their destiny is enigmatical to this day. Nor was
it only the influential partisan or his active adherent
that was thus subjected to this hideous, because
secret
,
danger. The hostages, as they were called
the victims, as they were in realitywere taken,
like those of the secret tribunal in Germany, from
either sex and from any class of society. The
homes of the aged and infirmof the young and the
lovely, were alike subject to the terrible visitation.
The gay guest, who waved a blithe adieu to the
friends who were but now planning some
merry-meeting
for the morrow, was seen to mount his
horse and turn some angle of the road in safety,
but the steed and his rider were never traced
afterward
.
The hospitable, festive host, who left the
revel for a moment to cool his temples in the
evening
air, and whose careless jest, as he passed to the
porch without, still rung in the ears of his impatient
friends, never again touched with his lips the glass
that had been filled for him in his absence. The
waking infant cried vainly for the nursing mother,
who had left it to be watched by another for a
moment
.
The distracted bridegroom and fierce
brother
sought vainly for the maid, whose bridal toilet
seemed just to have been completed, when, by
invisible
hands, she was spirited away from her
father's
halls.
We begin our career of arms together with a
painful duty, Captain Brant, said MacDonald,
after the chief had expressed his determination to
move instantly upon the settlements in the direction
of the Hawksnest. I think I have heard you
speak of having been upon friendly terms with the
present tenant of this property, who, if I mistake not,
was one of your nearest neighbours upon the river
side.
I mean not in any way to harm old Mr. de Roos;
but this mettlesome young Greyslaer must be
removed
,
or he will only qualify his neck for the halter
by stirring up more treason. I shall attempt to
decoy
him from the house, or, failing in that, will
surprise it with so strong a party as to make
resistance
hopeless; and we shall merely ruffle the nerves
of his friends a little in seizing the springald, replied
Brant, coolly.
Are there no females in the family? asked the
European, with some anxiety.
Yes; there are two, a pair of sisters, mated in
love as closely as the kissing blossoms that tuft a
single twig in April; but no more matched in
character
than is the oriole, whose lazy nest swings from
the bough beneath him, with the eagle, whose
majestic
wing is circling yonder mountain. Yet the
pale girl, whom they call Tyntie, is a fair and
gentle
lady, and her kindness has been owned by more
than one woman of my own kindred. But Alida,
that queenly, stag-eyed creaturesurely, captain,
you have heard of the beautiful and haughty Alida
de Roos; she for whom my madcap son has
conceived
so strange a hatred.
Of which of his sons speaks the noble
Thayendanagea
?
Of that dark and dangerous boy whom
Bradshawe
has spoiled by encouraging in his wild doings;
of him who nearly compromised his father's honour
and a chieftain's name by consorting with the
ruffian
Valtmeyer.
Valtmeyer? surely, this is not the lady whom
Valtmeyer wronged so deeply, when Bradshawe
saved his neck from the gallows?
The same.
I have heard the story, said the Scotchman,
musingly; I have heard the dreadful tale. But,
after being outraged so cruelly, I should have looked
rather for her resemblance in the fragile, fading girl
of whom you first spoke, than in the blooming
creature
you describe as her sister.
Miss de Roos was scarcely more than a child
when the affair happened. Years have passed since
then. Time will do much with sorrow, pride,
perhaps
,
more. But, if you had ever marked the bright
and glassy glare of Alida's eyes, you would have
thought of those whom we Indians believe have
become
the tabernacles of another spirit than that
which first possessed the body; and such a spirit, 'tis
said, no mortal grief can overshadow.
A beautiful superstition to assuage the horrors
of lunacy, but too fanciful for truth. I have heard,
indeed, of men with souls so haughty that they
would never entertain a grief, if its memory were
linked with shame to themselves or lineage,
especially
if the consciousness of unmerited obloquy or
the keen hope of ultimate revenge buoyed up their
sanguine nature. But with a woman of blighted
honour
You may hold there, MacDonald. That proud
girl could never be made to believe that aught of
reproach has assailed her name; though her slim
sister, they say, faints at the sound of Valtmeyer's
name, and has pined away from the moment the
ruthless villain crossed Alida's path.
Good God! was there no brother, no kinsman
to look after this horrible business?
Not one save the old father, who lived so
retired
that the story never reached his ears; for
Alida
was off on a visit to some friends in a distant
settlement when the abduction took place. Her
brother, young Derrick, then but a child, was with
Greyslaer, his father's ward, at school at Albany.
And he has turned out such a fiery fellow since he
came to man's estate, that no one now would dare
to hint the matter to him.
And had the family not one friend to lift an
arm in such a quarrel? and yet indeed it were a
delicate business to meddle with, said
MacDonald
,
doubtingly.
They had two, answered Brant, with some
hesitation; two friends to whom the country
people
looked for dragging the offender to justice.
One of them, Walter Bradshawe, who was said to
be wooing the young lady at the time. But he
never moved in the matter, save secretly, to use
his influence in Valtmeyer's favour.
The base mongrel! And what said men of such
a recreant?
His conduct was known but to few, and those
said it sprung from a mean spirit of vengeance for
having been rejected by the lady. But this may
have been mere calumny, for parties were running
high at the time; Bradshawe was never popular,
and being a candidate for public office, his
character
was roughly handled.
You have said the De Roos family had two
friends they might have looked to. Had the other
one, then, no influence with the magistracy of the
country?
He had, said Brant, again hesitating, with
some emotion, before he made his reply; he was
connected with them both by alliance, by political
position, and by official station; and were not the
honour of his blood involved in the inquiry, no
feeling
of paternal tenderness would have prevented
him from cutting off his misbegotten offspring with
his own hand. And yet the Spirit above us knows
I love that wayward boy. The chieftain seemed
now deeply agitated for a moment, and then
turning
suddenly, so as to fix his eagle glance full upon
the eye of his companion, he added, in a stern and
almost fierce tone, I have answered your
inquiries
,
sir, from no mere prating spirit that feeds an
idle curiosity. You have formed a sudden
intimacy
with Au-neh-yesh; I would warn you, as a
gallant
soldier of the king and a friend of the
Mohawk
,
against the son of my own bosom. But
though the unnatural boy has twice attempted his
father's life, yet one whisper that attaches infamy
to the blood of Thayendanagea will bring veng
Spare the threat, noble Sachem; your secret is
ever safe with me. I cannot be too grateful for the
confidence you have this day reposed in me; yet
I cannot think there is anything of malignancy,
much less of meanness, in the character of Isaac
Brant, or Au-neh-yesh, as you prefer calling him.
God forbid that I should attempt to palliate his
unnatural
conduct towards his father. But phrensied
as are the passions of youth, yet
Enough! said the chief, in a tone so
emphatic
as at once to cut short the discussion; and then
striding forward impatiently, as if to get beyond
the reach of a reply from his companion, he added,
in a low and tremulous, but still distinct voice:
The friend of Thayendanagea will bury this
subject
for ever in his own bosom.
A few moments afterward the two partisans
reached the clearing upon the Sacondaga, where
the principal warriors of Brant had taken up a strong
position in an elbow of the river, fortifying their
camp with mounds and palisades after the
military
custom of the Six Nations.
The day was now long past the meridian, and
the chieftain lost no time in making his
preparations
for a movement upon the settlements of the
German Flats on the morrow. After a brief
harangue to his followers, he drew out a select
band of warriors, his son Au-neh-yesh being one
of the number, for the proposed expedition; and
straightway commenced the fantastic pageant
incident
to the setting out of a war-party at the
commencement
of an Indian compaign; while
MacDonald
,
surveying the spectacle with a curious eye, was
not a little surprised to witness the almost
childish
zeal with which Thayendanagea took his full
part in the savage mummery. A strange and
bombastic
metamorphosis seemed to have come over
the reasoning companion with whom he had
hitherto
been acquainted; so changed, indeed, did the
whole man seem within one brief hour, that the
wondering Scot could scarcely recognise in him
the person with whom he had lately walked
conversing
.
This Mohawk, said MacDonald, mentally,
with all his talents and attainments, can never be
given as an instance of the capacity of his race for
civilization. The man seems to have two natures;
or, rather, the artificial character, produced by
education
,
is as distinct from his Indian nature as if it
belonged to another person. And if they do ever
mingle, it is only as I have sometimes seen the
blood of a European veining, without suffusing, the
cheek of a half-breed.
This opinion of the shrewd Scotchman seems to
have been subsequently borne out by the singular
incongruities which characterized the career of the
remarkable person of whom it was pronounced; and
the historian of the times still hesitates in what
light to regard him who is described by many of
his contemporaries as a mere cruel,
coarse-minded
savage, at the very time when the chief
enjoyed
the friendship of some of the most chivalric
hearts, and could boast an intimate correspondence
with some of the most polished minds of Europe.
The sun had got low in the heavens by the time
the warriors were all arrayed for battle, and the
important
task of putting on the war-paint concluded.
His level beams shot through the tree-tops on the
opposite shore, and glancing luridly upon the broad
stream that flowed in front of the Iroquois camp,
lighted up a grotesque array of forms and faces,
mirrored in every variety of attitude in the tranquil
river.
Good! said an Indian, who had just completed
his barbaric toilet, and still lingered, surveying the
result, with childish gratification, in the tide that
rolled at his feet, very good; Squinandosh is a
great man. The Sacondaga is a happy stream, to
reflect a face so terrible as his. Go, river, and
bear his image in thy current while men tremble
along thy shores as they see it float by. Go, river,
and tell the great lake into which thou pourest,
that thou hast seen Squinandosh.
Who is greater than Kan-au-gou? cried
another
,
rising with solemn gravity from the position
in which he had crouched, the bravest of the men
who surpass all others. He paints not, he, to
make his features terrible, but to hide the
countenance
,
from which, if seen, his enemies would fly
so fast his bullets would never overtake them.
Behold, Au-neh-yesh! look well upon the tall
one, said a third warrior, with the same
Homeric
diffidence of self-praise. It is the blood of
fifty white warriors that sprinkles his forehead. I
hear their widows and children howling after their
scalps, which shall dry in the smoke of his lodge;
but what hand shall ever reach up to the scalp of
him who walks with his head among the clouds?
One youth, more sentimentally given, seemed to
regret only that there were no fair ones present to
yield their admiration to the gallant figure that he
made in his own eyes. Rejoicing in the possession
of a bit of broken looking-glass, this animated
personage
paused ever and anon to elaborate his
toilet
with some additional grace, as he strutted about
like a bantom cock, exclaiming: Where are the
maids of the Mohawk, who love to look upon such
a man as `
Le-petit-soldat?
' Where is Tze-gwinda,
the fawn-eyed girl of the Unadilla, and she whose
feet move like a tripping brook, when the
hawks-bells
tinkle around her slender ankles in the dance,
the laughing Ivalette? Where Waneka, of the
willowy form, and `Cherie,' whose eyes
outsparkled
those of Ononthio's daughters at Montreal?
Where is she whose footfalls leave no print behind
them on the greensward or snowdrift; she who
steals upon men's hearts they know not whence or
how, where is `The Spreading Dew?' Let each of
Vol. I.G
them come, look upon `
Le-petit-soldat
,' and sigh to
be the squaw of such a warrior.
The Little Opossum is a great painter, added
yet another of these heroic worthies; none but a
medicine can find out his secret for mixing colours.
Owaneyo has not yet breathed in the nostrils of the
man that is meant to kill him. This island has but
one such warrior. Who but `The Little Opossum'
can kill `The Little Opossum?'
As the night closed in they lighted their torches,
formed of the pitchy knots of the yellow pine; and
their barbaric boasting grew still more extravagant
as they tossed them wildly in the war-dance. But
here the demoniac forms, the distorted features, and
ferocious gesticulations, as they moved in savage
measure to the deep roll of the Indian drum, gave
at least a fiendish dignity to the scene in the eyes of
the European. It seemed as if the yawning earth
had released a troop of demons from below to
practise
for a while their mad antics in the upper air;
and the Briton shuddered as he thought of such a
hellish crew being let loose to work their will upon
his rebellious countrymen.
There was a heavy rain during the night, and
many of these gallantly-apparelled warriors, who
slept in their war-dresses, looked sadly bedraggled,
after an hour's march through the dripping forest
the next morning; but their appearance was still
sufficiently formidable to awaken the admiration of
the martial Scotchman; and their military order,
their silence, and precision of movement, in
obedience
to each command of their leader, when they
were once fairly started upon the war-path, struck
him as characterizing a race who were soldiers, both
by nature and education.
But among no martial people of whom history
preserves a record were there severer disciplinari
ans than among those semi-civilized tribes which
are known by the generic name of the Iroquois; a
stern and stoical people, whose peculiar institutions
and Spartan-like characterfor their discipline
extended
to all the relations of lifehave been so
ignorantly
confounded with the loose customs of the
more mercurial races, the mere barbaric tribes that
are still scattered over the northern and western
parts of this continent. Many, indeed, have
denied
the superiority of the Six Nations over other
aboriginal races, and questioned the degree of
civilization
which they had reached, because it was not
progressive; because the era of the Revolution
found them with the same social habits that are
ascribed
to them by the earliest writers who make
mention of the Iroquois. But if that anomalous and
remarkable feature of the respect paid to women
[2]
[2]
The written treaties of the Five Nations, preserved among
the government archives, always open with, We, the Sachems
and principal
women
of the Five Nations, &c.
among them were wanting to confute this position,
how, it might be asked, how can that nation be
progressive in civilization which makes war the end
of all its efforts for improvement, instead of keeping
prepared for it merely as the means of preserving
the blessings of peace? which encourages
agriculture
,
and builds granaries, only for the supply of
armies, and explores the navigable waters of a vast
continent, not for the purposes of trade, but to secure
the transportation of those munitions which may
enable
its forces to keep the field through a succession
of campaigns? Yet such was the policy which
enabled
the Six Nations to carry their conquering
arms through every region that is now
comprehended
in this wide-spread Union; and which made
them formidable, not only to the wild tribes far
west of the Mississippi, but to the Frenchman of
the St. Lawrence, the Englishman of the
Chesapeake
,
and the Spaniard of Mexico.
The Scottish soldier listened with thrilling
interest
to the wild and warlike tales of distant forays,
as Thayendanagea beguiled the march by dwelling
upon the former glories of his people. Their
religion
and laws were frequently the subject of his
inquiries
;
and, strange and uncouth as many of their
observances appeared to him, he had travelled too
widely over the earth to judge peculiar usages by
the narrow standard of his own national customs.
The partisans talked next of the civil war, whose
outbreak, so long threatening, seemed now at hand;
and the sagacious and comprehensive views of the
chieftain were not thrown away upon his
experienced
companion, though more than once a strange
discord was struck in the bosom of the latter by the
ferocious sentiments that gleamed through the
polished
language of his Indian comrade.
MacDonald, though a soldier of fortune, had
never
been engaged in quite so disagreeable a business
before. For, though upon the same side with a
majority
of his Catholic countrymen, yet there were
great numbers of Cameronian Scotch acting with
the Whigs; and, Jacobite as he was, he felt that
there was a difference between battling with an
opposite
faction at Culloden and cutting the throats of
countrymen who, like himself, had come to find a
peaceful home in a strange land. This not
unnatural
feeling of compunction was brought out more
strongly by a fierce reply which Brant made to
some observation of his about the relations of
friendship
in which the chieftain had recently stood
towards
those with whom he must now come in
immediate
collision.
And what, said the Mohawk, what are
private
ties in times like these, when those of nations
are so rudely severed? Do you expect an Indian
to play the woman, when you white men have
forgotten
all the claims of blood and kindred in this
strange quarrel with each other? If the wolf devour
his own whelps, why should the panther spare them,
merely because they are tenants of the same forest
with himself?
But the night has again closed in around us, and
the prowling Indian has reached the fold he would
plunder.
G 2
CHAPTER VII.
THE RIFLING OF THE HAWKSNEST.
A crash! They've forced the door, and then
One long, long shrill and piercing scream
Comes thrilling through the growl of men.
'Tis hers!
Dana
.
The
Farmer's Homestead, from which the estate
of Greyslaer took its name, lay upon the banks of
the Mohawk, immediately at the mouth of one of
those wooded gorges through which the tributaries
of the river descend from the mountains of
Montgomery
to unite with the parent stream. The
broad, low-eaved mansion reposed in a rich alluvial
meadow, amid a clump of weeping elms; the
luxuriancy
of whose foliage betrayed the
neighbourhood
of the brook that watered their roots; and
which, descending impatiently amid the copses of
hazel and wild cherry, from the upland in the rear
of the house, glided slowly and noiselessly through
the green pastures, as if unwilling at the last to
merge its current into the broader stream beyond.
Here, said Thayendagea to his European
friend, when, having stationed his band in the
underwood
that lined the sides of the gorge, he began to
move cautiously toward the house, accompanied
only by MacDonald; here is the Hawksnest of
which I have spoken, and within an hour we will
clip the wings of the wildest of the falcon brood.
The two royalists now approached the house with
the most stealthy caution, and by glancing from one
outbuilding to another, keeping always within their
shadow, they at last attained a position in which,
screened behind a trellice covered by gourds and
hop-vines, that sheltered the cottage-like porch, they
could easily look into the low windows of the
mansion
.
The scene thus witnessed brought so vividly to
mind the recollections of his early home, that the
British officer again shrunk from the stern task in
which he had consented to share. The window
opened into a large room wainscoted with black
walnut, whose dusky panels were relieved here
and there by the glimmer of a brass-mounted press,
or an antique beaufet with its attendant service of
painted china, and other furniture of European
manufacture
,
which had probably been brought from
his fatherland by the first owner of the dwelling.
There was no carpet upon the floor of the
apartment
,
which seemed to be a sort of hall, or
common
sitting-room of the family, and a large
ducking-gun
supported upon a magnificent pair of antlers
over the fireplace, with other appointments and
trophies of the chase, indicated the predominant
tastes of its customary male occupants.
But there were traces also of the presence of woman
in this rural household, in the framed needle-work
that adorned the walls, the vase of freshly-gathered
flowers upon the mantelpiece, and, above all, in the
general air of neatness that pervaded its simple
arrangements
.
Nor did MacDonald long doubt to
whom these slight but indubitable evidences of
feminine
taste were owing, when he gazed upon the
occupants
of the apartment. These were an aged man
and his two daughters. A white-haired patriarch,
who sat a little aloof from the table, at which a
slight-made
,
invalid-looking girl was seated, reading aloud,
while the other, a dark-eyed, luxuriant beauty, stood
reeling some coloured worsted from the back of a
chair. The glow of health, the purple light of youth,
the pride of rich, resistless womanhood, seemed all
mantling in the cheek and animating the person of
the latter; and when the European gazed upon her
haughty, intellectual brow, her mouth, whose ripe
and melting softness was still redeemed from all
weakness of expression by something wayward
and aspiring even in its smiles; when glancing
from her white and exquisitely turned shoulders,
just touched by the light which polished her velvet
bodice, he looked to the noble contour of her
person
,
brought out as it was by the position in which
she stood, with one fairy foot upraised upon the
lower rung of the chair before her, the portrait of
more than one proud dame of princely courts rose
freshly radiant to his view; while the pale,
passionless-looking
girl, upon whom the old father gazed
with eyes of such affectionate interest, seemed the
far fitter tenant of an abode so obscure.
It is, indeed, a cruel duty, Sachem, to disturb
such a home as that, he whispered to his companion.
Yes, but still it is a duty, muttered the Indian,
sternly.
And yet not necessarily ours to-night; the
young man whom you seek is evidently not at
home; for see, now, the tall girl has laid aside her
work; they are preparing for family prayers, yet
Greyslaer is still absent.
Speak lower, said Brant, in a suppressed tone,
which sounded like the hissing of a serpent in the
ear of the other; that tall girl could wield the souls
of a hundred rebels with her eyes! She must be
placed out of the way till these fanatic boys of
the same traitorous household recover their senses.
Nay! murmur not at this decision; a hair of her
head shall not be injured. But, hist, what noise is
that? he added, turning round as he retired a few
paces from the trellice, which interposed its leafy
curtain between him and the window.
It is only some of your followers; you told them
to approach for the seizure, the moment that the
rising
moon should cast her first beam above you
clump of maples.
Yes, but she yet lacks a hand's breadth of
gaining
the top of the sugar-bush, and that tramp is
never made by an Indian moccasin.
As the chieftain spoke, the sharp crack of a rifle,
followed instantly by the wild whoop of Indian
war-fare
,
rang out on the night air, while a young
warrior
,
whose approach had been hitherto unobserved
by Thayendanagea himself, stood suddenly before
them.
A party of Corlaer's fighting men! but we
out-number
them. Our warriors sent me to ask leave
to fight, but the foe has stirred their covert before
the message could reach my father.
And where was Au-neh-yesh, not to know of
their approach? fiercely asked the chief of his son,
in their own language.
Au-neh-yesh watched upon the hills above the
waterfall; Kan-au-gou in the fields below. The
sons of Corlaer came up the bed of the running
water
,
and Kan-au-gou must have mistaken the
plashing
of footsteps on one side for the ripple of waters
on the other.
It is well; let our people stand fast till they
hear my signal from the hill behind them, and then
disperse as best they may.
The chieftain spoke, and Au-neh-yesh
disappeared
on the instant. And now, Captain
MacDonald
,
said Brant, we have not a moment to lose
in securing our captive, while my young men keep
the rebels at bay. Nay, I pledge myself to the girl's
safety, he added, with a jesture of impatience,
observing
still symptoms of reluctance in his
coadjutor
.
But the feat, so often afterward, during the war,
accomplished by Brant with such consummate
address
,
was fated, in the present instance, to a more
serious result than could have been anticipated.
Of the different parties of Whigs, who, according
to previous concert, were to rendezvous at the
Hawksnest this evening, that of Greyslaer was the
only one which, for reasons that will be
hereafter
mentioned moved to the proposed conference.
It was well that the band was better armed and
better
ordered than were most yeomanry corps at the
commencement of our civil struggle, and that they
were commanded by one who, on this night, gave
as signal proofs of his quickness of resource and
ability as a partisan soldier, as he had formerly
shown evidence of high moral courage upon the
occasions
we have already noticed. The twenty-four
hours which had elapsed since his deliverance from
the myrmidons of Sir John Johnson, Greyslaer knew
afforded sufficient time for that vigilant loyalist to
obtain information of the proceedings of the patriot
party, and to adopt measures to prevent the
proposed
meeting. This, in the excited state of
popular
feeling, could scarcely be effected by an open
exercise of his authority as a magistrate. A stroke
of address in seizing the rebel ringleaders, or the
cutting off the different parties in detail, by
way-laying
them on their approach to the rendezvous,
seemed the only movement that could serve his
purpose
.
Fearful, therefore, of an ambuscade,
Greyslaer
had exercised the greatest caution in
approaching
the scene of danger.
Marching warily along the banks of the river,
until
he came within half a mile of his destination, he
had turned aside upon reaching the mouth of the
tributary before mentioned; and, making the bed of
the smaller stream his highway, had struck inland
towards the hill, so as, by a serpentine course, to
approach the house from the rear. These
precautions
,
however, would only have served to throw
him into the midst of Brant's party, which, intent
upon the operation which had brought their chief to
the spot, lay concealed upon the banks of the brook
where it first descended to the lowlands, if the
military
foresight of the young partisan had not added
another safeguard to his march by throwing out a
picket upon either side of the stream.
The worthy Balt, who chanced to be one of the
two persons detailed upon this duty, used always to
quote his deeds of this night in illustration of a
favourite
assertion of his, that a true woodsman always
knew, by instinct, when an Indian was within fifty
yards of him. Certain it is, that he had not
proceeded
in advance of his comrades a hundred yards
up the stream, when a faint whistle, like that of a
woodcock settling in a cornfield when a summer
shower has lured him from his favourite morass,
caused an instant halt of his party. The call was
answered by an Indian, who, rising slowly from a
brake, showed his shaven crown, for a moment, in
the moonlight, and then slunk back to his cover, as
if having, for the instant, mistaken the call of a real
bird for the signal of some comrade come to relieve
him at his post.
Some three minutes were now passed by
Greyslaer's
party in breathless attention for another
signal
.
These were so skilfully employed by the
woodsman in gliding towards his foe, that they
measured the mortal existence of the unhappy
Indian
.
A short and desperate struggle, a smothered
cry, and the crashing of branches, as a heavy body
rolled through the thicket into the water, finished
the career of the warrior Kan-au-gou.
Thank your stars, boys, that your lives are not
trusted to such a stupid lout as that, whispered
Balt, joining his party the next instant. Capting,
that chap was painted for a war-party, and you may
depend there is more vermilion in the
neighbourhood
.
The red devils must be beyond the rifts
upon the hill above us; God knows how many of
'em; but the best thing we can do is to change our
course, and strike straight through the fields to the
homestead, where we can stand a siege, if the worst
come to the worst.
Greyslaer nodded approval, and instantly gave the
necessary order; while his men silently deployed
from the bed of the stream, and ascended the bank,
preparatory to making a swift movement across the
meadows to the house. Two fields, separated by a
high rail-fence, laid worm-fashion, intervened
between
them and the homestead, and it was the sound
of their feet, in running across the first field, which
caught the quick ear of Thayendanagea, and in the
same moment alarmed his ambushed followers.
Au-neh-yesh, by the order of one of the chiefs, had
bounded off, on the instant, to communicate with the
Sachem, and had nearly reached the house, when,
casting his eyes behind him, he beheld Greyslaer's
party in the act of surmounting the division-fence
we have mentioned. Without waiting to select his
man, he instantly fired upon them, and the shot
produced
at once the effect intended by the keen-witted
savage. The whites, finding themselves thus
attacked
in the direction of the house, deemed that it
was already in possession of the enemy. They
faltered
in their advance, and then, as a tumultuous
yell burst from the thickets on their flank, they
formed in the angles of the serpentine fence, as the
nearest cover at hand, and poured their fire upon the
advancing foe. The Mohawks recoiled on the
instant
,
and both parties lay now protected by their
cover, with a broad strip of moonlit meadow
between
them, into which both were afraid to venture,
contenting themselves with keeping up a dropping
fire upon each other, as the gleam of weapons
betrayed
here and there an object to aim at.
The situation of Greyslaer's party seemed now
precarious in the extreme.
The Redskins are surrounding us, captain, said
one of the brave but undisciplined yeomanry. We
had better back out by crawling, in the shadow of
the fence, to the bushes on the river-side in our
rear.
Rayther, said another, let us go ahead, and
make a clean thing of it, by charging through the
varmint in front, and gain the heavy timber in
their
rear.
Now my say is, boys, quoth Balt, just to do
neither one or t'other.
What, then, do you counsel, Balt? for we
cannot
long maintain ourselves where we lie, if the
Indians
are in any strength, said Greyslaer.
Why, the bizness is a bad one, anyhow you can
fix it, capting; but I think I understand the caper
on't. Don't you seesarve you right, Bill; I told
you they'd spile that hat afore the night was over, if
you would pop up your head above the rider instead
of firing atween the railsdon't you see that we've
only had one shot from the house, while the old
fence is already pretty well riddled from the hillside?
Wellelevate a little lower, Adam, if it's that
skulking fellow by the big elm you're trying for
well, then, as I was saying, it's pretty easy to guess
where the strength of the redskins must lie; and I
don't see that we can do better than streak it right
Vol. I.H
ahead for the house, and trust to legs and luck for
getting safe into it.
The suggestion was too much in accordance with
Greyslaer's feelings not to be eagerly caught at by
him. Indeed, so overpowering was his anxiety for
the beloved inmates of the mansion, that nothing but
considerations of duty toward the party who had
trusted themselves to his guidance, had hitherto
prevented him from dashing forward to his
destination
at all hazards. But if he had still hesitated as
to the course to adopt in the present exigency, all
doubt as to his movements was at once dispelled in
the moment that Balt finished speaking.
A sound of terror, the shriek of woman in
distress
,
with the hoarse cry of age imploring mercy
and assistance, rose suddenly from the dwelling,
chilling the blood of some, and making the pulses
of others leap with mad and vengeful impatience.
And it was then that, bursting simultaneously from
their cover, the red man and the white could be
seen urging their way with rival fleetness towards
the same goal, for the moment apparently regardless
of each other's neighbourhood; pausing not to strike
down a competitor in the race, but striving only who
first could reach the bourne. The one thirsting to
share in the massacre that seemed in the act of
perpetration
;
the other burning with fierce impatience
to arrest or avenge the butchery of his friends.
A light and agile youth, a fair-haired boy of
sixteen
,
was the first that gained the door of the
mansion
;
but even as he planted his foot upon the
threshold, his head was cloven asunder by an
Indian
tomahawk, and, with limbs quivering in death,
his body rolled down the steps, while the exulting
savage who dealt the blow leaped over it
brandishing
his fatal weapon. But his triumph was short.
Greyslaer was close upon him, and, as he strained
every nerve in rushing forward, he came with his
drawn rapier so impetuously upon the Indian, that
the point was driven through his back deep into the
panel of the door, which burst open from the shock.
Leaving his friends for the moment to make good
their entrance as best they could, by opposing their
hunting-knives and clubbed rifles to the tomahawks
and maces of the Indians, who instantly mingled
with them in wild mele around the porch,
Greyslaer
rushed forward to the sitting-room of the family.
He shrunk aghast at the sight of horror which told
him that he had come too late. The master of the
house lay stunned and senseless upon the floor.
Alida, the beautiful Alida, had disappeared; but her
fair-haired sister lay weltering in her blood, while a
gash across her forehead, with the tangled locks
drawn backward from her brow and the print of
gory fingers fresh upon the golden tissue, called
Greyslaer's eye to a savage, who shook his
scalping-knife
at him with a hideous grin of disappointed
malice as he sprang through the open window.
But there was no time now for grief to have its
way. The din of the conflict still rose fresh behind
him, and Greyslaer turned to the succour of his
friends whom it might avail.
Powder, powder, capting! shouted Balt, who
this moment presented himself. There's a big
redskin keeping three of our men at bay with his
tomahawk; I must use him up at once, to give the
rest an opportunity of making a rush from the
out-house
;
our best men are still outside. Bedlow
and Boonhoven are both down; but big Hans, the
miller, yet holds the door stoutly, and Bill Stacey
has gone up with his axe to drop the gutter from
the eaves upon the redskins that are hammering at
the windows. Ah! there's the tool for my purpose,
he added, seizing the ducking gun from the chimney,
and throwing down his half-loaded rifle; while
Greyslaer had, in the mean time, secured the window
through which the ferocious Au-neh-yesh had a
moment
before made his entrance and escape.
Greyslaer now rushed to support the man who
was holding the door against odds so stoutly; while
Balt ascended the staircase, freshly priming the
ducking gun, and adding a handful of buckshot to
the already heavily charged piece as he went. He
gained a window in the same moment that
Greyslaer
,
sallying out from the house sword in hand,
cut down the sturdy warrior for whom Balt had
prepared his charge. A dozen Mohawks instantly
rushed forward to avenge the fall of their comrade.
But the heavy piece of Balt did good service in the
moment, or Greyslaer's career would have been cut
short for ever. A shower of buckshot drove them
quickly to regain their cover.
Now, boys, shouted the woodsman, make a
rush for the house, while the red devils digest that
peppering.
The handful of outlying whites did not wait for
the invitation to be repeated, but rushed pellmell
within the porch so furiously as to bear down each
other in the hall, while the sturdy miller made a
liberal use of his foot in pushing aside their bodies
while shutting the heavy oaken door.
Furious at being thus foiled, the brave Mohawks
made a simultaneous rush towards the entrance,
when, at that instant, the rude and ponderous gutter,
loosened from the eaves, descended with a crash
upon their heads; and, with a wild howl of grief
and dismay, the survivers of their party drew off
their wounded and disabled comrades, and left the
stout yeomen masters of the field.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE RUINED HOMESTEAD.
The father gazed in anguish wild,
He pressed the bosom of his child:
There beat no pulse of life.
Yamoyden
.
The
human heart has no more bitter grief than
that which springs from the recollection of
unkindness
toward those who, loving us when living, are
now, by the barriers of the grave, placed for ever
beyond
the reach of our remorseful recollection.
But lovewhether it be the love of kindred, or the
wilder, warmer passion, that more generally bears
that nameis ever humble and self-chiding when
absent from its object. The heart then forgets the
frailties that may at times have shaken its esteem;
it softens in degree the faults which have so
severely
tried its regard, that it cannot but remember
them; it pardons every offending quality, that may
often have tasked its forbearance, and threatened
even the continuance of its tenderness; it imputes
to itself all the blame that it has ever attached to the
beloved object; and finds an excuse for each caprice
of the one who may have trifled with it, in its own
unworthiness, to inspire true affection.
It was not unnatural, therefore, that the young
Greyslaer, when he surveyed the desolation that
had come over the home of Alida, and thought of
her as torn from that home, a captive, dependant
upon the mercies of the half-civilized Mohawkit
was not unnatural that, while every humane and
H 2
generous impulse of his heart should be called into
action, the more subtile emotions of latent tenderness
should also quicken afresh in his bosom.
She loved me not, she never would have loved
me, said the youth, mournfully; yet, God knows,
I would have laid down my life for her. Yes,
coldly as she received me the last time I crossed
this threshold, and forbidding as I for months have
found her whene'er we met, I would give worlds
for one haughty and impatient glance, checking my
ill-timed assiduities, could she but now sit there in
safety to receive them. So noble, so gifted, so
gentle
,
to be torn thus
gentle?
No, Alida, the word
befits not thy proud and aspiring nature! Yet why
should I hold her high spirit in reproach, because
I may at times have chafed at its imperiousness,
and thought that it looked too insolently down upon
such a thing as I am? What am
I
, that I should
aspire to the love of such a being? What guerdon
have I won from glory, what deed of nobleness have
I achieved, that I may aspire to mate myself with
one whose queen-like step should be upon the neck
of emperors?
And the young man strode to and fro across the
apartment with disordered pace and gesticulations
that became the extravagance of his language; while
desperate resolves and bitter self-reproaches were
so wildly mingled in his speech, that one who had
never before witnessed the fantastic mood of a
lover
,
would have deemed that, if not the immediate
instrument of the calamity that had overtaken his
mistress, yet the preferring of his unwelcome suit
must be in some way the cause of her disastrous
fortunes. But when was there a lover who was not
an egotist, or who did not believe that the dream
which wraps his senses must somehow shape the
destiny of her who inspires the infatuation; who can
be made to think that the current of his feelings, like
the ocean tides, may reflect the image without
influencing
the actions of their mistress? But
Greyslaer
,
though the first burst of feeling will ever have
its way in one so young in years and new to sorrow,
was not a man to waste the moments that were
precious
,
in a lover's idle rhapsodies; nor, indeed, had
he given way to even this transient weakness, until
he had done all that could be at present
accomplished
for the distressed household.
The bereaved father, when first brought to his
senses, and enabled to recall his share in the events
of the night, left little doubt, by his testimony, as to
the disposal that had been made of Alida. But the
narration was so loose and unconnected, as wrung
piecemeal from the broken-hearted old man, that we
have ventured to enlarge and connect his relation,
in order to make it intelligible to the reader.
The shot and shout which heralded the conflict
had struck dismay into the family engaged in the
peaceful avocations we have described at the
opening
of the last chapter. The invalid girl had the
moment before laid aside the book which she had
been engaged in reading aloud; and her sister, taking
a Bible from the chimneypiece, handed it to her
father
to close the evening with the customary
religious
service before retiring.
It would be provoking, remarked Alida, while
opening the good book on the table before him, if
some of Derrick's rough comrades should not have
heard that the night of the rendezvous was changed,
and come and rouse us an hour hence from our
slumbers! There's one gallant I wot of, Tyntie,
added she, passing her hand archly over the head
of her sister, who would not be sorry for the
omission, if it but gave him an excuse for showing
his new uniform at Hawksnest.
Pshaw, sister, you know that young Harper is
no more to me than any other young man of the
valley that comes to our house. But I am sure that
to-night I should be glad to see him or any of the
bold friends that Dirk has collected around us in
these stormy times. Brave as you are, I don't
believe
you would have been sorry if, instead of the
boy they sent with the note, wise Max Greyslaer
had been the bearer of it.
The striplings are alike to me, said Alida,
without
noticing the faint smile of the invalid. As for
Greyslaer, he had to go south to the Reinhollow
Settlement to get his friends together; and they
would have eaten us out of house and home, if we
had to keep his hungry hunters over the morrow.
But, silly one, think you that, if there were danger,
Derrick would have kept aloof himself? Father, let
me look again at his note! See, there's nothing to
alarm us here, pursued she, reading the missive
aloud:
We shall not disturb the repose of your house
to-night, my dear father, as the proposed meeting of
the
friends of the king and constitution
is deferred.
The ministerial malignants are abroad. Johnson,
indeed, still lies, with all his power, at the hall; but
his tool, Joseph Brant, has got together some
vagabond
Mohawks at the north, and has prepared to
move to-morrow towards the river. He claims
that he and his miscreant followers represent the
sentiments of the whole Six Nations; and we are
going westward to intercept his march, and seize
his person, before he can communicate with the
other Indians and work us farther mischief. I
always
told you, honoured sir, that this precious
specimen
of the civilized savage would go with the
British ministers in their tyrannical attempts to
enslave
us, and I will make your quondam friend
confess
as much before to-morrow night, if
The sudden report of firearms, followed
immediately
by the appalling war-whoop, broke off the
farther reading of the note, and struck dismay into
the defenceless household. The timid Tyntie,
pressing her hands to her temples, as if to shut out
the fearful sounds, bent her head down to the table,
cowering like a frightened bird, hopeless of escape
when the fowler is upon her. The old man clasped
his hands, and uplifted his aged and prayerful
countenance
with a look of mute but anxious pleading.
Alida only, of the three, seemed to retain the power
of action. Pushing the table impatiently from her,
she stood, for a moment, with flashing eye and
dilated
form, and senses all alert, as if, Penthisalea-like,
the sounds of approaching combat were music to
her soul. Then, as the turmoil of the strife rose
nearer and clearer, she cast a hurried look of
anxiety
at the helpless beings by her side, and rushed
to a window to gain intelligence of the extent of the
danger.
It was the same window beside which Brant and
his Scottish accomplice had planted themselves;
and, as impetuously throwing up the sash, she
leaned
far out to catch a view of the grounds beyond the
end of the house, the sinewy arm of the chieftain
encircled her waist in a moment, and, incapacitated
from resistance alike by surprise and the position
in which she stood, she was lifted from her feet by
a power that was equally rapid and resistless, and
placed in the arms of MacDonald, who, moved but
not melted by her shrieks, hurried from the spot
with his captive. As for Brant, he had only
delayed
for a moment to pinion her arms by securing the
ends of his knotted baldrick, which, unobserved by
MacDonald, he had thrown over her shoulders in
the moment he seized her person, and then he
bounded through the open window into the
apartment
.
Joseph Brant! cried the old man, raising the
palms of his hands like one startled by an
apparition
,
and averting his head as if to shut out the
conviction
of the character in which his former
neighbour
now presented himself. Joseph Brant, my
enemy!
Thayendanagea, your ancient friend, replied
the chief, advancing with outstretched hand.
Off, off, perfidious and ruthless villain. If a
father's
vengeance could renew the strength in these
withered limbs, you durst not
By the eternal spirit of Truth above us, not a
hair of your daughter's head, old man, shall come to
harm. 'Twas but to prove to you Alida's safety in
the hands of Thayendanagea that I have betrayed
my share in this night's business; for that, and to
assure you of your own, is all
Yes, as the hound protects the hind from the
knife of the hunter, when he has driven her into his
hands. Off, dog of an Indian, off, wretched
mercenary
;
or, if your power to save be equal to your
will to slay, protect yourself at this moment. And
seizing a tall andiron from the fireplace, he
brandished
aloft his awkward weapon, and rushed upon
the chieftain. Phrensied with passion, the feeble
old man had summoned all his remaining energy to
deal a single blow at the spoiler of his household;
and as Brant leaped lightly aside from the
descending
blow, he fell forward, striking his hoary brow
with stunning effect against the iron instrument,
which came between his head and the floor. At this
moment, Alida, escaping from the care of
MacDonald
,
presented herself at the window, with the
Indian
Au-neh-yesh in close pursuit behind her. The
ferocious young savage had already raised his
tomahawk
to strike, and it was only the menacing cry
of his chieftain and father which saved the life of
the maid. A few hurried words from him told
Brant that there was now no time to be lost, if he
would secure the only prey yet in his power. He
tore the shrieking girl from the window-sill, to
which she clung; and lifting her like a child in his
arms, rushed, through the garden and up the
wooded
hill in the rear of the house.
The young Mohawk turned to bear back the
command of his Sachem to his party, but catching
a glimpse of Tyntie's prostrate form, who still lay
lost in the swoon into which the first alarm had
thrown her, he could not resist his ferocious
propensities
,
while the tumult of the strife, which at
this moment rose nearer and nearer, urged their
gratification. He sprang forward, buried his
tomahawk
in her brain, and, twisting his fingers in her
long tresses, had already drawn the scalping knife
from his girdle, when Greyslaer's sudden
appearance
compelled him to seek safety in flight.
The other incidents of the assault have been
already
detailed to the reader in the previous
chapter
.
The note we have mentioned, which still lay
open upon the table, for the first time acquainted
Grayslaer with the altered intentions of his friends.
But, under existing circumstances, he determined
to remain at the Hawksnest, and await their coming
on the following day. An attempt to rescue Alida
with his present handful of men would, he soon
acknowledged, be worse than vain; but he did not
abandon the idea, until, by a close examination of
the ground, he had made a tolerably accurate
estimation
of the number of followers Brant had with
him, and his means of securing an escape to the
upper country. He was even able to trace the
foot-steeps
of Alida herself in several places. But a
dog belonging to the household, which had been
unchained to assist in the examination, and had
proved himself eminently useful in striking the
Indian
trail in the first instance, and shown his
sagacious
sympathy in their search by uttering a sharp
howl when they first lighted upon the traces of his
mistress, disappeared soon afterward amid the
darkness
of the forest, and the use of the lanterns in
groping about added nothing farther to their
discoveries
when the aid of the animal was withdrawn.
In the mean time, the patriot party took every
precaution to secure themselves against a surprise
during the night. The windows of the house were
strongly barricaded, sentinels were posted, and a
shed, with other slight outbuildings, which might
cover the approach of an enemy, were levelled with
the ground. The body of the unfortunate Tyntie
was consigned to the care of a couple of female
slaves, whose vociferous grief over the gory
remains
of their young mistress almost drowned the
deep mourning of her stricken-hearted father, who
had to be forcibly torn from the body and carried
off to another chamber.
After a night made tedious by broken slumbers
and harassing dreams, confusedly alternating each
other, it was with no slight feeling of relief that
Greyslaer hailed the approach of dawn. The
summer
landscape wore a Sabbath-like stillness, as
he gazed upon it from his open window, while
inhaling
the fresh breeze of morning. The
mist-wreaths
curling up from the river were the only
objects
moving, and even these stole off as gently as
if fearful of breaking the silence by a more rapid
motion; creeping now around some imbowered
islet, pausing now to twine for a moment amid the
leafy festoons of vines and branching elms upon
some jutting promontory, and now circling the brow
of one of those cliffs whose craggy and frowning
summits give its only feature of sternness to the
soft and lovely vale of the Mohawk, and at once
dignify and diversify its exquisite landscape.
The heart of the young patriot bled to think that
a scene so fair and smiling must be given up to the
cruel ravages of war. Of a war too, which, while
presenting itself in the worst form of that scourge
of humanity, brought with it the threatening
horrors
of many a savage massacre, superadded to the
dire calamity of armed discord among those who
call themselves civilized.
And what, thought Greyslaer, what are the
private griefs of one solitary being like myself, to
the sorrows of the thousands whose fate is wound
up in this impending struggle; what weighs the
present doom of all of us, when balanced in the
scales of Omniscient Benevolence, against the
welfare
of the millions yet unborn, whose destiny hangs
upon the success of our endeavour. God of
Heaven
!
but it is a gallant game, a noble stake we play
for. But those that come after us! will they prize
it when won, will they cherish the glorious guerdon,
and remember the deeds and the men who made it
theirs? Will they love each rood and inch of their
blood-bought patrimony, where every acre that was
sown with the dragon teeth of despotism produced
its hero? Will they too rear a race of men, fit to
be the second crop of a soil so generous? Will the
free-born dames of those days, will the mothers
that tutor themalas! if their mothers were to be
such as thee, Alida, who could doubt their
high-souled
nurture! But the thoughts of the youthful
Greyslaer became less coherent, as they assumed a
softer character, nor need we follow the reflections
Vol. I.I
of the ardent young patriot, as they became merged
in the vague musing of the less sanguine lover.
As the day wore on, and the hour of the
expected
return of the younger De Roos to his father's
house drew nigh, Greyslaer shrunk from witnessing
the harrowing impression which the desolate
household
must make upon his friend. Derrick came
not, however, in the manner that was painfully
anticipated
by those who dreaded the shock of
surprise
that seemed to await him. Ill news flies fast,
and the story of his ruined homestead was soon
spread over the country; and when the young De
Roos, returning from his bootless quest of Brant,
first fell in with his friends and neighbours flocking
to the scene of disaster, he soon learned the dark
story from the agitated females, who were hurrying,
in company with their fathers and brothers, toward
the Hawksnest. Leaving another to take charge
of his own immediate party, the horror-stricken
young man threw himself on a fresh horse that was
proffered by a kinsman, and, striking the spurs into
his flanks, dashed furiously forward.
Where is she? Where are their bodies? he
exclaimed, foaming with impatience as he leaped
from the saddle and rushed into the house, as if
the mad energy of his grief could even yet rekindle
life in the bosoms of the dead.
My son, my son! cried the old man, moving a
step toward Derrick, then tottering, and sinking
helpless into the chair from which he had risen.
My father! screamed the youth, in a wild tone
of delight and grief, most strangely mingled. And
did the wretches then spare your gray hairs; are
all, then, not gone?
All! look there, look there, Derrick! They left
my aged blood to chill in my veins through time, if
horror might not curdle it; but those young pulses
have ceased to beat for ever. And the frame of the
youth trembled like that of a woman as his father
pointed to the narrow cot where, stark and stiff, but
still composed, in the decent attire of a Christian
grave, reposed the remains of Tyntie, his younger
sister. His features were as pale as those of the
corpse as he advanced to its side and raised the
napkin
which covered the face. He started. What,
Tyntie, my poor, my gentle girl! And was thy
delicate thread of life, that might have snapped so
easilyso nearly worn, too, that any moment might
have severed itwas that frail thread thus rudely
riven asunder? He spoke mournfully, but there
was no bitterness in his grief; and nascent hope
and burning anxiety were depicted in his
countenance
as he turned hastily to his father, in a hoarse
and tremulous whisper:
AlidaAlida, my father? His agitation was
too great to utter more.
She was borne off by the villain Brant, unharmed
as we think and trust, said Greyslaer, advancing.
I waited but your arrival, Derrick, to reinforce my
rifles and start in pursuit.
A complete reaction now took place in the
feelings
of the mercurial young De Roos. Rumour,
who flies on magic wings, generally, too, exercises
a magical power in exaggerating the tidings that she
bears. The dismayed youth had heard in the first
instance of the total destruction of his house; indeed,
there had been tales of burnings as well as
massacres
;
and when he rode so furiously homeward, it
was not until he beheld the quiet smoke ascending
from the hall of his infancy that he hoped even to
recover the bodies of his kindred for Christian
burial
.
To find his father living, and Alida, his
favourite
sister, his pride and his delight, still not
numbered
with the dead, wrought such a change in his
mind, that every object around him wore a new
aspect
.
The world, which a few moments before
seemed so drear and gloomy, that the very idea of
drawing out his desolate existence for an hour was
accompanied by that suffocating sense of pain
intolerable
,
that most men, perhaps, have sometimes
knownthe world, the young and half-tried world
around him, seemed now almost as fresh and fair
as ever. With buoyant step he hurried out to meet
his approaching friends, and, as the wagons of the
gathering yeomanry drove into the courtyard, it
would have seemed, from the congratulations that
passed among the females, whom sympathy or
curiosity
had brought to the house of mourning, that
every cause of grief were for the moment
removed
.
All the particulars relating to the last hours of the
young girl, who thus far had been the chief
sufferer
by these events, were now told over and over,
amid frequent exclamations among the females,
while the incidents of the flight were recounted
with not less animation by the men who
participated
in it, as they clustered around some mounted
rangers, who, being among the new-comers, were
now engaged in grooming their horses at the stable.
The fate of the brave fellows who had fallen, and
who, few in number, chanced to be mere
hangers-on
of the community, with no near kindred to
lament
them, was by their acquaintances and
comrades
sincerely deplored. As the evening drew on,
many of the party dispersed, some to seek a supper
and bed with the nearest neighbours, none of whom
dwelt within a mile of the Hawksnest; and others
to seek a berth for the night in the barn or some
other outbuilding, where they might be ready for
attendance upon the funeral on the morrow.
Greyslaer
,
in the mean time, having taken counsel with
the friends of Alida's family, it was agreed that he
and Derrick should leave the care of the ceremonial
to a near kinsman of the latter, while, selecting a
chosen party of followers, they should set out
together
an hour after midnight to follow up the trail
of Brant.
I 2
CHAPTER IX.
DEATH'S DOINGS.
And he looks for the print of the ruffian's feet,
Where he bore the maiden away,
And he darts on the fatal path more fleet,
Than the blast that hurries the vapour and sleet
O'er the wild November day.
Bryant
.
It
was through the lenity of MacDonald, in
releasing
the bonds of his captive the moment he
discovered
her arms were pinioned, that Alida had
succeeded in making her single attempt at escape,
which we have already seen was futile. The
worthy
Scotchman was deeply chagrined at having in
any way participated in the business of the night,
which he deemed affected his character both as an
officer and as a gentleman; and now, while
hurrying
toward the Indian station, he did not hesitate to
express his regret that the lady had not succeeded
in regaining the protection of her friends.
Thayendanagea
seemed in no wise offended with the
bluntness
of his language, as the major denounced in no
measured terms the Indian system of making war
upon women and children, answering only very dryly
that that was a question for the moralist, which he
would be happy to discuss with his friend when
they should be at leisure to talk over the whole
subject of war, with Sir John's chaplain to make a
third party in the discussion. But, Major
MacDonald
,
said he, I could tell you that in regard to
the position of this young lady which entirely
prevents
her case from being included in the question
you have raised.
You have already told me the considerations of
policy which prompted the act; but, Sachem, there
is but one policy which should ever govern gallant
men when the welfare of women is concerned. Our
humane civilization teaches us that war
Is an honourable game, at which the noble and
the far-descended should play with the lavished
lives of their inferiors, the wail of whose desolated
kindred can never reach the ears of the upper
classes, to whom alone the prize of glory in any
event may fall; pardon my interruption, but that,
Major MacDonald, is the real purport of what you
would say. You would shudder at the bare thought
of one of England's high-born dames being torn from
her luxurious home to a prisoner's dungeon; and the
horror of her being tortured at the stake would
darken the recollection of the most brilliant successes
in war. But the wretched children, whom you
doom to grow up in poverty and contempt by
making
them fatherless; the lacerated hearts of
thousands
of widows, whose existence you protract by
your reluctant bounty, after rendering that existence
miserable; these are never remembered to cast a
shade over the tale of a victory. Call you this
humanity
,
which embraces but the welfare of a class
within its mercies? Call you this consideration for
woman, which regards the rank rather than the sex
of the sufferers? The sex? Great Spirit of the
universe! have I not read of your gallantry, your
tender mercies
toward them in the storming of
towns and castles?
I
, an Indian, a
savage
, have
seen your own records, the white man's printed
testimony
to these abominations of his race; but the
breath of life is not in the nostrils of him who has
seen a female insulted by her Iroquois captor.
MacDonald listened to the tirade of the chieftain
without caring to contradict what he said; and, by
way of cutting short the discussion, and changing
the subject to one of a less abstract nature, he
admitted
that if war were an evil, not the least
summary
way of putting an end to it was by the Indian
mode of making all who were interested in its
result
indiscriminate sharers in its horrors. But I
have yet to learn, Sachem, said he, why the
welfare
of this young lady is not involved in the
question
?
Brant smiled grimly, and pointed to a litter of
boughs carried by a couple of Indians, whereon
reposed
the form of Alida, wrapped in his own
mantle
.
Could a father, he said, care more gently
for his own daughter than do I for the Lady Alida?
Could that feeble old man, with his rash,
hot-headed
son, have given her the safe shelter she may
find, in times like these, beneath the roof of
Thayendanagea
?
The devil is unchained, I tell ye,
Major
MacDonald, and there are wild men enough
beside Indians to do his bidding in these parts.
Why, said MacDonald, in a tone of surprise
and pleasure, why did you not hint this to me
before? You spoke but of taking the lady as an
hostage! Had I thought that so generous a concern
prompted
Nay, speak not of generosity. Perhaps, after
allthough her safety is best secured by the actit
was but as an hostage that I did seize my captive.
But I mean her as an hostage to restrain far more
dangerous spirits than the mad-cap De Roos, or the
dreaming enthusiast Greyslaer. There are men
men bearing the commission of the king, who bring
the ferocious nature of outlaws to our cause; men
whom you and I would scorn to act with, save in a
cause so holy; and in the mad dance of devilish
passions
which the convulsion of the times will let loose,
they must be restrained by other powers than those
of official authority. There is one man whobut
this is not the time to speak of him; let us urge
onward
to our destination.
That time never came with Brant, who seemed
to have forgotten the promised solution of his dark
and mysterious language when they arrived at the
Indian station; nor did MacDonald, who soon after
departed with an escort through the woods to
Johnstown
,
understand, till long afterward, the bearing of
what the chieftain said upon events disclosed in the
sequel; and which may be best unfolded in the
regular course of our story, which recurs again to
the scene of our last chapter.
It was about the hour of midnight that the
younger
De Roos, taking Balt to guide him upon the
Indian
track, quietly withdrew to the hillside with his
followers; where, after some ten minutes' impatient
waiting for Greyslaer, they took up their line of
march through the forest without him.
Greyslaer, in the mean time, rising from the
pallet
whereon he had snatched a brief repose,
descended
the staircase, and already had his hand on
the outer door, when a deep moaning in the room
adjacent to the passage arrested his attention. A
feeble light streaming through an aperture showed
that the door was ajar, and, with cautious and
subdued
steps, he hesitated not to enter.
It was the chamber of the dead.
The flickering taper upon the hearth revealed the
figure of an old woman in a gray cloak, whose
attenuated
and sallow features looked still more
ghastly
from the scarlet hood which was thrown back
from her forehead and rested upon her shoulders.
She sat upon a low wicker chair, with one of her
feet upon a footstool, and the other with the toe
stiffly upturned, and the heel resting on the floor,
thrust out so far beyond her dress that its shrivelled
proportions showed like the stark limb of a skeleton.
Her cheek supported upon her bony fingers, with
the closed lids of her sunken eyes, showed that her
vigil had been badly kept; and Greyslaer, pained at
the thought that the remains of the gentle Tyntie
should be left to such a watcher, turned from the
forlorn old crone to the coffin in which the body had
been laid.
It was empty. But, before he could rally his
thoughts to account for a circumstance so
astounding
,
the moaning sounds which had first drawn him
to the chamber again caught his ear. He turned,
and beheld a sight both piteous and awful.
In a shadowy corner of the room, removed as far
as possible from the slumbering guardian of the
dead, sat the venerable father of the murdered
maiden, folding her stiffened corpse in his arms,
and pressing it to his bosom with a tenderness as
passionate as if he thought that the pulses of
parental
affection which beat within could rekindle
those of life in his departed daughter. The shroud,
with its formal drapery, still veiled the lineaments
of her clay-cold form; but the napkin that shielded
her throat, and the fillet or muslin band that covered
the gash in her forehead, while keeping the long
locks smoothly parted beneath it, had escaped from
their place; and the golden tresses, floating loose,
mingled with the gray hair of the old man, as he
madly kissed the frightful wound through which her
gentle spirit had been dismissed to heaven.
The agonized parent, who had thus crept, in the
dead of the night, to hold this awful communion with
his child, seemed wholly unconscious of the
presence
of Greyslaer, who would fain have slunk away
in silence as one who, by unwitting intrusion,
profaned
some hallowed mystery; but his power of
volition
seemed taken away, and he still continued to
stand, in spite of himself, as it were, with eyes
riveted
upon the heart rending spectacle. At length
the mute anguish of the old man found vent in words.
The colour went and came strangely over his ashen
countenance; while his features writhed as if it were
difficult for them to assume the new expression of
malevolent and vindictive feeling they had now for
the first time to wear.
Brant, cruel Brant, cried the wretched parent,
the Godthe Christian's God, whom I aided in
teaching thee to worship, may forgive thee this, but
II never can. A parent's cursethe curse of a
bereaved and stricken heart, be, oh God, upon A
burst of sobs, that for a moment threatened to
suffocate
him, cut short the blasphemous appeal; but
history, in the tragic fate of Brant's own family, has
shown how deeply the malediction wrought in after
years; and the old man, like one startled by a spell
himself had evoked, seemed, with the prophetic eye
of approaching dissolution, to foresee the working
of his curse. He shivered as with a grave-chill;
and, dropping now upon his knees, with the lifeless
face of his daughter upturned upon his bosom,
mutely pleading toward heaven, he essayed in
prayer to beseech a pardon and recall his words.
But his quivering lips refused to syllable a sound.
A sudden and subtile agony seemed on the instant
to travel through his limbs and rack his aged frame;
and then, while unresistingly permitting Greyslaer
to take the body from his arms, he sank unconscious
upon the floor.
Calling the old woman to his aid, Greyslaer, with
the tender care of a mother, lifting the fragile form
of her child in which life still feebly hovers, again
consigned the body to its formal receptacle; and,
while the crone busied herself in readjusting the
grave-clothes of the maiden, he turned to raise her
wretched father from the ground.
But the sorrows of the old man had ceased for
ever; the thread of his feeble existence, protracted
only, as it seemed, beyond the usual length, to be
interwoven at the last with more than usual
misery
,
had snapped beneath the tension of an agonized
spirit. He had been called awayafter a long life
of blameless benevolence and Christian meekness,
he had been mysteriously called away in a moment
of contumacy toward Heaven. He departed,
indeed
,
with a prayer upon his lips, but his
last-uttered
words were those of imprecation. He had been
called, though, by a God of mercy!
It was with a sad heart that Greyslaer, after
climbing the hills to strike the trail of his friends,
succeeded at last in overtaking them after an hour's
rapid walk through the forest; nor, for a long time,
could he find the heart to break to Derrick de Roos
the mournful event which he had just witnessed.
The blow was better received than he had
anticipated
.
The grief of the warm-hearted but mercurial
young man was indeed, in the first instance,
passionate
to a degree that was outrageous; but, as it
found an immediate outlet in wordsfor, in the
madness of his mood, he poured out such a torrent
of curses upon Brant, the author of his sorrows, as
to shock the better-disciplined mind of his friend
the first paroxysm soon passed over. When this
violent burst of emotion had had its way, he
seemed
,
by a versatility of feeling not uncommon in
persons
of his keen but transient susceptibility to the
impression of the moment, to be almost reconciled
to the event. And his words characteristically
betrayed
this condition of his mind. He stood a few
minutes, distracted between the natural wish to
return
and aid in the last obsequies to his father, and
an eager impatience to hurry on to the rescue of his
sister, and, at the same time, strike instant
vengeance
upon the desolator of his household.
Yes, I will proceed, cried he, at last; and
now Alidathe only living object that remains for
my caremust at once be got out of the clutches
of these hell-hounds. Perhaps, too, after all, my
dear Max, it is better that the old man departed as
he did. There will be wild work doing in the
valley
for years to come; and the kind heart of my
father
already bled for the distracted state of the
country
,
as he used to pray that he might never live to
witness the scenes of havoc and of bloodshed that
must soon ensue. Strange! and I used to think it
but an old man's dreaming. Yes, yes, Greyslaer, it
was better that he should be removed at the first
outbreak of the storm, than that those gray hairs
should be left to be still farther bleached by its
peltings
,
and bowed down to the grave at last, without
his ever beholding the bright days to come that you
and I may yet witness.
And, with the wonted buoyancy of his gay and not
wholly unselfish nature, refusing thus to entertain a
grief where regret was unavailingwith the sanguine
hopes of Youth gilding thus quickly the clouds of a
new-sprung sorrow, the young man seemed to
dismiss
the subject for the present, whatever may have
been his after-emotions. Constitutionally reckless
and unreflecting as he was, it would be doing
injustice
to De Roos, however, to say that his step was
as buoyant as before, though he again strode stoutly
forward with his comrades.
Vol. I.K
CHAPTER X.
THE FOREST-TRAIL.
He skims the blue tide in his birchen canoe,
Where the foe in the moonbeam his path may descry;
The ball to its scope may speed rapid and true,
And lost in the wave be thy father's death-cry.
Sands
.
Well
, Squire Dirk. said Balt, breaking a long
silence, and speaking for the first time since the party
had got fairly on the move once more, I mistrust
that your Injun friend there, Teondetha, or whatever
be the chap's name, that you and Capting Greyslaer
are so thick with, I mistrust that he didn't help you
much, arter all, in finding out old Josie. I'll
warrant
me, now, the sarpent's one of Brant's own crew,
sent out to mislead our people. Whereabouts did
the Oneida leave your party?
What! exclaimed Greyslaer; surely
Teondetha
did not desert you. I'll answer with my life
for the fidelity of that Indian.
And so, twenty-four hours since, would I with
mine, said Derrick, sorrowfully. I've known
Teondetha
much longer than you, Max; he was here
at Mr. Kirkland's missionary school while you were
getting your college-training at the east. With our
bows and arrows we used to watch the stone walls
for chipmunks when boys together; often have I
taken off my stocking for him to bag the flying
squirrel, as he climbed to the hollow bough of some
tall chestnut, while I thundered with the back of his
tomahawk upon the decayed trunk below. And in
later years, when he came down to Guy Park with
his tribesmen to receive the government presents,
many a hunt have we had in these woods together.
But one knows not who to trust in times like these;
there's Brant himself was for years my father's
friend, though I never liked the haughty Sachem.
The last words suggested associations so bitter that
the young man was for the moment overcome by
his emotions, and then, regaining his composure, he
resumed, still in a mournful tone: Certain it is,
Greyslaer, that Teondetha separated from us in the
forest, but whether from accident or treachery I am
unable to determine.
Well, a painter is always a painter, an Injun
always an Injun, no how you may tame 'em; and I
don't quarrel much with the crittur because he chose
to sort with his own kind. No man's to be blamed
for sticking to his colour, for that's human natur
through and through, any way you may fix it. I'm
not mad with him for that. I'm only mad with
myself
that I didn't shoot him down jist by accident, as
it might be, afore he got fairly into our councils.
Balt! whispered Greyslaer, in a low but stern
voice, for he did not wish to mortify the faithful
woodsman before his comrades; to me, Balt, and
to our causeto all whom you call your friends, I
believe you to be a good man and true; and, as
such, I would peril my life with you or for you; but,
Indian or white, by the God that made me, if you
ever practise such a piece of treachery upon
breathing
man, you shall die the death at my hands. I
will pistol you upon the spot.
Wh-eu-gh! and what would old Balt care for
that, if, by shooting one of the red devils, he could
save your scalp or squire Dirk's! You're boys, both
on ye, and don't know the natur of an Injun. But
I tell ye, Capting Greyslaer, as I suppose I must
call ye, it isn't fair and comely, it isn't treating me
in a likely manner, to use sich hard words to me,
considerin its only two days gone that I let ye put
down my name on your muster-paper there, as
making
myself a raal sodger under you; I might better
have let the cause go to the devil, or have gone and
taken service in Bradshawe's battalion with wild
Wolfert Valtmeyer, rayther than to be spoken to so
like a dogI might. I almost wish I was shut of
the business of sodgering altogether, if sich talk as
that is to be my wages.
If those are your sentiments, my good fellow,
said Greyslaer, stopping short in his walk, as the
two pursued a path together a little apart from the
rest of the band, if you really wish to side with
the Tories and shed the blood of your countrymen,
I will strike your name off this paper in an instant,
and you have full liberty to go where you please.
And Greyslaer drew the muster-roll of his company
from his bosom, as if about to give his last and most
valuable recruit a fair discharge.
Well, that beats natur; that's raaly the worst
thing, arter all. The boy talks jist as if he could get
along without me. Ah! ye green springald ye! ye
callow fledgling! ye yearling that would gore with
your horns yet in the velvet! ye, with yere
book-larnin
,
yere speechifying, yere marchings and
counter-marchings
,
yere shoulder-firelocks, and yere
right foot, left foot, ye'd make a pretty how-de-do
in times like these, with only sich a mad loon as
Squire Dirk to counsel and guide ye! I tell ye
what, Capting Max Grayslaer, I've holpen your
edication
in some things that may cause ye to make
a figure in sich times as these, with some one to
look after ye; but, though ye want now to get shut
of me, as if I was an old granny of a Yankee
school-master
dogging his urchins in the holydays, I'm dd
if I give ye up till I've seen the eend of ye. Put
that in yere pipe and smoke it, my laddie! and now
go ahead as soon as ye choose, for where
your
trail
is there old Balt will follow.
A hopeful subject I have here for a disciplined
soldier, said Greyslaer, mentally. Amused,
provoked
,
and, at the same time, touched by the petulant
freedom and stanch fidelity of his follower, he
silently
abandoned the altercation, and pocketing the
muster-roll with an emphatic umph! that said
everything to Balt, once more pursued his way with
the doughty hunter.
How do you know, Balt, said he, after they
had walked on for some time in silence, moving
through the forest as nearly as possible in a
parallel
line with the main body of De Roos's band, from
which two corresponding flankers had been thrown
out upon the opposite side, how do you know that
Valtmeyer has taken up arms with the Tories
under
Bradshawe?
How do I know? why I had it from Red
Wolfert
himself only the day before yesterday, when I
left you to go and look after farmer Stickney's tall
sons. Two likely fellows they be, too, those boys,
Syl and Marius Stickney, though Bradshawe has
got 'em clean safe into his following by this time.
What do you mean?
I mean to say that Valtmeyer beat me at
'lectioneering
,
that's all. I could only promise the boys
liberty and equality of human rights if they'd turn
out with our people, as they promised they would
at the last training; but Wolfert promised he'd
burn down their barn if they did, and he carried
the day arter all.
The pitiful scoundrels! exclaimed the young
officer, indignantly.
Yes, capting, seeing as how they promised,
K 2
they ought to have come, if it was to a den of
rattle-snakes
.
But the barn is full of grain, and the old
man had his say, for Wolfert threatened to return
a couple of horses on his hands that he had just
bought with some broad pieces for Bradshawe's
use?
Do you think that Valtmeyer would really have
burned the barn?
Sarting!
and mayhap the housen too. He hates
a white man like pisin, and has jined Bradshawe
jist to work out his grudge agin his own kind and
colour.
He
burn a farmer's barn? I'd like to see
the day of the week when Red Wolfert Valtmeyer
wouldn't like a pretence for doing of that.
And does Valtmeyer think that these two
Stickneys
will keep their faith more truly with his
people
than they have with ours? said Greyslaer, not
incuriously.
Sarting they will, replied Balt, shaking his
head. I never knew a Connecticut chap yet but
what stuck to his bargain when it was once made
clean out and out; the snarl of the thing is to find
out what they consider a raal bargain complete.
I rayther mistrust it's only when they put their
names right down in black and white upon paper.
Wolfert, I know, made them do this, he seemed so
tarnal sure of his men for ever and aye. But here
we are at Damond's run, and the squire had better
order a halt, as we must be within half a mile of the
Fish-House clearing.
In the moment that Balt spoke, a faint signal
from the extreme right, which was repeated by De
Roos from the centre, reached the ears of
Greyslaer
and the flankers at once; closing in, the whole
party united upon the banks of the rivulet, at a
point where it first commenced its descent from
the upland. Taking his orders now from De Roos,
for Greyslaer was only acting as a volunteer upon
the expedition, Balt ascended a tall hemlock to
reconnoitre
the point to which they were approaching,
and where it was presumed that Brant lay with his
followers.
How many fires do they count? cried De Roos
from the root of the tree.
Fires? Devil the one! muttered the scout, in a
tone of sullen surprise and chagrin. A fool's
errand
we've come upon. They've shut themselves
up in a block-house and stockade upon the banks
of the river, and our night's bizness is done for.
Can we not decoy them from their defences?
asked Greyslaer, anxiously; it would be madness
to assault their palisades without artillery, and it
would be folly to wait until cannon can be
transported
through woods like these we have traversed
to-night.
Easy enough to get some of the critters out,
and pepper 'em for the fun of it, said Balt; but
that wouldn't help us in retaking Miss Alida. By
the etarnal thunder! but there's some of the
varmint
now, pushing off in a canoe to gig trout or
examine a fish-wier, I don't know which; but I see
by the light of the pine knots in the bow that they
push along mighty slow, as if looking for
something
at the bottom of the stream. I have it, I have
it, capting; I have it, squire; and, as if some rare
device had struck him on the instant, Balt
straightway
descended the tree. We can captivate those
chaps complete, I tell ye, if they only move a little
further down stream, where yon woody mound
shoulders the current. I know the ground here all
to pieces. Those maples, whose round tops are
just now slicked up by the moon, cover a thick
undergrowth
that will conceal us in creeping along
the shore, and we can cut off the Injuns from the
fort as soon as they turn the pint.
Ay, but how do you know they will turn the
point? said Greyslaer, who, standing upon a rock
round which the runnel gurgled, looked down the
defile through which it travelled to the river, and
caught a glimpse of the moonlit landscape below.
Leave that to me, if chance don't fix it,
replied
the woodsman; and now, Squire Dirk, as you
command here to-night, jist let old Balt order the
position of all of us before we move farther.
If you knew the ground, as you say you do,
Balt, you are the proper person to guide us in our
operations. I give you full power to act, if you
will only secure me a chance of trying my yger
upon the miscreants.
Well, well, that shall be cared for, only don't
be too headysome, or you'll spile all. I want to
take the Redskins alive, and get some tidings about
Miss Alida; and, if one be a chief, we may
exchange
him. We must divide into three parties to
make sure of our object; I want five of our stoutest
men to creep with me to the water's side, to the
bend south of the mound, where we must secure the
canoe-men, if anywhere. You, squire, must throw
yourself, with the strength of the party, to the north
side, so as to cut off the Injuns from the fort with
your rifles if they escape from our hands and
attempt
to return to it. Capting, I'm sorry I cannot
give you more lively work at the outset; but, if the
thing comes to a fight, you will have a sodger's
share of it where I'm going to place you. We must
trust to your spunk and headwork in getting us out
of the scrape if my plan fails; and you must take a
position, with half a dozen men, where you can see
what's going on, and bring us off safely if the
worst come to the worst; and if the fire of Squire
Dirk's party draws a sally from the fort, we shall
see hot work, I tell ye. There's a ledge of bald
rock to the left yonder, that puts out from the ridge
we are on, about a hundred yards from this. That
cliff commands the whole valley below, and there
is a deer runway leading up from the water-side to
its base. That way lies our retreat. A half hour
hence the moon will touch the cliff, whose edge is
still in deep shadow from the hemlock thicket that
covers it; so you must gain it at onct, and lie there
close as a hunted opossum to a gray log. If we
are pursued, you, capting, know as well as I do
what follows; we'll
You will lure the chase to the base of the rock,
make a detour to my rear, and leave me to deal
with the rascals in front. Exactly, Balt; I
comprehend
your plan completely; and its details are
worthy
of a veteran partisan.
I don't know what sort of a chap that may be;
but if it mean an old bushfighter, there's no man in
all Tryon county, not even Red Wolfert himself,
but must knock under to old Balt in expayrience.
And, with this harmless ebullition of vanity on the
part of the woodsman, the council of war was
broken
up. The party was divided agreeably to his
suggestions, and the three bands immediately
afterward
separated, and sped with silent haste to their
different destinations. Greyslaer, having but a short
distance to move with his handful of followers, soon
gained the position indicated by Balt; and
throwing
himself upon the ground, with his feet hanging
over the rocky ledge, he cast a thoughtful eye over
the sleeping landscape below.
The moon was in her last quarter, but the
atmosphere
was so clear that her waning beams
lighted up the scene with a splendour that is rarely
witnessed in other climes. The Sacondaga, which
near this region, at the present day, winds through
green meadows grazed by a thousand cattle, was,
at the time of which we write, thickly wooded
along its banks. The luxuriant foliage of primeval
forests impended in billowy masses over the
devious
water, which only showed to view in shining
intervals, like the broken links of a silver chain.
A few cleared acres only, around the Indian
stockade
,
let the moonlight down more broadly upon the
stream, where the burned and blackened stumps
stood grimly marshalled along the water's edge, like
the dwarfish opponents of the girdled trees, whose
tall, stark stems, and jagged and verdureless array,
bounded the opposite sides of the clearing. The
stockade itself lay a deformed and shapeless mass
of logs in the midst of this desolate area; and the
eyes of Greyslaer, as he watched the twinkling
lights which ever and anon revealed the floating
canoe upon the river, reverted continually to this
sullen den, in which he thought Alida was immured.
He imaged to himself the lady of his love as
looking
out with the cheerless spirit of a captive upon
the few dreary acres of the Indian clearing, which
could alone meet her eye from her forest-walled
prison-yard; he thought of her love of nature and
exquisite taste in rural refinement, as seeking
vainly
for solace in that circumscribed, uncouth, and
mutilated landscape; and then he thoughtso idly
does the mind wander in such a moodhe thought,
reverting to the white man's improvements,
characterized
by similar features to those of the scene
before him, he thought whether utility could not in
any way work out her ends, by some less
unsightly
and devastating process than the ordinary one of
clearing a new country.
And must the prodigal soul of man, too, said
he, mentally, must the primal freshness of all
things earthly be thus wastefully converted to their
final ends? Must the soil of virgin nature be thus
encumbered with the wreck of its beauty, thus
enriched
with its own blasted luxuriance, turning
again to earth, ere it gather strength to bear things
that are truly precious? Must the wild heart of
youth, redolent of hope and high affections, moving
with each generous impulse like this plumy forest
to the breeze, must it also give up its first noble,
natural growth of feelings, and become barren and
desolate, like yon blackened clearing, before, like
that, it can bear fruits fit for the best purposes of
social being? * * * The wild Indian, too! Is he
subject to the same mysterious law, or has Nature
a different dispensation for her own immediate
children
?
Doth
age
alone ripen his mind, and by
gradual and kindly means steal from him the pledges
of life's morning promise, and lead him to an
inviting
grave with youth, all glorious, eternal youth,
still glowing beyond its portals? or doth he too, like
us, grow old before his time, with faculties
quickened
by suffering and matured by pain? Doth he,
bewildered by conflicting passions like ours, and
misled by stumbling reason, chase the phantom
Hope where'er she leads? or doth rather a narrow
but subtle instinct deter him from the vain pursuit,
or guide him with unerring finger to fruition?
But what boots this vain dreaming? cried he,
interrupting himself impatiently, as a cloud, at that
moment obscuring the moon, snatched the scene
which had awakened these reflections from his
view. What matters it that our scheme of
existence
should be as vain and uncertain as the
landscape
that but now glimmered below me, when
death, like yon cloud, may come at any moment
and obscure it for ever!
As the last thought passed through the mind of
Greyslaer, and even before language could have
given it shape and utterance, it seemed as if the
chilling image of death had but presented itself as
the precursor of the reality. A sharp, stunning blow,
that came with such force, glancing along his ribs,
as to turn his body completely round, drew a sudden
exclamation of pain and surprise from him. Hah!
God of Heaven, what's that! he cried, clapping
his hand to the wound as he rolled over upon the
rock, struggling to gain his feet. But the effort
was vain. He became dizzy on the moment. He
tried to shout to his comrades, but the voice seemed
drowned in other sounds. A fearful yell, that rung
confusedly in his ears, like the spirit call from
another
world, swallowed up the feeble cry. But still
he seemed not dead, for a strange sensation, like
that of falling into a fathomless depth, yet called
out the exercise of volition. His hands groped
about as if clutching at something to hold on by,
and then he lay in utter unconsciousness, with the
cold moonlight streaming on his motionless form.
CHAPTER XI.
THE HUNTERS' AMBUSCADE.
Again upon the grass they droop,
When burst the well-known whoop on whoop;
And bounding from the ambush'd gloom,
Like wolves the savage warriors come.
Street
.
The
plans of the hunter Balt, when he was
permitted
to arrange the movements of his party for
the night, were well laid in every respect save
one; the omission, on the part of De Roos and his
forest counsellor, to keep up a communication with
Greyslaer, either by messengers or signals, to be
available in case they met with any obstacle to the
consummation of their design. The unfortunate
issue
of the ambuscade was mainly attributable to
this oversight. The attempt, they argued, must
either be fully successful, when we shall rejoin our
comrades without molestation, or, if we are
interrupted
by a sally from the fort or other untoward
occurrence, the report of our firearms will soon
show Greyslaer how things are going. In guerilla
warfare, however, so much often depends upon an
instantaneous change of the mode in which you
would effect your design when carrying any given
piece of stratagie into execution, that the most
perfect
concert of action should be observed if you
would avail yourself of their flexile councils
without
endangering your brother partisans.
The two parties, led severally by Balt and De
Roos, gaining the bottom of the hill upon which
Vol. I.L
they had left the ill-starred Greyslaer, separated
near the base of the promontory before described,
and betook themselves to their appointed stations.
De Roos posted himself, with his men, in a swamp
that friuged a little bay a few hundred yards below
the Indian stockade, from which it was divided by
the river, which was here about a rifle-shot in
breadth. The promontory extended out into the
stream upon his right, and the canoe, which was
the object of attack, was just turning this headland
as he reached his position, and might be said to be
thus already cut off from the fort had he dared to fire
upon her. But Balt, who gained the shore, amid
tangled vines and thickets of elder, upon the lower
side of the promontory, awaited there his opportunity
to seize the fishermen in a more peaceable manner.
Placing his followers in a copse near the mouth
of the brook already mentioned, he proceeded
cautiously
to a clump of chestnuts near, and selecting
one fit for his purpose, he cut off a stick about two
feet in length from a green sapling, and, after rolling
it between his palms for a few moments, succeeded
in drawing out the woody part from its bark casing,
forming thus from the latter a hollow tube, which
might answer the purpose of a speaking-trumpet.
Placing one end of this to his mouth, and bending
his body so as to bring the other within an inch of
the ground, and partly to smother the sound he
intended
to produce from the instrument, he drew
from it a deep discordant noise, not unlike the
distant
roaring of a bull. The call almost immediately
brought a reply, both from the hill-side and from the
water. From the hills it came back in a wild
bellowing
,
that was evidently that of a real animal
answering
a beast of its own kind. Upon the water it
was replied to by the Indians, who, equally deceived
by sounds that seemed to indicate their vicinity to a
moose-deer buck, or bull moose as our hunters call
it, attempted, by putting their closed fists to their
mouths, to mimic the cry and lure the animal to the
water-side, where the torches in the bow of the
shallop would enable them to fix the buck at gaze,
and to approach sufficiently near to destroy him
with their fishing-spears.
Guiding their birchen vessel now into an eddy
of the stream by a scarcely perceptible motion of
the paddle, they approached with care the spot
where Balt and his comrades lay. But the next
moment, exchanging some words with each other
in a low tone, which made them inaudible to those
on shore, the steersman gave a flirt of his paddle,
and the light bark swung round again to the centre
of the stream. Here the Indians paused, as if
listening
intently; and the wary Balt, fearing, now that
their attention was fully awakened, to repeat the
same lure, which might fail to deceive them when
so near, resorted to another less easy of detection.
He took a cup from his hunting-pouch, and,
stooping
down to the brook, dipped up the water and let
it fall again into the current, to imitate the plashing
footsteps of an animal stalking along the bed of the
stream. The Indians had drawn out toward the
channel of the river, in order to give the supposed
moose a wide berth between themselves and the
shore, where, as he waded out to lave his flanks,
according
to the custom of the animal at this season,
they would hold him to advantage in the deep
water
.
But as the plashing sounds which they had
just heard grew fainter, as if the moose were
retiring
from the river side, they abandoned this
expectation
,
and, mimicking his bellowing cry once more,
they gave the canoe a direction toward the cove,
and glided silently into the mouth of the brook.
Their glaring torches shone double upon its shallow
and pebbly bottom, and lighted up the overhanging
thicket with a ruddy glare.
Captur, but slay not! cried Balt, leaping into
the frail shallop with a force that drove his feet
through the flimsy bottom and anchored it to the
spot, at the same moment that an Indian in the bow
was vainly attempting, with his long spear, to push
back into the parent stream. A blow from the
hatchet
of the woodsman snapped the shaft, leaving the
barbed end quivering in the bank, and the other a
harmless weapon in the hands of the Indian, who
was instantly secured by his opponent. Not so,
however, with his two comrades; one of those, who
held the steering-paddle, threw himself backward
over the stern, floundered with mad desperation
through the shallow water, and, diving like a duck
the moment he attained that deep enough for
swimming
,
struck out for the opposite side of the river,
which he gained in safety. The remaining Indian
was not less successful in his attempt to escape.
This man, a warrior of powerful frame and great
prowess, deeming himself surrounded, leaped from
the canoe at the first alarm, and charged into the
midst of his enemies; grasping his fishing-spear by
the middle, so as, at the same time, to protect his
person and prevent the long shaft from becoming
entangled in the underwood, he levelled a yeoman
with a blow from either end at the first onset, and,
seizing a rifle from one of the men as they fell,
bounded off, unharmed, into the forest.
Old Josey himself, by the Etarnal! there's no
Injun breathing but he could have done that, cried
Balt; we have let the head-devil of them all, boys,
slip through our fingers, and we shall have the hull
kennel of hell-hounds let loose upon us in an instant.
We must lose no time in crossing from these parts,
or our scalps will fly off like thistle-down; we must
make a divarsion, too, or we'll lose our prisoner.
And, binding the hands of his only captive with a
tendril of grapevine, the hunter hastily consigned him
to the care of his comrades, and told them to move
down along the banks of the river as rapidly as
possible
,
without attempting to regain the place first
designated as a rendezvous. With these hurried
directions, Balt sprang forward to give in person the
necessary warning to De Roos, whom he met
midway
,
hurrying with his men to join him.
Turn, Balt, turn, or the dogs will be on our trail
in a moment; I've seen a dripping savage emerge
like a musquash from the water on the opposite
side, where a dozen canoes are drawn up before the
station, and we must put the rapids between them
and our party as quickly as possible.
What, risk our only prisoner, squire? when I've
sent my men that way with him, hoping that we
could lead off the pursuit toward the cliff, where
the capting awaits us.
It will never do, said De Roos, still keeping
his party in motion; Greyslaer will get sufficient
warning to retire in time, seeing the movements
around the fort; and as for our joining him, it is too
late. My men have already seen one armed Indian
skulking between them and the hill, and we may
be at this moment surrounded by a hundred.
As these words passed hurriedly between the
commander of the expedition and his unlucky
adviser
,
Balt, who had for the moment allowed his course
to be turned, and himself borne along with the rapid
march of his comrades, stopped short, exclaiming,
On, then; on, Squire Dirk; you may have
changed
our plans for the better, and the capting,
mayhap
,
would consider your retreat sodger-like, seeing
so many lives are at stake; but I cannot leave him
I 2
to take his chance of first hearing of it from the
Injuns
themselves.
With these words, only the first of which were
heard by De Roos, Balt broke away from his
comrades
,
and ran back until he reached the brook which
the retreating party had crossed a few moments
before
;
turning then, and following up its current as
the readiest highway that offered, amid the heavy
forests through whose glooms its course
occasionally
made an opening toward the moonlit sky.
Tarnal crittur! she's hid her vixen face, he
exclaimed
,
as, looking upward through one of these
openings, he saw that the planet was obscured.
Shine out, old lily-white, shine out, for shame,
upon the Redskins, or they'll cross the river and be
upon the capting afore I can stir his kiver.
The prayer of the woodsman was quickly
answered
.
The moon, indeed, shone out but too soon, for
the sharp crack of a rifle, followed by the
war-whoop
,
and answered by a brief and irregular
discharge
of firearms, showed that her reappearance,
instead of being the harbinger of safety, had been
but the signal for onslaught. Rushing forward, the
hunter gained the top of the hilly ridge whereon he
had left Greyslaer, and was moving with hasty but
cautious steps toward the shelf of rocks where that
luckless officer had taken post with his party.
The capting, the capting, what have ye done
with the capting? cried Balt, as he met Greyslaer's
men in full flight from the spot.
Run, Balt; for your life, run; it is all up with
Captain Max! a rifle from the woods, below the cliff,
picked him off the very moment the moon got high
enough to bring his body out of shadow. The woods
are alive with Redskins, and our legs must save us
now if we would live to avenge him.
An incessant whooping, that each moment came
nearer and nearer, seemed to prove the truth of what
the man said; and with a light heel but a heavy
heart, the sorrowing woodsman turned and fled with
the rest; muttering imprecations on himself the
while for having left for a moment, amid such
scenes, his commander, friend, and proteg.
De Roos, in the mean time, hurrying along with
his prisoner, followed the course of the Sacondaga,
which here runs in a northeast direction for a few
miles, and then, leaving it abruptly, struck due south,
making for the nearest settlements upon the
Mohawk
.
The approach of morning found his party
in the neighbourhood of Galway; and crossing the
highway, or trail as it might rather be called at that
day, between Saratoga and Johnstown, he made a
sweep to the south of the latter place, and, striking
due west, passed Stone Arabia, famous afterward
for the gallant fight and subsequent slaughter of the
brave Colonel Brown and his regiment, reached the
Mohawk at Keeder's Rifts, equally noted in the
border-story of after years. The retreat,
considering
that De Roos had not only to escape from his
Indian foes in the first instance, but that he carried
his prisoner through a district, the great portion of
whose scattered inhabitants were as yet either
luke-warm
patriots or zealous adherents of the Johnson
party, was creditable to his address as a partisan.
Worn down with fatigue and long watching,
Derrick and his companions were rejoiced to find
shelter and refreshment in the hospitable mansion
of Major Jelles Fonda, a faithful officer and
confidential
friend of the father of Sir John Johnson, but
who, having now sided with the patriot party, was
exposed to the vengeance of the royalists, which
was afterward so terribly wreaked upon his
household
by the devastating hand of the stern and
inexorable
son of his friend.
The Mohawk captive, during the route, had borne
himself with dogged indifference to his fate,
obstinately
refusing to answer any of the questions with
which De Roos, who spoke his language, plied him,
whenever occasion offered, during a brief halt of his
party. Refreshments were now placed before him,
but he refused to partake of them, replying only to
the repeated invitations of his captors by glancing,
with a look of mute indignation, from their faces to
the bonds by which his right arm was still pinioned,
the left having been temporarily released to enable
him to feed himself. This silent appeal, however,
produced no effect upon his wary captors.
If the scoundrel is too proud to help himself
with one hand, let us see if fasting wo'n't bring
humility
with it, said one.
The cunning cat! he only wants to get his claws
free to use them, cried another; but he can't come
the mouser over us with his mock dignity.
De Roos, who had been looking at the
accommodations
of his party for the night, at this moment
entered the room, and ordered a guard of three men
to repair with the prisoner to the kitchen, which was
assigned them as their quarters. He at the same
time handed the Indian a blanket, wherewith one
of the females of the family had provided him, and,
for the first time since his capture, a gleam of
pleasure
shot athwart the dusky features of the Mohawk
as he stretched out his left hand to receive the boon.
Indeed, he folded it about his person with as much
care as if he took pride as well as comfort in his
new acquisition; nor had he completely adjusted its
folds to his satisfaction, before a corner of his new
mantle had more than once swept the edge of the
table, as he brushed along its sides, while making
his way out of the apartment.
The kitchen was not entirely vacant when the
prisoner and his guard reached their quarters. For,
besides several negro slaves, which at that time
formed
an essential part of the household of every
opulent
farmer in the country, there sat in the
chimney-corner
a shabby-looking wayfarer, who, in those
days of infrequent inns and open hospitality, had
been allowed a stall for his horse and a shelter for
himself during the night.
The dress of this man, which was a sort of greasy
doublet, or fustian shooting-jacket, of dingy olive,
with breeches of the same; shoes without buckles,
and a broad-leaved chip hat, having a broken pipe
stuck beneath the band, marked him sufficiently as
belonging to the lower order of society. For, while
among our wise fathers a man's apparel was always
thought more or less to indicate his social position,
a traveller's especially, who presumed to take the
saddle without being either booted or spurred, would
be set down as near akin to a beggar, who had his
horse only for some chance hour. Some, however,
beneath the neglected beard and generally sordid
appearance of this wayfaring horseman, might have
detected features which, if not those of a true
cavalier
,
belonged at least to the class which was then
generally supposed exclusively to furnish such a
character. The man's look was sinister, if not
decidedly
bad; but there was a degree of haughtiness
mingled with his duplicity of expression, and the
intelligent
and assured air of his countenance was far
above the rank which his coarse habiliments would
indicate. He started as the Indian entered the
apartment; and as the name Au-neh-yesh!
escaped
his lips, the emotion seemed for the instant
to be sympathetic with the prisoner. It was so
slight, however, upon the part of the Mohawk as
not to attract observation. He moved at once
toward
the kitchen fire, and, though it was a
summer's
night, threw himself on the floor with his feet
toward the ashes, and, covering up his head in his
blanket, seemed soon to be forgetting the cares of
captivity in soothing slumber.
Two of the men to whose custody the prisoner
had been consigned soon afterward imitated his
example
,
and stretched themselves upon a flock-bed
in a corner of the apartment, while the third paced
up and down the room, to keep himself awake while
acting as sentinel over the prisoner. The slaves,
with the exception of a single old negro, had all
slunk away, one could hardly tell how; and this
worthy, with the sinister-looking traveller, were left
as the only waking companions of the sentinel. The
traveller, too, at last, after ruminating in a drowsy
fashion for some time, expressed his intention of
seeking a bed in the haymow, and, procuring a
stable-lantern
from the negro to look after his horse in
the first instance, withdrew from the apartment. In
passing through the door, he fixed his eyes earnestly
upon the sleeping Indian, and his face being thus
averted from the passage-way, he stumbled
awkwardly
,
so as to make his tin lantern clang against
the lintel so sharply as to startle both the sentry
and his prisoner, though the slight movement which
the latter made beneath his blanket was not
observed
by the soldier, who turned to close the door
behind
the retreating traveller.
What tink you of dat trabeller-man, massa?
said the old negro, with a knowing look, as soon as
he heard the outer door closed after the other.
Think of him? why I don't think of him at all,
Cuff; that sleeping hound by the fire is enough for
me to trouble myself about, after trampoosing for
twenty-four hours on a stretch, with not even a
loon's nap at the eend of it.
Trabeller-man hab mighty fine hoss, massa!
Him look as like as two peas to de hoss dat Wolf
Valtmeyer bought last week for Massa Bradshawe,
and drew to here, mighty like dat same hoss,
massa.
Well, what of that? you don't take the chap for
a horse-thief, do you? He's more like some
travelling
cobbler, that's going his circuit through the
settlements.
He be bery like a cobbler, certing, said the
complaisant negro; and then, after musing a few
moments, added, He be bery like lawyer Wat
Bradshawe too, massa.
I never saw that rip, Cuff, though, if the
traveller
has heard as much of him as I have, he wouldn't
be beholden to you for discovering the likeness.
Lawyer Wat has shaked hands wid de debbil,
certing! said the negro, shaking his head
mysteriously
.
Why do you say that, Cuff?
'Cause he no fear de debbil.
Why, what the devil do you know about him,
you old curmudgeon?
Hab not old black Violet told me of his doings
long ago, when he was but a boy? Let Cuff alone
to find out de secret; he know all about Massa
Bradshawe, and he know how to keep de secret too.
Now, Cuff, said the soldier, stopping short in
the middle of the room, you see that Injun there!
Well, he's a raal Injun juggler, and, unless you tell
me instantly your secret, as you call it, I'll stir up
that fellow with the butt end of my rifle, and he
shall fill this room with fiery sarpents in a moment.
The poor superstitious negro recoiled with
horror
at this alarming threat. He had all the awe of
his race for the red man, who, having never been
reduced to subservience by the white, is
regarded
by the docile African partly as a wayward,
wicked, and disobedient child, who refuses to be
guided by those who have a natural right to
authority
,
and partly as a hybrid, heathenish mortal, in
whose paternity the devil has so large a share that
the Indian is unfitted to take a part in the ordinary
lot of mankind.
Why you see, massa, said he, beginning at
once, with trembling lips, to tell his story, it was
when old Dinah, the black witch, that perhaps you
have heerd tell on, was living. She used
sometimes
,
of a winter's night, to be let in at de house of
Massa Walter's papa, where she slept by de
kitchen
fire, but always went up de chimbley on a
broom-stick
before de morning. Violet herself sayand
Violet live at de house for many yearsViolet say
she often let Dinah in, but she nebber in her life
see her go out, 'cept one morning, and den she went
out a corpse; and she die wid pains and aches, oh
horrible! so Violet say
The devil take Violet; out with your story;
what had Wat Bradshawe to do with the business?
cried the impatient soldier, thinking matter might
be forthcoming from this kitchen gossip that would
reward him by adding something worth repeating
to the many strange stories that were told of
Bradshawe
throughout the country.
What Massa Walter do? exclaimed the
negro
,
lowering his voice; why, who but he dat
kill de old woman! Massa Wat, he watch Dinah
go up de chimbley, he see dat de black witch
always
slip off her skin, and hang it up behind de
pantry-door before she go up. So he watch him
chance, like a mad boy he was; he go to de
dresser
,
take de casters, put pepper, mustard, and plenty
salt on de skin; him chuckle, laugh, say `he make
de
debbil
ob de old woman.' Well, de witch come
back, slip into her skin, she kick, she holler, she
fall down in fit, and so she die, and dat de end ob
Missy Dinah.
Whyyoutarnaloldblackfool! said
the soldier, with a ludicrously indignant expression
of baffled curiosity. Youyouyou jackass
you. I've more than a mind to stir up this Injun
juggler, to show what raal deviltry is, Cuff, for
making
me listen to such heathen stuff as that.
As the soldier spoke, he advanced so near to the
sleeping Mohawk as to strike him with his foot
while heedlessly throwing it out to annoy the
apprehensive
negro. He had better have alarmed a
coiled rattlesnake. For a knife, as deadly as the
fangs of a serpent, was the next moment plunged
in his bosom as the captive leaped upon him. A
window was thrown wide open by some unseen
hand in the same moment. The negro stood
speechless
with horror; and, before the slumbering
comrades
of the unfortunate sentinel could rouse to
avenge him, his scalp was filched from his head
by the carving-knife which the Indian had secured
beneath his blanket while brushing past the
supper-table
.
He shook his gory trophy in the affrighted
eyes of his half-awakened foemen, and bounded
like a deer through the window.
In the morning there were no traces to be found
either of the young savage or the
suspicious-looking
itinerant.
Vol. I.M
CHAPTER XII.
THE INDIAN LEECH.
Thus error's monstrous shapes from earth are driven;
They fade, they flybut truth survives their flight;
Earth has no shades to quench that beam of heaven;
Each ray that shone, in early time, to light
The faltering footsteps in the path of right,
Each gleam of clearer brightness, shed to aid
In man's maturer day his bolder sight,
All blended, like the rainbow's radiant braid,
Pour yet, and still shall pouz, the blaze that cannot fade.
Bryant
.
The
wound of Greyslaer had been given
precisely
in the manner described by the panic-struck
fugitive, though both he and De Roos were
mistaken
in thinking that their party was surrounded. A
large body of Indians had indeed crossed the river,
under the shelter of the cape or headland, during
the few moments that the moon was obscured; but
this was after De Roos was in full retreat: and the
skulking savage who had so alarmed his
followers
,
as well as the sharpshooter who had
subsequently
picked off Greyslaer, and struck a panic into his
party in turn, was no other than the single
desperado
who had so gallantly achieved his escape from
the canoe. This formidable warriorfor, as Balt
surmised, it was no other than old Josey, or
Thayendanagea himselfwas aided by fortune, not
less than by his own address, in escaping the
perils
of the night. Foiling by his prowess the
ambushed
foes that attempted to seize him, he had, in
the first instance, after breaking from their hands,
struck directly across the neck of the promontory
as the shortest way to the station. He had nearly
gained the little bay on this side, where he would
take the water to swim to the opposite shore, when,
discovering the position of De Roos's band by
hearing some of the outlyers whispering together,
he made a detour to turn their flank. The gleam
of his rifle soon after betrayed his vicinity to them,
as was indicated by a movement of alarm among
them; and, perceiving that he was observed, he
widened his circuit by striking inland toward the
hill. This route brought him immediately
beneath
the projecting ledge whereon Greyslaer was
reclining. Deeming himself now surrounded by
foes, the chieftain thought that it only remained for
him to fight his way through them as best he might;
and when the moon, after being a few moments
obscured by a cloud, shone out, bringing the form
of Greyslaer above him in clear relief against the
sky, Brant discharged his piece and raised the
war-whoop. His fire was returned with a volley
from the bushes, where the whites lay within a few
yards of their officer; but their shot were thrown
away, for the darkness that reigned below the cliff
prevented them from taking aim at their unseen
assailant. The single war-whoop of Brant was the
next moment echoed back by a tumultuous yell
from the nearer side of the river, and the dismayed
borderers, hearing no order from their insensible
leader, concluded that he was slain, and sought their
own safety in instant flight.
The darkness of the woods rendered pursuit
ineffectual
.
The forest rung for a while with the
impatient
yells of an Indian chase, and then, before
an hour had passed away, the lonely whoop of some
solitary savage, hailing his comrades after a
reluctant
and disappointed return, was all that met the
ear These last sounds, had Greyslaer had
sufficient
consciousness to comprehend them, would
have told him of the safety of his friends, however
precarious might be his own. The wounded
officer
,
upon reviving from his swoon, found himself
stretched upon a pile of skins in an Indian wigwam,
with a noble-looking Mohawk, a man of majestic
figure and commanding aspect, standing near, with
eyes bent keenly upon his own. Greyslaer made
a movement as if to lift one of his hands, and was
about to speak, but the Medicine-manfor such the
Indian seemed by the talisman which he wore
around his neck, as well as other emblems and
equipments of the aboriginal leech, or conjuror's
trade, that marked his appearancemotioned the
youth to remain silent and quiet. The sage then,
baring the wound by stripping off some moss or
lichen with which the blood had been temporarily
stanched, proceeded to dress it. This he did, with
the assistance of a withered old squaw, who stood
by, holding the various preparations in her hands,
while ever and anon she bowed reverently to the
muttered charm of the operator. When this part of
his medical treatment was carefully completed, the
magician administered a draught with the same
solemn
and superstitious ceremonial; and his patient
soon after slept.
The slumberg of Greyslaer must have been long
and refreshing, for he found himself so much
revived
upon awaking as to feel a disposition to rise.
But upon the first indication of such an intention,
his ears were saluted by a shrill and discordant cry
from the old squaw, who sat crouched among the
ashes, watching a brazen kettle, into which from
time to time she cast certain roots and herbs,
muttering
some gibberish to herself the while. Her
call was answered from without by a gruff umph,
as of some voice chiding her shrewish cry; and
straightway the mat which formed the only door of
the lodge was raised, and the benignant features of
the Medicine-man were seen at the entrance. He
advanced to the couch of Greyslaer, and placing
his hand upon the forehead of his patient, while he
gazed upon him thoughtfully for some moments,
seemed to be at length thoroughly satisfied with the
results of his treatment thus far, for straightway he
began to engage him in conversation, speaking
English at the same time with an ease and fluency
that astonished the soldier-student.
The Spirit
hath not yet need of thee in
another
land, young man.
He
leaves thee here yet
a while, to repent of thy wickedness in aiding to
drive his red children from their country.
I
drive them? I love the Indians! said
Greyslaer
,
with spirit. It is only those who make
themselves the slaves of a foreign king, to aid in
enchaining my countrymen. It is only the
murderous
Brant and his renegade crew upon whom I
would make war.
Darest thou, young man, speak thus of the great
Thayendanagea? and yet it fits thy presumptuous
years to pass in judgment upon the deeds of a
sachem
who hath sat in council with the wisest of thy
race.
The
great
Thayendanagea! scornfully
repeated
Max. A presumptuous half-breed! whose
demi-barbarous vanity has been tickled by sharing
in the mummery of European courts. A
degenerate
hound, that has exchanged the noble instincts
of his forest training for the dainty tricks of a
parlour-bred
spaniel.
He
sit in council! the poor tool
of profligate Tory partisans, who will use him to
enslave his people when they have destroyed mine.
The eyes of the Medicine-man shot fire as
Greyslaer, feverish perhaps from his wound, spoke
M 2
thus intemperately of Brant, whose doubtful Indian
origin did not commend him to the romantic
student
,
and whose clerkly employment as secretary of
Guy Johnson had not raised him in the eyes of the
aspiring young soldier; while recent events made
Max regard him as a crafty, cruel, semi-civilized
barbarian, who brought the name of Mohawk
into abhorrence and contempt. Greyslaer had his
eyes fixed upon the rafters above him while thus
warmly and disdainfully inveighing against the
captor
of Alida, and he did not, therefore, observe the
agitated movement with which the Medicine-man
carried his hand to the knife which he wore in his
girdle, though, from the excitement under which
he spoke, it is doubtful if even such observation
would have restrained his heated expressions.
The magician took two or three turns through
the narrow apartment before he trusted himself to
reply, which he did at last with calmness and
dignity
.
Young man, you speak falsely, though
probably
unknowingly, in calling Joseph Brant a
half-breed
;
and, were you not intrusted by him to my
care, you should die on this ground for so vile a
slander. Thayendanagea is a Mohawk of the full
blood. And if any gainsay this truth, Brant, much
as he holds your European usages to scorn, willI
take it upon myself to saymeet any rebel officer
of his own rank in private quarrel, after the foolish
fashion of the whites. For the rest and here
a strange and undefinable expression of emotion
passed over the swarthy features of the speaker,
who seemed to hesitate for words to express his
mingled feelingsfor the rest, the Sachem would,
I know, forgive you for the love you seem to bear
his race; and it may be true that he has done ill
in linking the fortunes of his tribe with those of
either party of the whites. The carrion birds might
have quarrelled over the carcass, but the eagle
should never have stooped to share their wrangling,
if he would soar with untainted plumage.
Your tribesmen, noble Mohawk, if indeed you
be an Indian, answered Greyslaer, touched by the
proud yet feeling tone with which the last words
were uttered, your red brethren had indeed better
keep aloof from us, alike in war or in peace, for
they seem to acquire only the worst attributes of
civilized life by attempting to mingle with us as
one people: and their share in this struggle must
Ay, you speak well, young man, interrupted
the Indian, now wholly thrown off his dignified
reserve of manner by what appeared to be a theme
of great excitement with him; if your vaunted
civilization be not all a fraud, your perverted
learning
but a shallow substitute for the wisdom of the
heart, your so-called social virtues but a loose
covering
for guile, like the frail thatch of leaves that
hides the traps of an Indian hunter; if your
religion
be not a bitter satire upon the lives of all of
ye; if, in a word, all your conflicting teachings
and practices be indeed reconcilable to
Truth
and
pleasing to
The Spirit
, then hath he created Truth
of as many colours as he hath man; and his red
children should still rest content with the simple
system which alone their hearts are fitted to
understand
.
Greyslaer was precisely at that age when most
men of an imaginative cast of mind mistake musing
for philosophizing, sentiment for religion; and with
that ready confidence in the result of one's own
reflections
and mental experience which is the darling
prerogative of youth and immaturity of thought, he
did not hesitate to assume the attitude of a teacher
in reply to the last remark of the Indian. Truth,
noble Mohawk, hath ever been, will ever be the
same. But the truths of the other world, as well as
of this, are often wrapped in mystery. God has, in
two dispensations of light from above, revealed to
mortals so much of his holy truth as the human
mind was fitted to receive.
The first revelation was like a dawn in the
forest
,
where the young day shoots its horizontal rays
beneath the dusky canopy of tree-tops, and, glancing
between the columned trunks, streams upon the path
of the benighted wanderer of the wilderness. That
matin-lightthose holy rays of the virgin morn of
true religionI am willing to believe, illumined the
lake-girdled mountains of the Iroquois hunter as
well as the cedar-crowned hills of the Hebrew
shepherd. It shone alike, perhaps, upon the
pathway
of either, if indeed they were not one and the
same people. But the realm of glory to which that
pathway led; the snares that beset it; the solace
and refreshment that lay within reach of the
traveller
,
alternating his perils, these it required a second
revelation to bring to light; when the sun of
righteousness
,
fairly uprisen, should throw the blaze of
noontide into that forest, revealing now, in stern
reality, its yawning caverns, its precipices and
pitfalls
;
now touching with mellow beauty its mossy
resting-places, or sparkling with cheerful radiance
upon its refreshing wayside-waters; and now
bathing
with glorious effulgence the region beyond
the wilderness, where lay the final rest and reward
of the wanderer. The good men of my race,
therefore
,
preach not a new Truth to the Indian! they
seek but to share with him that broader light which
has been vouchsafed to us regarding the same one
Eternal Truth.
The Mohawk listened with an air of deep
respect
to the earnest language of the youth, but his
own feelings and prejudices were too deeply
excited
to permit the discussion long to preserve the
abstract character which Greyslaer attempted to
give it.
I spoke not against the truths of
Christianity
,
said he; for they may have their sanctuary
as well in the desert and the forest as in the city;
I spoke not, I say, of the pure light of Christianity,
which your mobbled faith no more resembles than do
the stained and distorted rays that struggle through
a dungeon's window resemble the beams of the
noontide sun. The holy teachings of your Master
come to us like those unwholesome airs which,
travelling cut pure and invigorating from the skies,
are polluted and made pestiferous by traversing
some noxious marsh before they reach the
unfortunate
mortal who is doomed to breathe them. It is
your vaunted social system from which I recoil with
loathing. Your so-called civilization is, in its very
essence, a tyrant and enthraller of the soul; it
merges
the individual in the mass, and moulds him to
the purposes, not of God, but of a community of
men. It follows the guidance of true religion so far
only as that ministers to its own ends, and then it
turns and fashions anew its belief from time to
time, to suit the `improved' mechanism of its
artificial
system. In crowded Europe the evil is
irremediable
;
for man the machine occupies less room
than man the herdsman or hunter; but your mode
of existence is not less a curse to yethe white
man's curse, which he would fain share with his red
brother! But have I not seen how it works among
you? Have I not been to your palaces and your
churches, and seen there a deformed piece of earth
assume airs that become none but the great Spirit
above? Have I not been to your prisons, and seen
the wretched debtor peering through the bars? You
call the Indian nations cruel! Yet liberty to a
rational
creature as much exceeds property in value
as does the light of the sun that of the smallest
twinkling star! But you put them on a level, to
the everlasting disgrace of human nature. I have
seen the white captive writhing at the Indian stake,
and rending the air with shrieks of agony; strange
that the unhappy man did not endeavour, by his
fortitude
,
to atone in some degree for the crimes
committed
during the life thus justly shortened. I have
witnessed all the hideous torments that you ascribe
to such a death, and yet I had rather die by the most
severe tortures ever inflicted by the Indian than
languish in one of your prisons a single year!
Great Spirit of the Universe! and do you call
yourselves
Christians? Does the religion of him you
call your Saviour inspire this spirit and lead to these
practices?
[3]
[3]
The crude sentiments of this Medicine-man, as thus
spoken
,
seem, by some coincidence or other, to have been afterward
partially repeated by Thayendanagea, and in nearly similar words,
in a letter to a correspondent of the chieftain.
Vide Stone's Life
of Brant
, vol. ii., p. 481.
Greyslaer, who listened with curious attention to
this strange harangue, as coming from the lips of an
Indian, was completely bewildered by the fluency
and energy with which the magician delivered his
tirade, and he scrutinized his features and
complexion
,
as if expecting to discover the lineaments of
some disguised renegado white, who, with talents
fitted for a better sphere, had, induced by caprice
or compelled by crime, banished himself from
society
,
and assumed the character of one of the
aborigines
.
But the natural and easy manner in which
the object of his suspicions turned the next moment
and addressed the Indian woman in her own
language
,
not less than the veneration with which the
squaw received his behests, dispelled the idea, while
little opportunity was given him for making a more
minute examination. The Medicine-man, smiling
blandly, as if he read what was passing in the mind
of his patient, approached to his side, and telling
him that he was now about to consign him to the
care of others, asked Greyslaer, as the only return
expected for any service he might have rendered
him, to curb his tongue hereafter in speaking of
Joseph
Brant!
Before the patriot officer could reply, the
magician
had turned upon his heel and gained the door;
but, as if struck with an after thought, he instantly
returned, and, ere Greyslaer was aware of his
intention
,
he had bared his arm to the shoulder, produced
a stained flint from his pouch, and branded an
uncouth
device, that made the skin smart with pain as
the blood oozed through.
He who loves the Red-man may die by rifle or
tomahawk, but he will never be disgraced by the
scalping-knife or tortured at the stake if he shows
this mark to the followers of Thayendanagea!
And, before Greyslaer could find language to
express
his astonishment, either at the act or the words
which accompanied it, he was alone with the old
woman, who busied herself in reverentially picking
up and putting away the mumming tools of his
profession
which the pseudo magician had flung upon
the ground as he disappeared through the door.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE SQUAW CAMP.
A swampy lair, walled round with sullen hills,
Whose jagged rocks dpheaved their splintered crests,
Frowning above the fray of wrestling limbs below;
A wild morass, whose tangled thickets hid
The blessed sunshine from its oozy pools,
Save where some grassy tussock, cinctured by a rill,
O'er which the fragrant birch and spicewood drooped,
Let down the quivering light upon its floor.
MS. Poems
.
The
above lines describe, not inaptly, the scene
to which the wounded prisoner had been carried for
safety and seclusion. The lodge in which
Greyslaer
lay helpless upon the bed of pain, stood, among
several others in the wilderness, remote from the
station where the warriors of the Mohawks were
collected; and, from the pleasant murmur of female
voices, and cheering call of children at play, which
met his ear when returning strength enabled the
wounded officer to be more observant of things
around him, he soon became aware that his present
domicil must be none other than the Squaw Camp
of Thayendanagea; a lonely fastness where, in time
of war, the women and children of his tribe were
sequestered for safety.
Eager to catch at anything to vary the monotony
of slow convalescence, and prompted by that thirst
for sunshine and the breeze which gives such a
yearning to the sick man's spirit, Greyslaer would
fain have expressed his desire to be lifted out in
front of the lodge. But, ignorant of the Mohawk
language, he found some difficulty in making the
old squaw, who, as his only nurse, affected to
regulate
all his movements, understand his wishes. Her
consent to the step, however, was obtained without
any great difficulty, and she transported the invalid
beyond the porch by dragging his pallet of skins,
with the patient upon it, to the outside of the
wigwam
.
A rivulet, bounded upon the opposite side by a
wall of vines and briers, which in their turn were
overhung by tall aspens, intermingled with the
swamp-ash and dusky tamarack, rippled against the
mossy bank whereon he lay, and hid its wanderings
in mazy thickets beyond. The hammock whereon
the cluster of wigwams which formed the camp had
been raised, seemed to afford the only spot firm
enough for such a purpose amid the spongy and
quaking morass that spread around on every side.
And this grassy esplanade was so limited in extent,
that a clump of witch-elms growing in the centre
cast their drooping branches nearly to the middle of
the stream that bathed the wild flowers on its edges.
Beneath one of these trees was collected a group
that instantly arrested the earnest gaze of the
captive
officer. A merry crew of children, which
seemed
to have been confided to her care, were playing
with a large, solemn hound that reposed at the feet
of a slim Indian girl. The girl, leaning against the
tree, with one pretty foot upraised upon its
straggling
roots, sat weaving a baldric of silk and
wampum
,
whose gaudy strings lay partly on the green
sod beside her, and were partly held in long beaded
cords by a noble-looking woman that stood behind
her, playfully twining the gay tassels in the raven
locks of her companion. The face of the larger and
more commanding maiden was averted from his
gaze when her person first caught the eye of
Greyslaer
;
but her snowy hand, resting for a moment
Vol. I.N
upon the nut-brown neck of the Indian girl,
sufficiently
revealed to him the neighbourhood of one of
his own race and colour; perhaps a countrywoman;
perhaps, indeedhe could scarcely repress a cry of
joy at the thought of the bare possibilityperhaps
Alida! The proud and commanding mienproud,
even though something mournful in her air was
blended with the half sportive act in which she was
engagedwas surely that of Alida. The same
dejection
or listlessness of manner, call it which you
will, it was true, might characterize any female
captive
so situated; but the scenes which Miss De Roos
had recently passed through would best mark her
as the victim of present melancholy.
So Greyslaer thought, and his surmises were
almost
ripened to a certainty when he looked again
at the hound. He thought he beheld in him the
cause of an outcry which had been more than once
raised near his cabin, as the shrewish squaw beat
off a dog that from day to day persisted in thrusting
his nose under the blanket which formed the door,
and smelling round as if in search of an
acquaintance
.
The invalid had himself noticed the
intrusion
as pertinacious, but believed the offender to be
merely one of the wolfish mongrels that hang round
an Indian camp. It was like recognising an old
friend to discover his mistake. Brom! he called,
in a low voice; the hound raised his ears. Brom!
he repeated, in the same suppressed tone. The dog
shook off the urchins that beleaguered him as he
sprang to his feet and looked anxiously around.
Brom, my poor fellow! said Greyslaer, somewhat
louder, and the hound bounded upon him, devouring
him with caresses.
Down, sir, down, he cried, extricating himself
with difficulty from this overpowering outbreak of
affection, and turning to look for the fair mistress of
the animal. But Alida, if it were indeed she, had
disappeared on the instant; and the Indian girl,
collecting
her work together, was preparing to follow
her companion.
The wounded Greyslaer, whose situation
prevented
his moving, was filled with grief and
vexation
when, unheeding every gesture by which he
attempted to arrest her attention, the Indian girl also
flitted from the spot. He sank back, exhausted with
agitation, upon his couch of skins; and believing
almost that his fevered senses had deceived him,
turned the next moment to look for the dog, to see
if he too had been spirited away. The hound had
couched down a few yards off, where he sat
watching
his new-found acquaintance. He wagged his
tail, and approaching as he caught an encouraging
look from Greyslaer, proved, by rubbing his cold
nose against the hand of his friend, that he at least
was a substantial thing of earth.
Why, old Brom, are you still true to your
mistress's
friend, while she flies his presence as if he
were an evil spirit?
The dog looked as if he had every disposition in
the world to comprehend what was said to him, but,
like most dogs who fail in such endeavour, gave no
reply.
But here comes my termagant nurse, and you
must walk off, my poor fellow.
As the youth spoke he warded off a blow which
the truculent dame aimed at the hound with a stick
which she seized from the ground, and which
Greyslaer
,
snatching from her hand, shook at her in a
threatening manner, to show his displeasure, before
casting it into the stream near him. The worthy
Brom, meanwhile, either understanding the last
words which had been addressed to him, or
unwilling
to create scandal by causing a domestic broil in
Greyslaer's establishment, wisely abstracted himself
as fast as his legs could carry him. It is a curious
fact, that a well-bred dog, who has been happy in
his associations with the polite of our species, will
never fly at a woman or child; and Brom, though he
preferred running to fighting in the present instance,
curled his tail so erect upon his retreat, that no
suspicion could attach to his valour. Turning round
when he had gained a discreet distance from the
virago, he paused for a few moments, and looked
back upon her with a countenance more in sorrow
than in anger before taking up the lazy trot with
which he finally disappeared behind a remote
wigwam
of the group.
The young officer was not at a loss to account
for the conduct of the white lady in
apparently
avoiding him, if she were here a captive like
himself
.
But, assuming her to be such, he could
conceive
no satisfactory reason for her discouraging
every kind of communication between them. Yet
such seemed really to be the case when, a few days
after his first transient glimpse of her person, his eye
again encountered her figure, as, with the luxurious
laziness of an invalid, he loitered in the cool shade,
musing upon his situation. His strength, which had
rapidly improved within the last few days, enabled
him now to move toward the lady; but the eager
cry with which he pronounced the name of Alida
warned her of his approach; and its earnest and
anxious repetition only added quickness to the speed
with which she eluded his pursuit.
The dispirited Greyslaer began now to doubt
whether or not the fair captive, for such both the
dress and complexion proclaimed her to be, were
really Miss De Roos. And yet, while it would be
equally strange for any other of his countrywomen
to practise a similar avoidance, considering the
situation
of both parties, and how much a good
understanding
between them might tend to facilitate their
mutual escape, the circumstances under which
Alida
had been carried off, and the presence of her
favourite
dog in company with the mysterious
maiden
,
seemed sufficiently to prove that the white lady
could be no other than Miss De Roos.
Another suspicion which passed through the
mind of Greyslaer was hastily dismissed as
unworthy
both of Alida and himself, considering the
perils which he had encountered to restore her to
her friends. It was, that the coldness with which
she had ever frowned upon his boyish suit actuated
her conduct in their present situation. She is
unwilling
,
said he, bitterly, to receive succour at
my hands. Nay, she is indifferent to the disaster
which had overtaken me in attempting to rescue
her; and regardless, perhaps, as to what may be
my fate as a wounded prisoner in the hands of these
savages; and yet she lacks not humanity! Surely,
am I less than naught to her?
We have said that Greyslaer repelled these
unworthy
suspicions, and so he did, indignant that a
thought demeaning to his mistress should have
found a place in his mind, much less shaped itself
into words. He repelled it, but in vain, for the
same ungenerous thought recurred again and again,
with withering effect upon his already depressed
spirits.
Alas! what a slight does that thought bring over
a young, ardent, ingenuous mind! The thought
that it hath lavished its wealth of loving upon one
who not only can make no return, but who cares
not, recks not how prodigally the treasures of the
heart may be wasted; who regards the most
generous
sacrifices of disinterested feeling as mere
incense
upon the altar of vanity; who derides the
N 2
idolatry of true affection, and holds the deepest
throes of devoted passion but as idle sallies of
youthful extravagance that have no claim upon her
sympathy, that can never awaken her gratitude!
Such, however, is too often the recompense of the
misplaced affection that knows not how to conceal
or regulate its own overflowings.
Ingratitude, however, is not, therefore, the special
fault of the sex! It is human nature, not woman
nature, which sets lightly by a homage which has
never been solicited, and which is paid without
stint! When that homage is pertinacious and
unseasonable
,
it becomes irksome and offensive. The
attentions of love that we do not reciprocate,
however
pleasing to our vanity at first, cease to flatter
when passion increases to infatuation. The
idolatry
which springs from too extravagant an
appreciation
of our character or personal qualities, seems
akin either to folly or madness, and we no longer
value the good opinion which is the offspring
rather
of a heated fancy than of a judgment which we
can respect.
But though these chilling laws of reasoning
human
nature admit of but little mitigation, yet Alida
de Roos was of too magnanimous a spirit to apply
them in full to one who loved her, if not wisely,
yet with all truth and nobleness; and seeing in her
youthful admirer all the qualities to awaken a
sister's
tenderness, she mourned his infatuation with a
sister's sorrow. Love him she thought she never
could, even if her heart had not been preoccupied
by an emotion that closed it completely against
such a sentiment. Her haughty and aspiring mind
had hitherto detected no qualities in Greyslaer's
character which could touch it to gentle issues. It
was only as the refined but visionary student, the
romantic cherisher of vain and speculative dreams,
such as float around a young enthusiast who knows
the world through books alone, that Greyslaer had
hitherto appeared to the lady of his love. The play
of his polished fancy, the allurements of his
cultivated
intellect, had interested her in studying the
character of a stripling who, some years her junior,
and continually thrown in her society as the most
intimate friend of her brother, did, not unnaturally,
attract her kindly regard. But while, with less
mental acquirement upon her own part, Alida
perhaps
over-estimated that of which Greyslaer could
boast, yet her esteem for his talents and
accomplishments
was full as nearly allied to pity as to
admiration
.
She admired the qualities in themselves, but
she thought that their possessor, in this instance,
was deficient in the power to make them useful
either to himself or to others. She thought the
character of Greyslaer was wholly unsuited to the
country and the circumstances amid which his lot
was cast. He possessed the requisites, among
other scenes and other times, to grace a fortune or
uphold an honourable name; but he lacked the
stirring qualities to win either by his own exertions.
He was, in a word, one whose impracticable, feeble,
or misapplied energies doomed him to mediocrity
in life; a mediocrity which, by the comfortable
respectability that she believed would attend it,
gained nothing in the eyes of a woman whom
poverty
or peril would never have prevented from
sharing
the destiny of the man she loved.
'Twas strange! yet the acute-minded Alida de
Roos seemed never to dream that the wild devotion
which the student bore her was what absorbed all
the salient energies of his soul; that she was the
bond that kept its pinions from mounting; that
idolatry
for her alone had robbed ambition's shrine of
Greyslaer's worship; that lovelove only
all-absorbing
,
all-devouring love, had delved the grave in
which his youth's best promise was swallowed up!
The bitter reflections of the lonely prisoner were
destined to a more early and agreeable relief than
he had anticipated. An hour or more had passed
away, and Greyslaer still sat beneath the weeping
elm, now moodily gazing upon the stream that
twinkled through the bushes near him, and now
casting a fierce and impatient glance upon some
lounging Indian, an aged or broken-down warrior
of the band, who had been left by the chief for the
nominal protection of the camp. At last an object
of more agreeable interest presented itself in the
shape of Brom, the stag-hound. Greyslaer had
not seen the dog for some days; and surmising
that the friendly animal had been kept out of his
sight by design, he was at once struck with the
peculiarity of his conduct now, as the hound,
instead
of bounding eagerly forward to fawn upon
him, exhibited the coolest indifference to the call of
his friend. The sagacious Brom went wandering
hither and thither, smelling idly along the ground,
and, though gradually coming nearer, making his
approaches
after such a careless fashion, that
Greyslaer
was in doubt whether the brute knew him or
not. He whistled, and again called him by name;
but the dog, raising his head, looked vacantly
around him, and then resumed his course, without
adding either to the rapidity or directness of his
steps. At last, getting within a few yards of his
friend, the worthy Brom appeared to be for the first
time aware of his neighbourhood, though not until
he had first passed by, and, as it seemed, thrown a
chance look over his shoulder, which induced him
to turn and come gravely forward, as not wishing to
cut an old acquaintance by design. Amused with
the airs of the dogfor in happier days Greyslaer
had frequently seen him put on the same
whimsical
dignity for less cause than might have given
Brom offence at his last visit to the wigwamthe
young man took the head of the hound in his lap
and patted it kindly. Brom only acknowledged
the caress by rubbing his head against the knees of
his friend, as if his collar were too tight for him;
and, placing his hand under the clasp to loosen it,
Greyslaer felt beneath it a scroll of birchen bark,
whose smooth and flexible texture allows it to be
written upon and folded like paper. Agitated with
joy at the discovery, the surprise of the youth did
not, however, prevent him from instantly concealing
the missive in his dress; while the wise Brom,
apparently
contented with the interview, went
smelling
and loitering on his way around the camp, as
if his tour was one of idleness altogether.
The note, as read by Greyslaer the moment he
had attained the interior of his lodge, from which
his quondam nurse and present amiable
house-keeper
was happily absent, contained only these
words, written with charcoal:
An hour after midnight, be near the fallen
sycamore
which crosses the brook within a few paces
of your wigwam. The Indian girl will conduct you
to an interview with
A. D. R.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE HAUNTED ROCK.
And in the mountain mist, the torrent's spray,
The quivering forest or the glassy flood,
Soft-falling showers or hues of orient day,
They imaged spirits beautiful and good;
But when the tempest roared, with voices rude,
Or fierce red lightning fired the forest-pine,
Or withering heats untimely seared the wood,
The angry forms they saw of powers malign;
These they besought to spare, those blessed for
aid divine.
Sands
.
And
what fears The Spreading Dew in this
place, that she would have me now choose another
for her to lead the white man to, that I may hear
tidings of my friends?
This rock whereon we sit, ladyfor Teondetha
told me thou wert a chieftainess among thy people
this rock is sacred to the spirit that watches over
true affection. Here the young hunter breathes the
vow that binds his fidelity for ever. And she that
hearkens to it here, if listening but from girlish
levity
,
or induced by maiden prankishness to break it
afterward, she withers from the earth like a plant
plucked from the garden of the blessed, and sent to
shrivel mid the fires of the Evil One.
But, foolish girl, I mean not to mislead this
youth, rejoined Alida, in the Mohawk tongue,
which, like many a lady near the border at that
time, she spoke with ease and fluency. Is the
soul of my young friend so full of Teondetha, that
she thinks every man, like him, a lover?
The image of her true warrior, though ever
present to The Spreading Dew, still leaves room
for all good spirits, and their ruler, Owaneyo, to be
remembered. The brown-haired captive loves my
blue-eyed sister; and if he be no more to her than
she says, it were mockery to the spirit to bring him
here.
And by what means got you the idea that this
young man thinks of your friend save as a
countrywoman
in captivity like himself?
Thou speakest with two tongues, lady; and I,
though the talk of the white man is strange to me,
can do the same. The brown-haired warrior is a
friend of the Oneidas, and can use the tongue of
Teondetha; and, even if words had not betrayed
his secret, as he implored me to look first to your
safety, lady, when you came not to the spot to
which I led him upon the opposite side of the
camp yesternight, should I not have known how it
stood with him? Doth not the breeze know why
the flower trembles when it fans it? And held I not
the captive's hand while I spoke of you, when
guiding
him through the thicket's depths?
It is too late now, my gentle sister, to change
our place of meeting, said Miss De Roos, who saw
that it was equally impossible to reason the girl out
of the conviction which she had lately adopted, or
the superstition which was so intimately
ingrafted
with her forest faith. I must see the youth
to-night, and upon this spot, or we must abandon
the interview altogether; and even now I hear the
sound as of some one leaping from bog to bog in
the quaking fen around us.
The Mohawk girl hesitated no longer. Anxiety
for the fate of Teondetha's friend, wandering in
darkness amid the spongy and treacherous morass,
laced everywhere among its blind thickets with
deep and sloughy pools, urged her to spring forward
and guide him in safety to the Haunted Rock; and
in a few moments Greyslaer had penetrated the
copse of tamaracks that girdled it, and gained the
firm and broad platform whereon his mistress stood.
The Indian maiden, from considerations of delicacy
that in such matters seem common to her sex,
however
uncultivated, instantly glided away; and the
lovers, if such they may be called, were left alone
together.
And now, young gallant, so lithe of foot and bold
of hand, so ready in speech and act, alike amid
manhood's
councils and warrior fray, where lurks thy
smooth tongue, thy nimble wit and stout endeavour,
that have already proclaimed thee
man
among the
ablest of thy fellows? Why do thy knees tremble,
and thy quivering lips refuse to lackey thy laggard
thoughts to utterance? Why tak'st thou not the
outstretched hand the maid in friendliness accords
thee? Why fall thy muttered syllables like broken
drops feebly distilled from some slow-thawing
fountain
?
Is it the Divinity of the place that awes thee?
or doth thy spirit quail before an earthly presence?
Greyslaer, said Alida, solemnly, for her
woman's
heart was touched by the agitation which
overwhelmed her lover, and the bright stars shining
down upon the spot revealed the paleness of his
cheek. God! he knows that I would spare you
the pain my words may inflict to-night; I sought
this interview for a far different object from that to
which I now see that it mustthat it ought,
perhaps
,
for your future happiness, to tend. I blame
myself in not inviting such an explanation between
us long ago. Be a man, Max Greyslaer, and shrink
not at what I am about to say. You love me?
To idolatry, to madness, cried the young man,
in a hoarse whisper of passion, while his thronged
feelings, rushing tumultuously to find vent through
his lips, seemed nearly to suffocate him as he flung
himself upon his knees before Alida.
The lady recoiled against a blasted tree that grew
near by, and, overcome for a moment, could only
mutely motion to him to rise. He sprang to his feet,
and stood with folded arms before her. Alas!
alas! she said, at length recovering herself, you
need not have told me that. And yet, the God of
Heaven be my judge, I dreamed not till this night
that your regard was of so deep a nature. But you
are yet young, Greyslaer; love cannot exist without
hope, and this fancy will soon pass away, or be
transferred to another more worthy of your esteem;
to one who can reciprocate your affection.
Yes! when the last year's stubble shall sprout
with a second spring; when that scathed tree
against which you lean shall shake off the moss
that drinks up its sap of life, and be clothed anew
with verdure of its own; when
Hold, Max, hold; this is the very phrensy of
passion. I cannot listen to you longer, unless you
show some regard for my feelings by repressing the
vehemence of yours. Oh! Max Greyslaer, if you
knew how deep a cause I have for grief in which
you cannot share, you would from this moment
cease to add to my sorrows by urging this
misplaced
,
this most unhappy passion.
You
unhappy, Alida?forgive me for thus
calling
you. You the victim of a secret sorrow? You,
with that smooth cheek; that rounded, pliant form;
that brow on whichno, no, the hand of grief hath
never left its wasting fingers there, nor hollow care
enshrined himself in such a tenement; you but
mock me, Alida; or, rather, you would thus, in
mercy, crush my ill-starred passion. But, Miss De
Vol. I.O
Roos, you know me not! If the presumption of
my love offend you
Oh! not
offend
me, tearfully murmured the
afflicted
girl.
If the madness of my love offend you, pursued
Max, unheeding the low-voiced interruption, you
may teach me to curb, to smother, to bury in my
inmost soul the feeling that consumes it; but there,
there it will burn for ever. The heart of Greyslaer
can know no second love.
This is too, too much! It will drive me mad to
speak it; yet nothing else will extinguish his
unhappy
infatuation. Max Greyslaer, hear me. I
have long since given you the regard of a sister.
I have watched you alike in your studies and your
sports, with the pride and the interest of an elder
sister; and a sister's fondness would have followed,
could I have shut out the painful conviction that it
was not with the affection of a brother you regarded
me. This interest in your welfare alone would
impel
me to leave no step untried to root out this fatal
passion from your heart. But since the wild
avowal
of this night; since the declaration of desperate
feelings you but now betrayed, I feel, though most
innocently the cause of them, that you have still
deeper claims upon my sympathy, that you have
new ones upon my gratitude. I feel that there is
but one way to break the miserable chain by which
you would link your fate with mine, and give you
back to the higher and happier destiny for which,
by every circumstance save this one only, you are
fitted. Nay, thank me not; I acknowledge you
have a
right
to my confidence. She paused, and
the features upon which the domestic sorrows of the
last few weeks had left no feeble impress, became
agitated with an expression of pain, which even the
recollection of that night of horror at the
Hawksnest
had failed to trace. Greyslaer himself awaited
what was to follow; and her words, as she resumed,
were spoken in a tone low but clear, firm but
inexpressibly
mournful. There is, she said, there
is but one man living, Greyslaerone as vile,
sordid
,
ruthless, and malignant as you are gentle,
generous
,
and nobleone only other who shares the
secret you have this night wrung from me.
And he is
My husband!
The wretched girl, whose lofty spirit was still
farther wrought up by the high and magnanimous
sentiment of generosity which sustained her for the
moment, swooned the instant she had pronounced
the words. The weakness, however, quickly
passed
away, as, at a cry of alarm from Greyslaer, the
Indian maiden bounded from the covert, and applied
some cool glossy leaves, wet with the dews of night,
to the brow of the sufferer.
The blow was better received by Greyslaer than
could have been expected or hoped for by her that
dealt it. He was indeed astounded and petrified
by the first announcement; but all consideration
for himself seemed the next moment merged in
concern for his unhappy mistress.
Lady, he said, dropping on one knee before her,
and with an air of deep respect pressing his lips to
the hand which she did not attempt to withdraw,
you spoke truly, lady, when you said my fate
was linked with yours; but you erred in believing
that aught could sever the chain, though it might
lead me to destruction. As a lover, after what I
have heard this night, you shall never know me
more. But you have still left me something to
live for, in taking away the only hope that could
make existence happy. You have given me back
to myself, but from this moment I am more
completely
yours than ever. The romantic dream of
my youth has passed away, the madness of my
misplaced and boyish love is over; and here, by
the cool light of manhood's enfranchised reason,
here upon this planted rock, with yon bright
heaven
as witness of my vow, I swear, while the pulses
of life beat within me, never to leave nor desert
you until I unravel this hideous mystery, and break
the spell in which some fiend has manacled your
soul. Nay, shrink not, dearest lady, as if my sworn
service might prove intrusive. How or why these
devilish meshes have been woven around you, I
ask you not to explain until I have in some way
approved my faith and loyalty. But be it when or
where you choose to make the revelation; be the
deed what it may, you claim in return for the
precious
boon of your confidence, if human hand can
work it, it shall be done at your bidding.
A light as from a maniac's eye glared in that
of Alida as the young man rose slowly up before
her after this wild and solemn adjuration.
No, no, Greyslaer, she cried, shaking back the
long tresses which had fallen in disorder over her
neck and shoulders. No, Greyslaer, thou art not
yet dear enough to me to share the fruition of the
hoarded hope I have lived upon for years. Alida's
own hand shall alone avenge Alida! For what
else have I cherished the strength of this useless
frame; for what have I forgot my woman's nature,
and shared your schooling in feats of arms with
my brother? Think you it was an idle caprice
of my sex, or the perverted taste of an Amazon,
that made me choose pistol and rapier, instead
of needle and distaff, for my amusement? No,
Max Greyslaer; my hand, as well as my heart, hath
been schooled for years to the accomplishment of
one only end, and they will neither of them fail
me at my purpose. That is, if this poor brain hold
out.
And, pressing both hands to her temples, the
unfortunate
young lady looked so bewildered for a
moment, that Greyslaer could hardly resist the
conviction
that her intellects were disordered. Yet, if
such were indeed the case, how, he thought, could
her mind be so well balanced in regard to all other
subjects? In reference to this one, too, her reason,
though disturbed, was not clouded; the agitation
of the fountain did indeed hide its depths from
view, but the water was bright and limpid still.
If it be true, however, that great wit to
madness
nearly is allied, while gleams of insanity have
been discovered in minds which have exercised a
wide and enduring influence over mankind, and,
mastering their disease till the last, have left in
death the wisest of their survivers doubtful as to
the suspicion that has attached to them; then might
a far more experienced observer of human nature
than young Greyslaer be at fault. Nor, indeed,
were it just to conclude, only from what he had
witnessed, that the senses of Alida were deranged.
The sentiments which she had just uttered were
indeed abhorrent to the nature of her sex, to her
Christian education, and all her early associations
of refinement. But while the excitement under
which she spoke would sufficiently account for her
momentary air of wildness, there was none of the
incoherence of distraction in her speech; and as
for nature and education, the first had been
shocked
,
overthrown, and changed by the outrage which
trampled upon it, and the lastthe last is but an
artificial barrier, that at once gives way when the
former has become perverted.
While these reflections, or others not unlike them,
passed hurriedly through the mind of Greyslaer,
O 2
the lovely subject of them seemed too busied with
her own conflicting thoughts to observe the earnest
and anxious gaze that was riveted upon her
countenance
.
At last, as if shaking off the load that
weighed upon her spirits, and recovering from the
attitude of dejection that for a moment bowed her
commanding form, she said, in a calm voice,
I would, Mr. Greyslaer, that you could forget
what has passed between us this night. I have
been hasty in permitting you to commit yourself to
take an interest in my affairs which they do not
deserve at your hands. I have thought of the
mischievous
consequences of yielding you a more full
and complete confidence; and it would be
ungenerous
in me to claim your active sympathy for the
blind and partial revelation of my sorrows already
made. I beseech you to remember only the
friendly
interest with which I requite your regard, and to
forget all else that has passed between us.
These formal words, which struck chillingly
upon the ear of Greyslaer, were pronounced in
that measured tone of superior self-possession with
which a master-spirit may sometimes address an
inferior, blended with the air of kind authority
which considerate age will put on when conversing
with inexperienced youth. But, though she knew
it not yet, the ascendancy which the generous and
haughty-souled Alida had hitherto exercised over
the mind of her lover was gone for ever; and
Greyslaer
made her feel that it was so in his reply.
An hour ago, Miss De Roos, and I was,
perhaps
,
the rash and doting boy you think me. Rash
in aspiring to the hand of one so gifted as yourself,
doting in that I dared to tell you of my passion;
but though I still bear you a regard passing the
love of kindred, however near,
boy
I am no longer.
The day-star of my youth has set for ever; the
destiny
of my life is written; for good or for evil, 'tis
henceforth twined with yours. If you repent the
share you may have had in thus determining my
fate, if it be a generous concern for my welfare
that prompted your words, your anxiety is thrown
away. It is too late for
you
to recede; and
I
I
have thrown my cast, and am determined to stand
the hazard of the die!
And how, said the lady, with an irresolute,
uneasy
air, that perhaps betrayed a mingled feeling of
jealous pride, of growing self-diffidence, and
newly-awakened
respect for the lofty and decided tone
the youth assumed so unexpectedly, how,
Greyslaer
,
am I to avail myself of any service which you
might render me?
By designating the villain at whose life you
aim, and leaving me to avenge your injuries.
Speak you in earnest, Max Greyslaer? Do you
think me, then, capable of such ignoble and
coldblooded
selfishness? so ignoble as to place my
mortal
quarrel in the hands of one who is a stranger to
my blood; so selfish as to requite affection by
imposing
a task that may lead to death?
Well spoken, young missus, like a gal of spunk
as you are, exclaimed a harsh voice near by, while
a brawny ruffian, leaping from the thicket, and
striking
the rock with a short Indian war-club as he
gained his footing upon it, placed himself between
Greyslaer and Alida. What, ho! younker, he
cried; you would add to the account that is
chalked
up agin you already, would you? God help you
in his own way; but, unless the devil fail wild Wat
afore then, you will find him a hard reckoner; that
is, if your carcass first escape a roasting at the hands
of the bloody Mohawk.
Stand off, ruffian, muttered Greyslaer, choking
with passion, as he saw the savage-looking fellow
circling the waist of Alida with one arm, while,
weaponless and feeble from his recent wound, he
felt himself incapable of protecting her.
Fair words, fair words, if you please, my young
master; I come here only to rescue this lady from
Indian captivity; and, as the Redskins are still my
friends in the main, I should be sorry to rob the
stake doubly by knocking you in the head.
Oh, Max, murmured Alida, who had hitherto
stood as if paralyzed with horror, strive not with
this dark and terrible man, who even now has
stepped
,
as from the grave, between us.
And so you, too, eh, my fraulein, thought, like
many others, that Red Wolfert had kicked the
bucket
,
because I took Wat's advice, and cleared out
for a while, to save my neck, till things should blow
over. But times have changed, my spanking lass;
tall fellows hold up their heads once more, and I
come here to exercise the rights of one of them over
Mistress
Speak, speak but one word, I pray you, Alida!
Is this horrible ruffiis this your husband?
Dunder und blixem, and suppose I be, cried
the man, catching the words out of the mouth of
Alida, whose senses seemed too much benumbed
to make a ready reply. Don't you see how the
gal wilts like when I look at her, and who but her
natural husband should make a woman cower?
In the name of the devil, who are you, that speak
so fitly in his tongue? said Greyslaer, making a
wary movement toward the man, in the desperate
hope of clutching from his hand the short mace with
which he dallied.
A clerk of St. Nicholas, who will despatch you
with a message to his employer if you move a step
nearer, verfluchter kerl.
If you be the fiend himself, here's at you,
shouted Greyslaer, bounding furiously forward. The
contest was too unequal to leave a hope of success
for the invalid youth, had he succeeded in closing
with his antagonist; but the latter, to whom the now
senseless Alida seemed no encumbrance, as he
actively
leaped aside, laughed to scorn the vain efforts
of his assailant, who still pressed impetuously upon
him. His words, however, betrayed his growing
irritation, as, backing step by step toward the edge
of the rock, so as still to keep the full swing of his
arm while the youth attempted to close in upon
him,
Gemeiner hund, madcap, idiot, dolt, take that
to quiet you, he cried, at last dealing a blow that
brought Greyslaer instantly to the ground.
Valtmeyer, for the ruffian was no other than that
redoubtable outlaw, waited not to see how durable
might be the effects of the blow, but, plunging into
the bushes, he glided along a slippery log with his
burden, thridding the morass like one accustomed
to its dangers. Stricken down, and stunned for the
moment, Greyslaer was slowly regaining his feet,
when the first object he beheld was the Mohawk
maiden, gazing, with clasped hands and bewildered
eyes, toward the thickets into which the outlaw
had disappeared. His towering form, his sallow
features, his long beard of grizzled red, and aspect
altogether foreign and hideous to her sight, made
him no unfit personification of those evil spirits of
the forest which the Indian girl would naturally
paint, as the very reverse in appearance from the
smooth-cheeked warriors of her race; and the
simple
sylvan maiden, as she breathed a prayer for the
ill-fated pale sister of her sex, thought that the
offended
genius of the place had permitted some fiend
to intrude within his hallowed circle, and punish on
the spot the first violation of the Haunted Rock.
BOOK SECOND.
CHAPTER I.
TORY COUNCILS.
The Sachem spoke:
Resentment rising, seemed to choke
The words of wrath that forth had broke;
But conscience lent her bland relief,
And calmly spoke the injured chief.
Sands
.
The
calamity which had overtaken the family of
the Hawksnest, the mysterious fate of Miss De
Roos, and the presumed death of one so popular as
young Max Greyslaer, excited the deepest sensation
through the Valley of the Mohawk. The two
political
parties which divided the district were as yet
by no means fairly in the field against each other;
and the warfare of words being still carried on for a
season before a final appeal to arms was had,
recrimination
rose high between either faction.
The patriots did not hesitate to charge the Tories
with being the instigators of this ruthless attack
upon the peace of a private family, while the
loyalists
,
affecting to be equally indignant at the outrage,
taunted the Whigs with being the first to bring the
laws of the country into contempt by their own
factious
conduct. The catastrophe, however, seemed
in one respect to have a salutary effect. It opened
the eyes of both parties to the horrors of a civil war.
Both seemed willing to pause and await the effect
of circumstance in preventing their being farther
embroiled; and both united with apparent
sincerity
in passing public resolutions against the
employment
of the Indians to strengthen either side,
whatever
the issue might be, and whenever that issue
might be finally joined.
But the ball of Revolution was in motion; and
though its course might be for the time more
noiseless
,
neither its momentum nor its accumulating
forces were diminished. The organization of party,
and the dangerous tampering with the Indian tribes,
went on as industriously as ever; the Whigs
displaying
the greatest coolness, foresight, and address
in the one respect, while the Tories were equally
successful in the other.
Months, in the mean time, passed away, and the
operations of either began to show results which
must produce a crisis. The civil authority passed
into the hands of the patriots, who found an excuse
for a stern exercise of that authority in sending
General Schuyler, with a large body of militia, to
disarm the disaffected, in the same moment that the
predominant influence of the Tories in Indian
politics
was fully consummated. The tribe of Oneidas,
after long nobly withstanding both threats and
cajoling
,
were at length driven, by the intriguing arts of
the latter, to detach themselves from the
confederacy
of the Six Nations, and assume that neutral
position
which was afterward only abandoned for a
warm espousal of the patriot cause.
It was Christmas morning; and the sun, which
shone through the sacred grove of Onondaga,
touched
with gold the pendant icicles which drooped from
the heavy boughs that had wailed for a thousand
winters around the ancient citadel of the
Ongi-Honwe
.
The adjacent lake, whose frozen surface
was freshly covered with virgin snow, smiled in the
glad light of the morning, whose early rays were
glinted back from bush and thicket, that were all
clothed with the same dazzling mantle. A few
shreds of smoke ascending straight upward into the
clear blue sky was the only object stirring amid the
bright and tranquil scene.
But for this faint indication of the neighbourhood
of man, the lonely stockade, that was dignified with
the name of The Onondaga Castle, seemed
wholly
deserted; and he who gazed within would have
looked in vain for the imposing assemblage of
patriarchal
sachems which, in the previous century,
was likened to the Senate of Rome by Frontenac,
when that adventurous Frenchman, like another
Brennus, intruded with his armed followers into the
great council of the Aganuschion.
[4]
[4]
The national council (of the Six Nations) took cognizance of
war and peace, of the affairs of the tributary nations, and of their
negotiations with the French and English colonies. All their
proceedings
were conducted with great deliberation, and were
distinguished
for order, decorum, and solemnity. In eloquence, in
dignity
,
and in all the characteristics of profound policy, they surpassed
an assembly of feudal barons, and were, perhaps, not far inferior to
the great Amphictyonic council of Greece.
De Witt Clinton
.
One lonely
female
was the only occupant of the building.
The stranger, who was aware of the consideration
in which the sex were held among the Ongi-Honwe,
and who knew that this rude building contained the
great national altar of their confederacy, might at
first have mistaken the woman now before him for
one of those pious devotees who successively, for
ages, watched the sacred central council-fire of the
Aganuschion. But the mean features and apparel
of the withered old crone, as she sat crouched in the
ashes, would soon, upon a close survey, have proved
that she could not claim to be numbered among the
principal women of the Six Nations.
Wah! exclaimed the hag, as, with a crooked
stick, she vainly pushed a wet and blackened ember
toward the smouldering ashes; could not the fools
leave enough of the fire that has burned for a
thousand
winters to warm these old bones with? May
the Evil One broil them on his own for meddling in
the quarrel of Corlear
[5]
[5]
Sons of Corlear, or The Children of Quidar, were the
terms by which The Six Nations indifferently distinguished the
inhabitants of the Colony of New-York; and, though first adopted
during the Dutch ascendancy over the province, we find them used
in Indian treaties and speeches down to quite a recent period.
with the Sagernash! May
their tribes be dispersed like these scattered
embers
!
May they, like them, be trampled upon by
Stopping short in her imprecation as she caught
sight of a half-extinguished branch, which still lay
smoking in the corner where it had been tossed, the
crone hobbled toward it, and thrust it afresh in the
ashes, applying, at the same time, the air from her
wheezy lungs to rekindle the flame.
Her efforts were followed by a momentary
ignition
,
indicated by a few sparks, that made her
mutter
still more angrily, as, to avoid them, she threw
back her head, from which the long gray hair
drooped
in the ashes. The dying brand crackled feebly,
sighed like a living thing, and expired.
A-rai-wah! The Sacred Fire of Onondaga is
extinguished for ever!
As she spoke the hag gathered her knees toward
her body with one hand, and resting her shrivelled
cheek upon the other, commenced rocking backward
and forward, croaking a harsh song, in which
lamentations
and curses were so wildly intermingled
that the eldrich dirge partook equally of the
character
of either.
But this wretched remnant of mortality was not
the only mourner for the extinguished pride and
power of the now broken Iroquois confederacy.
Vol. I.P
The Christmas sun shone merrily upon the
frosted
window-panes of Johnson Hall; gleamed upon
the armour that decked its walls, and tinted with
freshness the evergreens that festooned its ancient
portraits. But here, as at Onondaga, its beams
seemed to smile only as in mockery of man and his
doings. Here were men, haggard and worn with
long watching, grouped in disorder throughout the
broad corridor. Some were engaged in anxious or
angry debate together; some, as if wearied out with
action or discussion, were stretched upon the oaken
settles, regarding with dogged indifference the
excited
disputes of their comrades; and one, more
swarthy
of feature than the rest, a tall man of a fierce
and haughty aspect, was striding impatiently to and
fro, casting ever and anon a hasty look at the
staircase
,
whose polished banister he repeatedly struck
with his tomahawk in passing.
[6]
[6]
The marks of the Indian tomahawk are shown upon the stairs
of the hall to this day
Twice he had
ascended
several steps, as if determined to seek above
some person who had exhausted his patience in
delaying
an interview; and then pausing a moment as
he thundered anew with his hatchet upon the stairs,
he turned abruptly upon his heel, breathing
indignation
against those who appeared not to heed his
savage signal.
At last a strong-framed man, hastily arrayed in a
dressing-gown, accompanied by a Highland officer
in full uniform, presented himself upon the landing
of the staircase. The features of either were
clouded
;
but of the two the former seemed to be
labouring
under the greater emotion. His look was
agitated
,
but not alarmed; distempered, but not angry.
Brant! said he, with some severity, at any
other time I would not overlook this want of
respect
;
I would not put up with this rudeness from
any man breathing. But since we are all here
companions in affliction together, a quarrel with so
old a friend of my house would not become me.
Companions together, Sir John? You honour
the poor Indian by placing him in such company,
even in your
speech
, though you can find no room
for him in your
writings
when making terms with
the enemy!
Speak, Alan MacDonald, and dispel these
ungenerous
suspicions of our friend! Tell him the
circumstances under which we have been compelled
to treat with the commissioners from Albany.
I am wholly at a loss upon what particular
point to answer Captain Brant, said MacDonald,
coolly. He seems already to be aware that we
have accepted terms from General Schuyler, who is
marching hitherward with three thousand men;
and, unless report belies them, with a hundred
Mohawk
warriors in his train!
Yes! a pack of frightened curs from the lower
castle, with a handful of naked renegades from my
own people. The hungry offcasts from my tribe,
who hope, with Schuyler's countenance, to make
spoil of the blankets and provisions that are laid up
here for our projected campaign. But tell me, Sir
John Johnson, is the falling off of these wretches
to excuse this desertion of your Indian friends, after
entangling us in this contemptible quarrel? God
of my people! that the power and glory which thou
hast suffered them to attain should be thus
ruinously
perilled in a stranger's brawl! that the league
of our ancient confederacy, cemented by the blood
of a thousand victories, should dissolve like
snowflakes
upon the river, because, in an evil moment,
we consented to interfere in a paltry dispute about
a few halfpence of revenue between some peddling
foreigners, who would cut each other's throats for
gain! Nay, sir, never lay your hand upon your
sword! and you, ye prying knaves, unless ye stand
back at mine or your master's bidding, shall be
dealt with less daintily than the rebel general will
handle ye. Back, I say, or my signal call shall fill
this hall with those who'll flood it with your gore!
By the valour of a Mohawk! but it were a good
deed to call in my warriors, and supplant such
recreants
with men who will hold these walls against
all odds till they crumble around them!
And the indignant chieftain strode haughtily to
and fro, as if really balancing in his mind this mad
procedure, while the baronet, too much incensed by
the insolence of Brant to make any concession to
his wrath, was yet too politic to trust himself with
a hasty reply. The cool and discreet MacDonald
now put in a word to sooth the exasperated mood
of the demi-savage, as he considered the chieftain
when thus excited.
Captain Brant is too experienced a soldier not
to be aware of the impossibility of maintaining our
present position against the overpowering force
which has been unexpectedly sent against us.
And could not these heavy-limbed fellows have
taken to the bush, and shared a hunter's fare for a
few weeks, until the first burst of the storm should
have spent its fury? Did you think, in taking up
arms in a forest-land like this, where every rock is
a fortress, every tree a citadel, did you think that
the struggle was to be decided by the capture of a
few towns and villages?
We did not, noble Thayendanagea, said Sir
John, taking the words from the mouth of
MacDonald
.
No. do we now believe that one
compulsory
compromise like the present is to terminate
the resistance of the king's friends in this rebellious
colony. Had we treated with the rebels for peace
throughout the province, our brave Indian brethren
would never have been forgotten in the treaty; but
our capitulation refers only to the loyalists in this
individual district. Our friends are still in arms in
other parts of the colony; and even here the gallant
gentlemen whom you see around you will yet again
lift up the royal banner, or flock to it upon the first
opportunity, if Thayendanagea keeps it flying in
the field. II myself will lead them to
Hold, Sir John! unless you would have your
spoken promise give the lie to your written pledge.
Remember that `
Sir John Johnson, having given
his parole of honour not to take up arms against
America
,' he can never
Where, where do you find such words as
those? cried the baronet, hardly knowing what he
said in his confusion.
The
title
of the instrument runs thus, please
ye, Sir John, replied Brant, coolly drawing a
written
document from his bosom, the preamble of
which he began to read in a measured, sarcastic
tone: `Terms offered by the honourable Philip
Schuyler, major-general in the army of the
Thirteen
United Colonies, and commanding in the
New-York
department, to Sir John Johnson, baronet, and
all such other persons in the county of Tryon as
have evinced their intentions of supporting his
majestv's
ministry to carry into effect the
unconstitutional
measures of which the Americans so justly
complain:' do you mark the emphasis? said the
Mohawk, scornfully, while another storm seemed
gathering on his brow, as, repeating the phrase, he
went on, `of which the Americans so
justly
complain
;
and to prevent which they have been
driven
to the dreadful necessity of having recourse to
arms: first, that' Pshaw! you have it there in
the third article, and may read for yourselves if you
P 2
have forgotten the contents of the document, when
your signatures, confirming your acceptance of
these terms, can scarcely be dry upon the original.
The chieftain, as he spoke, flung the paper
contemptuously
at the feet of Sir John, who
comprehended
,
without looking at it, that it must be a copy
of his terms of surrender, furnished by the politic
Whigs to shake the loyalty of Brant.
It is in vain, Captain Brant, said he, with sad
composure, to conceal from you the extent of our
misfortunes. My poor services, in a military
capacity
,
are indeed lost to the crown; and these brave
Scottish gentlemen, though suffered to retain their
side-arms, are placed by their parole in the same
unhappy predicament as myself. But the king has
many as capable servants as we, who may still
assert
their loyalty in the field; and if the fear of
chilling their zeal in my royal master's cause
induced
me to withhold from you the extent of the
rebel triumph, I know I shall be forgiven by so
ardent
and generous a partisan as Thayendanagea.
The tones in which his gallant friend spoke, not
less than the words which he uttered, seemed
instantly
to change the mood of the stormy chieftain,
who paced to and fro for a moment before he replied.
Sir John, said Brant, with feeling, I have
nothing to forgive. It is you of whom I should
ask pardon. You are nearer to the great king than
I am, and know best how much of his affairs to
suppress
and how much to reveal. I have always
borne you the love of a brother; and for that, if for
nothing else, you will forgive me for thinking you
faithless when you were only unfortunate. But I
have heard that within the last hour, he added,
with that air of calm fatalism characteristic of the
Iroquois, even while using the language of a
European
,
I have heard that which might well dis
temper me: the confederacy of the Aganuschion
is broken. A formal assemblage of Sachems at
Onondaga has dissolved the league of the United
Cantons that existed beyond the traditions of our
race. Our Great Council Fire is extinguished, and
the Six Nations, whose delegates consummated the
fatal ceremony with the peaceful unanimity of a
band of brothers, meet hereafter only as broken
tribes arrayed in deadly hostility to each other.
Not so, noble Sachem! cried the baronet, with
brightening features. It is only the Oneidas, with
their adopted children, the Mohicans, who have
seceded
from the union. The whole Tuscarora tribe,
the greater portion of the Onondagas, the fiery
Senecas
,
and valiant Cayugas, are even now assembling
under Guy Johnson at Oswego, and wait but for
you, with your indomitable Mohawks, to lead them,
in all their ancient pride of arms, upon the foe.
The delegates of the loyal tribes attended the great
central fire only to gain time and blind the lazy
eyes of the Oneidas, who convoked the council.
Their protest against the confederacy taking any
part on either side in this war was not received.
They declared their secession from the union, and
the sacred fire of the united brethren was
extinguished
.
But the act was illegal; for, as you know
the Mohawks were not represented in the council;
[7]
[7]
It may have been under some such pretence as this that the
refugee Mohawks, who found a home in Upper Canada after the
Revolution, ventured to dedicate a place there as the seat of The
Great Council Fire of the Six Nations, and call it Onondaga,
while, in fact, all the confederates but themselves remained
within
the territory of New-York, keeping the original Onondaga
among their reserved lands till the present day. Red Jacket, the
famous Seneca, stirred up a serious dispute about this exclusive
assumption both of the national shrine and general name of his
countrymen.See
Stone's Life of Brant
, vol. ii.
and the holy flame of union and power may again
be relighted in a blaze of glory which shall illumine
the land.
The eye of the Indian sagamore flashed with
fierce delight; his mien assumed a lofty bearing, as
of one who felt himself yet destined to be the leader
of armies, while his nostril dilated as if already he
snuffed the battle. These indications of strong
emotion
,
however, passed away like a flash, even as Sir
John pronounced the last words which seemed to
have kindled them; and then the face of the Mohawk
assumed that immovably stoical expression which
rendered it impossible to surmise what was passing
in his bosom, and which, upon the countenance of
an Iroquois, always covered his deepest and most
earnest thoughts.
It might be that vague dreams of ambition, which
had heretofore passed through the mind of Brant;
that plans of personal elevation at the expense of his
less cultivated countrymen, which, in moments of
temptation, had suggested themselves, and been
indignantly
discarded from his thoughts at the
generous
call of patriotism, or reluctantly abandoned from
a conviction of their impracticability under the
existing
organization of the Aganuschion republicit
may be that these dark and aspiring schemes were
busy within him now!
It might beand the loyal, disinterested
character
of the man, his romantic love of his doomed
race, and his pertinacious aversion to European
civilization
,
while evincing in his own conduct many of
its benefits, render this solution by far the most
likely
it
might be that that silent mien and fixed
expression
of countenance concealed the devotional
communings of his hearta patriot's thanksgiving
for a people saved.
Captain Brant looks grave, said MacDonald;
he thinks that the responsibility of his part has
increased just in proportion that the chance of his
playing it successfully with our aid has diminished
by that aid being now withdrawn.
If a taunt were implied in this speech, it was so
slight as to pass unheeded by Brant; but his heart
was not inaccessible to the subtle appeal to his
vanity
which it conveyed.
I see, I see, said he, casting his eyes in musing
fashion upon the ground, and smiling grimly, as if it
were impossible wholly to suppress the pleasurable
thrill of pride which he wished to conceal. The
great king depends now upon the Indians to preserve
this colony for him. Our warriors are to keep the
rebels in check until the great king can send over
such an army as shall make it safe for his loyal
subjects
once more to rise and help him! Good! very
good!
He shall find that
WE
are to be depended
upon
. The voice and manner of the Sachem
suddenly
altered with the last words, as he raised his
eyes and cast a stern and haughty gaze around.
Yes, gentlemen, he continued, in a more cool and
lofty tone, the largest, and the fairest, and most
fertile part of this rich province is now left to the
guardianship of one who, among yourselves, bears
but the rank of an English captain; and I would
have you know that it is not from ignorance of the
value of the pledge, of the cost of protecting it, or
of the opportunity of successfully treating with the
Americans for the heritage which you are
compelled
to abandon, that I here, in the name of my
countrymen, assume its charge. With you, Sir
John Johnson, as the official representative of your
sovereign, I might have made my own terms for
the better defined security of our rights under the
British dominion; but a Mohawk chieftain is no
trafficker of loyalty. Your king shall learn how far
he may depend upon the faith and valour of the Iro
quois, and the future will reveal the measure of his
justice to us in return.
[8]
[8]
The difficulties with the British government which imbittered
the closing years of Brant, his neglected petitions, the invasion
alike of the property and the political rights of his tribe, and the
forced necessity he was under of asserting his legal claim to the
half pay of a British captain, might suggest some doubts as to the
wisdom of his confidence in the justice of the crown. But have
the Oneidas, who espoused the cause of the republic, fared better
than the Mohawks? See note at the end of the volume.
Our
power
to serve the
British cause remains to be proved. You at least,
Sir John, can bear witness to the readiness of our
will
.
He is a slave that doubts either, cried the
baronet
.
Though the terrible Virginian himself should
take the field against you, his wisdom and his valour
will find a match in Thayendanagea. And
I
, my
noble friend, though prevented by fate from serving
with you as a comrade in arms, I, while watching
your glorious career, will console myself with the
reflection that I have, by temporizing, preserved the
services of these brave followers to my sovereign till
they can be used with a hope of success hereafter.
The last words, which were addressed as much
to the by-standers as to Brant himself, had their full
influence in reassuring the spirits of the former;
and MacDonald confirmed their effect by
immediately
adding,
Sir John could certainly not better serve our
cause in the present exigency than by securing him
in the midst of the party which we wish to keep
together
.
We are still strong in numbers throughout
the district, and, while he remains with us, we shall
never want a leader at the proper moment for
striking
.
Your parole of honour! said Brant, drawing
himself up and looking with a lowering eye upon
the company.
Though given to outlaws, it shall never be
broken
but for cause, replied Johnson. But the
rebels
,
drunken with their first success, will soon
supply
us with legitimate grounds for disregarding the
pledge they have wrung from us.
Well, you white men know best how far ye may
trust each other, observed the chief, with a
significant
and pitying smile, while, in drawing his mantle
around him to depart, he muttered less audibly
beneath
its folds something still more contemptuous.
His precise words were unheard, but their purport
was sufficiently intelligible to rouse the ire of
MacDonald
,
who mutely folded his arms when the
chieftain
stretched out his hand to exchange a parting
salutation with him.
Nay, Captain MacDonald, said Brant, I part
not thus with a brave comrade and tried soldier. It
was of the white man's, and not the Scotchman's,
faith of which I spoke, and you will pardon the
prejudices
of the Indian, however you would resent the
suspicions of the friend.
I am not so Quixotic, Captain Brant, as to
proclaim
myself the champion of my race, replied the
other. But, in giving you my hand, as I now do,
I will venture to suggest that, if your knowledge of
our usages disinclines you to practise European
urbanity
,
you are not fortunate in your mode of
recommending
Indian courtesyby your own
example
.
Good! said Brant, smiling. Very good!
he repeated, shaking again the hand of him who
had chastened him, while MacDonald, whose
whimsical
expression of countenance showed how much
he was confounded at the odd impression which his
pithy lecture had made upon his half-savage friend,
followed his retreating figure with his eye as the
Mohawk strode out of the apartment.
The infernal strange dog! cried the
Scotchman
;
I never know where the devil to find him.
What, Alan, said Johnson, laughing, is my
red brother Joseph a puzzle to you? An Indian,
man, is like a woman; you must follow his
humours
without attempting to regulate them. Brant's
touches of civilization are like grains of wit in a
madman's brain; they just suffice to mislead him
who would discover some regular system of ideas
in the lunatic's disordered senses. But, for all that,
the fellow has sense and courage, and is as true as
steel in matters of moment.
And thus ended this singular interview, which,
commencing in a scene of passion, that, with its
attendant
grouping of strongly contrasted characters,
might well exercise the pen of the dramatist,
terminated
,
as do most romantic situations in real
life, with commonplace occurrence and discussion;
which, however actual in themselves, detract, it
must be confessed, not a little from the poetic
dignity
of their relation. But these are the days of
fact nor fable; and the legendary writer of our
time must content himself with detailing mere
familiar
tradition, until another
Scott
shall arise to
revivify the dry bones which it is our humble task
to collect together, clothe them anew with all the
attributes of breathing life, and make them walk
the earth afresh, dignified, exalted, and adorned by
the prodigal drapery of immortal Genius.
CHAPTER II.
THE BORDERERS.
When, lo, he saw his courser reined
By an unwelcome hand!
Earl Rupert
.
There
was a proud complacency upon the brow
of the Indian chief when he found himself alone
beyond the precincts of the Hall. The morning
was cold, and the snow lay deep upon the ground;
but while the latter offered no impediment to his
devouring steps as he rapidly stalked along, the
glowing thoughts within his bosom seemed to make
him insensible to the former. His mantle was
indeed
wrapped closely around him, but it was from
the tension of strong emotion that his hands were
clinched in its folds. His open throat and lofty
head, whose plumes tossed in the light breeze that
swept the eminence from which he was
descending
betrayed none of that sensibility to the
elements
which belittles the mien of the cloaked and
cowering form that now confronts him in his path.
It is a half-frozen horseman, who shrinks in his
saddle, as if he would thus make his weight as
light as possible to his jaded steed. The
proportions
of his figure are concealed by a military
roquelaire
wrapped closely around him, and his face
is so muffled up with furs as barely to permit his
eyes to see the road before them; yet both are
instantly recognised by the keen-eyed Mohawk.
Some new emotion now agitates his features, and
a look of sudden wrath has succeeded to that of
Vol. I.Q
calm and pleasurable pride. He stops short in his
rapid walk, and plants himself in the centre of a
little bridge that here crosses the highway, just as
the mounted traveller has gained its opposite side.
The horse recoils at the barbaric apparition in his
path, and his rider, looking up for the first time,
beholds the cause of his affright.
Why, you dd Indian scarecrow, what mean
you by standing there to frighten cattle on the
king's highwaywae, boy! waegently, now,
gentlystand out of my path, you stupid blockhead,
or, God help me, I'll ride right over you. And,
suiting the action to the word, the distempered and
insolent traveller plunged both spurs into his horse,
which bounded forward upon the bridge; but, quick
as light, the sinewy arm of the Indian has grappled
his bridle-rein, and, with starting eye and
distended
nostril, the mastered steed stands trembling.
Why, Joseph Brant, my good fellow! who the
devil expected to meet you here! You must
forgive
my haste in speaking as I did, and I'll pardon
this abrupt salutation in so old a friend, if you'll
only loose my rein and let me push ahead to the
Hall.
There is time enough for that, said the chief,
smothering his indignation at the man's insolent
familiarity
.
What news bring you from below?
Schuyler's within half a day's march, with
three thousand Whig militia; that's all, my good
fellow
;
and now let me carry the news to our friends.
We must up stakes, I take it, from these parts, and
go and lend a lift to the loyalists in the southern
corner of the province: and now, my dear Joseph,
I wish you a good-morning.
Softly, softly, Mr. Bradshawe. There is no
necessity for this great haste. Sir John is is already
in possession of all the news you can give him.
He is? The devil! I met that arch-rebel
Duer, with a brace of kindred Whigs, at a roadside
inn last nightYates and Glen, I think they were;
and I half guessed that their venturing so far in the
valley boded no good to our cause. Surely they
cannot have brought the news, conveyed in the
shape of a threat, from Schuyler?
They were commissioners to settle the terms
of Sir John's surrender, and Schuyler's present
advance
to take possession of Johnstown shows how
well they succeeded.
The countenance of the traveller grew dark as
midnight while Brant thus briefly and coolly told
him of the discomfiture of his party. The chief
waited a moment for him to make some comment,
but his astonishment was so great that he had not a
word wherewith to reply; and Brant, in the same
calm tone, went on. These tidings seem to be
somewhat strange to Mr. Bradshawe. He has kept
himself aloof from his friends of late. It is at least
four months since I heard of him in these parts.
Yes, why, yes, said the other, confusedly.
Some business took me south last summer about
the time the Hawksnest affair and subsequent
disappearance
of young Greyslaer put the country in
hot water. None but you, Joseph, could have been
at the bottom of that hubbub.
I heard of Mr. Bradshawe in Schoharie, said
Brant, dryly, and with an elevation of his eyebrows
so slight as to be almost imperceptible.
Schoharie? Oh!ayyes, I have been in
Schoharie. I've just come, indeed, from down that
way. I heard of this rebel rising while in
Schoharie
,
and rode for dear life to warn Sir John.
It is useless to seek him now upon such an
errand
;
and if Mr. Bradshawe wishes to give his
reasons for having so long kept out of the way of
his political friends, I would advise him to take some
opportunity when the baronet is in a happier mood.
A dd politic suggestion! Josey, you certainly
are no fool. But where the devil are you leading
my mare to?
Why, said Brant, with a careless laugh, two
such suspicious characters as we are should not be
seen holding so long a talk here on the highway,
when, by moving a few yards, we can throw that
knoll between us and any travelling impertinents
that may chance to pass. I would confer with you,
too, Mr. Bradshawe, he added, more gravely, where
we are not liable to interruption.
You are a queer chap, Brant. Leave you alone
to have your own way. But here we are in the
hollow; and now what have you got to say? Be
quick, man, for I'm getting devilish cold.
You will be still colder before I have done with
you, Walter Bradshawe, unless you reply promptly
to my questions.
Why, my good Joseph, what the h
Hold! no more of that, sir; blasphemous and
vulgar-souled as you are, you can still ape the
decorum
of a gentleman when it suits your turn; and
you shall perish here like a crushed hound in the
snow, unless you practise it now.
This to me, you dd Indian dog! cried
Bradshawe
,
jerking his rein with one hand, and plucking
a pistol from his holster with the other. But, before
he could cock the piece, a blow from Brant's
tomahawk
sent it flying through the air into an adjacent
snowbank, while in the same moment the desperado
was hurled from his saddle, and lay prostrate at the
feet of the Mohawk.
One motion, one word, a look of insolence, and
I'll brain you on the spot; that snow-wreath shall
be your winding-sheet, and the April thaws will
alone reveal your fate, if the wolves in the mean
time spare that wretched carcass.
Who the devil thinks of resisting, with knife
and tomahawk both at his throat? Ughugh, you
have knocked all the breath out of my body. Gad!
Brant, you inherit a white man's brawn from your
Dutch grandfather. Hold! you Indian devil; don't
murder me for squinting at a fact which all the
country believes except yourself.
They lie who say I'm other than a Mohawk of
the full blood, exclaimed the Indian, fiercely, but
drawing back, at the same time, as if stung by an
adder.
Perhaps they do; but you'll not prove the
genuineness
of your blood by spilling mine, replied the
other, picking himself leisurely from the ground.
Give me my other pistol, son of Nickus, and we
can dispute the matter more upon an equality.
Bradshawe, you are a brave man, and, as such,
I cannot wholly scorn you; and were your honour
but half as bright as your courage, you should
But enough of this. You will be wise, sir, now, in
fooling no longer with my patience, but reply with
directness to what I have to ask you. You are
reputed
to have sense, Bradshawe, and you see I am
not to be trifled with.
Why, as to my sense, Sachem, it seems to have
been pretty much at fault in dealing with you. I've
always thought you a devilish shrewd fellow for
one who was only quarter white mannay, let that
cursed knife aloneI say I've thought you so,
that's a fact; though I may sometimes have
laughed
in my sleeve when you got on your high ropes,
and put on quality airs like Sir John. I don't
know how it is, however; I still believe you to be
pretty much of an adventurer like myself; but, if
you are not a lineal chief, as your enemies say, by
Q 2
Gd, you deserve to be a born aristocrat for the
neat style in which you do the thing. I speak the
truth, I do, by Gd. I could put it in softer phrase,
as you know full well; for you have seen me
humouring
the shallow fools who ape nobility here
among us provincials. But I talk to you as a man
that can't be come over by flummery; and now go
ahead with your questions, which, I suppose, relate
to the De Roos girl that Red Wolfert snicked off so
handsomely.
Red Wolfert, said Brant, scornfully. Wolfert
Valtmeyer dared not have touched captive of mine
but as the instrument of a more powerful scoundrel
than himself; and you, Bradshawe, must answer
for the acts of your creature. Where is Miss De
Roos?
Where? Ask Wolfert. If I use the rascal
now and then to farther our political intrigues, does
it follow that I know aught of his amorous doings?
I suspected that you would hold me accountable for
his dealings with this wench; for it certainly was a
bold flight for such a kite as Valtmeyer to strike at
game like her.
Beware, Mr. Bradshawe; there are limits to
my patience, and you cannot deceive me. It was
through your aid that Au-neh-yesh escaped from
the hands of the rebels. He repaid you with
information
that you valued beyond aught else, for no
scruple could prevent you from availing yourself of
it to tear the young lady from the refuge in which I
had placed her. You, and you only, with the
ruffian
Valtmeyer and my wayward and unhappy son
for your instruments, have spirited away this girl,
for whose safety both our friends and our foes hold
me now accountable. Bradshawe, I tell you, if one
hair of her head be injured, I will wreak vengeance
so dire that men shall stand aghast when they hear
of it. The tortures of the Indian stake shall be
merciful to those which you shall suffer, till the
hapless fate of Thayendanagea's captive is
forgotten
in the hideous punishment of her destroyer.
The voice of Brant was calm and low as he
pronounced
these words; but the ascendancy of his
mind was now so completely established over that
of Bradshawe, that, daring and reckless as he was,
they fell with withering effect upon his spirit; and
he even, for a moment, shivered like the criminal
who has just heard his awful and irrevocable doom
passing the lips of one who is endowed with all
earthly authority to inflict the final sentence of a
judicial tribunal.
She is safeI believeI knowshe isshe
must be safe, stammered forth the bold borderer,
who, for the first time in his life perhaps, felt
conscious
that his heart quailed and his cheek blanched
beneath the eye of a fellow-mortal. I left her last
where I believed no earthly harm could reach her;
and, so help me Heaven, Sachem, there breathes
no human being whom, with my life, I would
sooner
guard from injury than this same lady.
Yes! as the cougar would protect the hare from
the wolf that disputes his prey with him. Where
left you Miss De Roos?
The distressed air of mortification that now
marked
Bradshawe's features showed that he would
gladly evade the question. He even turned his
head quickly on one side, as if recourse to flight
suddenly suggested itself upon the emergency. But
the snowdrift that walled in the little hollow in
which he stood shut out the desperate hope on that
side. He turned his eager gaze to the other, but it
straightway fell before the basilisk eye of the
Indian
,
who, still grasping the bridle of Bradshawe's
horse, stood with one foot advanced, and his right
hand upon his knife, warily watching his victim.
But the hand fell to his side, the foot was drawn
back, and the deadly glare of his eye changed to a
cold and stony gaze in the moment that the
crestfallen
borderer slunk back to his former dogged
attitude
of unresisting dejection.
Where is the lady? repeated Brant, between
his clinched teeth.
Take my secret, then, if I must speakthe
Cave of Waneonda, where the stream which you
Indians call the River of Ghosts holds its way far
under ground beneath the forests of Schoharie, there
in theHah! what sounds are those? May my
tongue be blistered if its swiftness to betray has
'Tis Schuyler's advancing column. I know the
sound of his bugles, cried Brant, uneasily; and,
even as he spoke, a squadron of troopers, who
formed
the advanced guard of the Republican forces,
wheeled around an angle of the road, and came
galloping forward in all the hasty disorder of
newly-levied
militia flushed with their first success in
the operations of war.
Their common dangerfor Brant and his recent
adversary were, on personal as well as political
grounds, equally obnoxious to the popular party in
their districtimpelled them to simultaneous flight.
But even at such an exigency, when his life
seemed
on the point of being yielded up to the sabres of
this lawless and hot-headed soldiery, the generosity
of the chieftain did not desert him. Save
yourself
,
cried he to Bradshawe, in the same moment
flinging his bridle into the hand of the royalist
officer
.
But remember! if you have deceived me
here, you had better perish on this spot than live to
meet my vengeance.
The last words were either unheard or
unheeded
by Bradshawe. He made no reply, but, leaping
swiftly into his saddle, struck the spurs into his
horse, and dashed across the fields, so as to turn
the right flank of the advancing party, and place a
hill between himself and the threatening danger.
He had emerged from the hollow so suddenly that
he gained a hundred yards almost from his
starting-place
before he was observed by the troopers.
And it was well for him that such was the case;
for, as his dark figure swept the snowy waste, it
offered so distinct a mark for the yeomanry
sharpshooters
,
that the volley which they fired, after
vainly
hailing him, must inevitably have proved fatal
but for the distance. The militiamen, as Brant had
perhaps anticipated, instantly wheeled from the
road, and with tumultuous cries launched in
pursuit
of the flying officer; and, though the chase was
abandoned with equal suddenness when they found
themselves floundering through deep snowdrifts
after
a fugitive as well mounted as themselves, and
who had soon placed a ridge of upland between
himself and their fire, yet the circle which they
made in again recovering the road enabled the
stealthy Indian to glide unseen along a snowy
swale, and shelter himself in a thicket of
evergreens
,
from which he soon seized an opportunity
to escape into the deep forest.
Brant did not retire, however, until he had first
seen the march of the Congressional army, whose
main body was now at hand. The forces were
newly leyied; but, though exhibiting few of the
disciplined
traits of veteran soldiery, yet the sturdy
yeomanry wore individually that martial air which
characterizes Frontiers-men skilled from their
boyhood
to the use of arms, alike in the wild
forest-hunt
and the Indian foray. The clump of cedars
in which Brant had ensconced himself crowned a
rocky knoll which commanded a turning of the
road; and the stern though dejected mien with which
he looked upon the pageant; the gaze, half sullen,
half admiring, which he fixed upon the serried
battalion
,
as banner, and plume, and fluttering scarf,
and bright bayonet flashing in the frosty air, swept
beneath his view, might have marked the chief as
the personified genius of his fated race; a warrior
prophet, who gazed admiringly upon the battle
cloud whose thunders he knew must destroy his
people.
CHAPTER III.
THE FASTNESS.
But see, along that mountain's slope, a fiery horseman ride,
Mark his torn plume, his tarnished belt, the sabre at his side;
His spurs are buried rowel deep, he rides with loosened rein,
There's blood upon his charger's flank, and foam upon his mane;
He speeds reward the olive-grove, along that shaded hill,
God shield the helpless maiden there, if he should mean her ill.
Bryant
.
Bradshawe
, after the interview which had been
so abruptly commenced and broken off with Brant,
lost no time in making his escape from the precincts
of Johnstown, where the presence of the patriot
forces made every moment fraught with peril to
him. Indeed, after escaping so nearly from their
hands, he was obliged more than once to make a
wide circuit in order to avoid the straggling bands
of Whig militia that seemed pouring along the
roads, bent upon making their way to join the main
column of Schuyler's army.
Schoharie was the point which he now aimed at
making as quickly as possible; and as it was long
before he could venture to cross the frozen river and
turn his horse's head upon the direct route he
wished
to travel, the noble animal had occasion more
than once to rue the brutal temper of his master, as,
chafing with impatience at each cause of delay that
interposed, he now spurred hotly toward the bank
of the stream, and now wheeled from its brink, or
reined up sharply at some turning of the road.
Here the rapids, or the evident weakness of the ice,
prevented him from crossing; there the deep
snowdrifts
,
or the steep and slippery banks, prevented
him from descending to the frozen highway; and
now again there were appearances upon the
opposite
shore which deterred him from trusting himself
upon the snowy waste, where his dark figure
crossing
over might be seen at a long gunshot, and tempt
some idle patriot ranger, or officious
committee-of-safety
member to bring him to for a parley.
The immediate personal peril weighed not,
indeed
,
a feather with him. But to be recognised
and tracked in the snow to his ultimate destination
might be fatal to the projects which he had now
most at heart. The truth is, that, though Bradshawe
had, when he found himself so hard pressed by
Brant, designated the Cave of Waneonda as the
present retreat of Alida, he was not himself
perfectly
assured that she was really there, though his
last orders to his creature Valtmeyer had been to
make that disposition of his prize; and, believing
that his wishes in this respect had been complied
with, he was actually upon his way to the cavern,
when the rumoured approach of Schuyler induced
him momentarily to change his destination, and
make the best of his way to Sir John Johnson.
Brant, as it appeared, had been misinformed as to
Bradshawe's keeping himself aloof from his political
friends, and attending to his own concerns in
Schoharie
.
His actual business had been among the
Tories in the neighbourhood of Wyoming, whom
he succeeded in confirming, and drawing off in a
body, to unite their forces with a band of Iroquois
which had established a position about the forks of
the Susquehanna, upon the confines of New-York
and Pennsylvania. And this absence in that then
unsettled country will account for his ignorance of
the projected movement and subsequent march of
the patriots upon Johnstown, until he had reached
the southwestern settlements of Tryon county.
He had unexpectedly, upon an order from Sir
John, started upon his expedition immediately after
planning the abduction of Brant's fair captive,
which was so ruthlessly consummated by his
creature
Valtmeyer. He had heard of Valtmeyer's
success
only through an Indian runner charged with
letters from Sir John, by whom Valtmeyer also
contrived
to transmit intelligence from himself. The
tidings from either spoke of the precarious
condition
of their party, and Bradshawe determined that,
whatever course public affairs might take, his own
private views should not necessarily be thwarted.
At present he thought only how he could best
make sure of the prey which Valtmeyer had thus
far secured for him.
That ruffian, immediately upon the seizure of his
victim, had, by the aid of confederates, transported
her to a lonely cabin upon the skirts of the
settlements
,
where a thrifty innkeeper, privately
associated
with the outlaw in certain matters of business
best known to themselves, maintained a small
establishment
,
which he dignified with the name of his
Dairy Farm.
The inn of mine host lay some miles distant from
this possession upon the public highway. During
the first months of the present troubles it had been
used alike by both parties as a rendezvous for their
public meetings. But as the cause of the Whigs
advanced in popularity, the opposite faction
appeared
to have withdrawn their patronage from the house,
though there were some shrewd surmises that the
landlord did not therefore suffer in his coffers. But
when it was whispered that the Dairy Farm
harboured
a nest of Tory spies, and served merely as
a sort of scouting-post to collect political gossip
Vol. I.R
from the inn below, the close inquiry that was at
once instituted, followed by an examination of the
tavern-keeper before a committee of safety, elicited
nothing to inculpate that worthy, and, as every one
thought, much-injured individual.
An old black woman and a strapping mulatto lass,
whose labours in the dairy were superintended, from
time to time, by the pretty daughter of the
proprietor
,
seemed the only permanent or occasional
occupants
of the place. The old woman was deaf and
suffering from rheumatism; the mulatto seemed an
exception to the generality of her quick-witted race,
in being as stolid and stupid of intellect as she was
simple and ignorant; and the pretty Tavy Wingear
was known the country round as a sprightly, frank,
and guileless girl, whom no one would think of
making
the depositary of a political secret. All
suspicions
about the Dairy Farm were allayed, and it
became nearly as safe a house for the royalist
partisans
as ever, until the affair of the Hawksnest,
subsequent to which the Tories had been shy of
holding their secret meetings anywhere in this
immediate
neighbourhood.
Such was the spot to which Valtmeyer bore his
prisoner; and here, having the two Africans to
attend
upon her, Alida had passed even months, with
no signs of approaching rescue to cheer her solitude.
Valtmeyer was often, though never for any length
of time, absent from the house; and irksome as this
imprisonment became, yet, though he proffered her
the full range of the premises whenever his eye was
there to watch her motions, this was just the season
when confinement to her chamber became most
welcome
.
Long weeks wore on, and the hope of release
became
almost extinct in her bosom. The summer
was gone; autumn, with its varied tints, made the
forests around like one gorgeous bed of tulips to the
eye. Winter was at hand, with all its icy rigours;
yet the lapse of the seasons and the change of the
foliage, as she viewed it from her window, was all
that varied the monotonous hours of the unhappy
Alida. Once, indeed, and only a few days after she
was first immured in this lonely spot, her heart
leaped
as she heard the blithe tones of a gay young
female
voice beneath her window. But, flying to the
casement, she was scarcely permitted to catch a
glimpse of the young woman from whose lips came
the cheering sound, before Valtmeyer had rushed
into her apartment and rudely drawn her back from
the window.
Upon two other occasions she heard the same
tones at a distance; and once, before the autumn
became sere, she had seen a stranger female afar off,
gathering flowers upon the hillside, while a
Canadian
pony stood grazing near her. The next
moment
the country damsel leaped into her saddle, and,
galloping gayly past the house, guided her active
pony amid the stumps of the clearing until she had
reached the road, and soon after disappeared to the
view of Alida. The sight of that free-limbed
courser
,
and the thought of escape which its appearance
suggested, awakened a fresh yearning for freedom
that was all but maddening. But neither the horse
nor the rider ever appeared again.
As the winter set in, however, a change of scene,
if not a release from imprisonment, was soon to be
realized by the unoffending captive. Bradshawe,
alarmed for the security of his prey, had written to
Valtmeyer by the runner who had brought him a
missive from that worthy confederate, giving a
glowing
account of his successful adventure. His letter
urged Valtmeyer to lose no time in moving Miss
De Roos from so dangerous a neighbourhood. For
Alida's friends were scouring the country round for
traces of Thayendanagea's captive.
Her fickle-minded but high-spirited brother, so
far from slackening in his endeavour to rescue her
after the first ill-starred attempt already
commemorated
,
had twice beaten up the Mohawk's quarters
with a strong band of border yeomanry; nor did he
give up dogging the movements of Brant until the
chief had crossed the frontier and passed into
Canada
for a season. Despairing, then, of recovering
his sister by the means hitherto used, Derrick had
made his way to the head-quarters of the patriot
army, where, offering his sword to his country, he
lived in the hope of obtaining tidings of the lost Alida
through the medium of the first flag of truce that
should be sent to the royalist generals in Canada.
Balt, too, the humble but zealous friend of the
Hawksnest family, adopting less readily the belief
that Brant had removed his captive across the
frontier
,
had, after accompanying Derrick in his
bootless
wildwood quest at the north, renewed a diligent
search among the haunts of the Tories nearer home.
It was the restless and prying offices of this faithful
fellowwhich Valtmeyer, with characteristic
hardihood
,
seemed to make light of when detailing them to
his employerthat awakened the anxiety of
Bradshawe
for the better security of his prize; and his
letter designated a remarkable cavern in Schoharie
county, well known both to the outlaw and his
ruffian
principal as the best retreat for security; and it
commanded that, as soon as the winter snows should
allow of easy and rapid transportation, a covered
sleigh should convey Alida, her two attendants, and
such furniture as would be indispensable, to this
dungeon fastness. A valuable farm on the German
Flats, with the promised manumission of the
African
servants, who were actually the slaves of
Bradshawe
,
was the promised reward for these services
if they should be faithfully and effectually rendered.
This letter was the last communication which
Bradshawe had held with the lawless instrument of
his crimes. He was now about to realize how far
his behests had been obeyed. He burned with
impatience to ascertain the result of Valtmeyer's
machinations, and he ground his teeth in wrath at
the thought that the momentary quailing of his
spirit
before that of Brant had betrayed his secret,
endangered
his final triumph over Alida, and perhaps
compromised the safety alike of his confederate and
himself. His horse had long since become
way-worn
and jaded; still it was scarcely possible that
Brant, though he might have taken a more direct
course for the cavern, could on foot accomplish the
journey as soon as himself. His rage and vexation
at the bare possibility were for a moment
insupportable
;
and then, as he ferociously vented his
feelings
upon his tired steed, struggling now with
difficulty
through the deep snowdrifts, he became calmer
the next instant upon remembering that Brant was
alone, and that Valtmeyer, in performing his duty
of castellan, might possibly despatch the officious
and insolent Mohawk.
In the mean time, as the short winter's day
approached
to a close, Bradshawe himself began to
suffer for the want of refreshment; and he was
compelled to admit, at last, that it was impossible
for his horse to proceed farther, and that he would
prove useless on the morrow unless the wants of
the animal were soon administered to. And,
fortunately
for both, an asylum soon presented itself in
the deserted cabin of some fugitive settler, whom
fear of the Indians had driven from his solitary
clearing in the forest to some safer home.
storm of rain and sleet set in a few moments
R 2
after the horsemen gained this welcome shelter;
but he heeded not its peltings without, as, after
tethering his horse in one corner of the shanty, he
kindled a fire upon the hearth, and by its light
discovered
a pile of unshocked corn, which he soon
laid under contribution, both for himself and his
steed. He foddered the horse, while still heated,
with the dried blades and husks only, busying
himself
in the mean time with shelling the ears. The
grain thus procured was partly pounded up, and,
by the aid of snow-water, converted into hoe-cakes,
which were soon roasting by the fire. The rest of
it, with a dozen more loose ears, he placed before
his horse after this frugal supper was served; nor
did Bradshawe resign himself to rest before, like
an experienced trooper, he had well groomed his
noble steed, by using the husks and cobs of the
maize as a substitute for the straw whisp and brush,
to which the animal's glossy coat showed he was
accustomed. His fire, in the mean time, he fed with
an armful of fuel from the same pile which had
supplied him with provisions. It blazed up so as
to fill the whole cabin with a ruddy light as the dry
blades were first ignited, crackled and sputtered for
a few moments as the grains of corn became
parched
and split by the heat, and then subsided into a
bed of glowing brands as the dry cobs were seized
upon by the element.
And why, thought Bradshawe, as, wrapped in
his cloak, he now stretched himself out for repose,
why may not the burning of this indigenous plant
be emblematic of the career of the thousands of my
countrymen who are reared almost upon it alone.
Here is the quick flash of their first outbreak of
rebellion
,
the noisy sputtering far and wide, in which
men more wise than myself thought that it would
vent itself and have an end. And here are the live
coals at the bottom, that will burn on steady through
this long winter's night!Pshaw! what care I,
though, if men are such asses as to light the fire, so
I only can warm my fingers by the blaze? And,
concluding his unwonted strain of thought with this
characteristic reflection, the worthy trooper resigned
himself to slumber.
The dawn found Bradshawe again upon his
journey
.
But the rain of the preceding night,
followed
by one of those mild, foggy days which
sometimes
occur in midwinter, made his road a difficult
one: the half-thawed snow was converted into slush,
which, yielding and slipping beneath his horse's
feet, made the track at once heavy and insecure.
The rivulets upon the hillside too, released for a
brief period from their icy fetters, were swollen
frequently to torrents, which were absolutely
perilous
in the passage. The road he was traversing
could scarcely, indeed, be dignified with the title of
a bridle-path; and though the cavern toward which
he was urging his course has of late years been
frequently visited by the curious, it would be
difficult
to designate the route by which Bradshawe
had hitherto approached it by any precise
geographical
data of the present day.
CHAPTER IV.
THE CAVERN OF WANEONDA.
Earth hath her wondrous scenes, but few like this.
The everlasting surge hath worn itself
A pathway in the solid rock; and there,
Far in those caverned chambers, where the warm,
Sweet sunlight enters not, is heard the war
Of hidden waves, imprisoned tempestsbursting
Anon like thunder; then, with low, deep moan,
Falling upon the earthe mournful wail,
As Indian legends say, of spirits accursed.
Mrs. Ellet
.
In
the hilly region of Schoharie county, where
the Onidegra ridge of the Helderburg mountains
extends its flanking battlements of perpendicular
rock along the lovely vale of the Schoharie kill,
there ran in former days an old Indian pathway.
The principal route between Schoharie
court-house
and the hamlets to the east and west of that
settlement, as well as the great Indian trail between
Catskill and Canajoharie, had a course nearly
parallel
with this path, and it had therefore been
neglected
for so many years as to be nearly forgotten
by every one, save some roving Indian that now
and then straggled into the settlements, or the white
hunter, who, tired with traversing the forest thickets
and rocky defiles of the adjacent mountains, took
his homeward way along this secluded but
well-beaten
path.
This trail, where Bradshawe was now travelling
it, was walled by huge buttresses of rock upon the
west, while its terraced edge commanded, through
the leafless trees, a complete view of the vale of the
Schoharie upon the east; and as a burst of sunshine
ever and anon lighted up with smiles that landscape
which even in winter is most lovely, even the heart
of so reckless an adventurer was touched with the
idea of carrying rapine and devastation into a scene
so exquisitely calm and rural; yet such, thought
he, with a sternness more in unison with his
general
character, such is our only policy, if the king's
party ever again get the ascendancy in the district.
We must take the hearthstones from under these
people, and then they'll bother us no longer about
their parchment privileges.
Alas! did Bradshawe mean to prophesy that
Johnson and his bands should sweep, like the
besom
of desolation, over this fated region within two
years afterward? Did he foresee the part which
men as ruthless as himself should play in those
dark days of monstrous violence?
But now, as he remembers the devious route that
he has travelled to avoid the settlements, and looks
back upon the road behind him, circling wide to the
east and south of his ultimate destination, the
desperado
remembers again that Brant may have
reached
it before him. He spurs his horse along the
narrow path, descends toward the valley,
approaches
the village, wheels off, skirts the valley, and,
ascending
once more, tracks his way through a forest
of walnut and maples, and arrives at last at the
yawning mouth of Waneonda.
A moment sufficed Bradshawe to secure his
horse, and then he impatiently hurried to descend.
The top of the pit, some twenty or thirty feet in
diameter
,
was wholly hidden from the eye by some
huge trees which had probably been felled across it
purposely to screen the opening. But their roots
were so grown around with thickets, and the trunks
lay tossed about in such disorder, that no design
was apparent in their arrangement; and they might
have been thought to be blown down by the wind,
or fallen from natural decay precisely where they
now lay.
Below this funnel-like cavity, which was not more
than ten feet in depth, there opened a narrow
fissure
about half that breadth, but extending
downward
into perfect darkness. The top of this black
chasm was likewise crossed by several sticks of
timber; and to the stoutest and longest of these
was attached a perpendicular ladder of rope fifty
feet in length, secured by the lower end to the rocks
below. The ladder was coated with ice, and
Bradshawe
was compelled to clutch closely the frozen
rungs as his feet slipped repeatedly in descending.
A sloping declivity of rocks received him; and so
rough and precipitous was his pathway, now
rendered
doubly perilous by the mud and half-frozen
slime from the dripping walls above, that he would
scarcely have dared to venture farther amid the
darkness that reigned below. But, groping about
for a few moments, he felt the broken limb of a tree,
and, passing his hand along it toward the trunk,
discovered that a new convenience had been
provided
since last he visited the spot, and he readily
perceived that it must have been for the
accommodation
of Alida that the ponderous piece of timber
had been plunged down and placed in its present
situation. Lowering himself down the tree in an
oblique direction, he soon entirely lost sight of the
opening above him; and the temperature of the cave
became so mild that traces of ice were no longer
discovered. A ladder of wood then gave him a
firmer foothold down the third descent; and a fourth
declivity of rough rocks brought him to the bottom
of the cavern.
The adventurer was now one hundred and fifty
feet beneath the surface of the soil; and no one,
unless
as perfectly familiar with the cave as was
Bradshawe
,
could have safely effected the descent amid
the darkness which reigned around him. The
horizontal
passage in which he now found himself was
about ten or twelve feet in breadth, nearly half of
which space was occupied by a rivulet running in a
southern direction; and, keeping as close to the wall
on his left as possible, Bradshawe followed it for a
few paces, until the roof of the cavern drooped so
low that he could feel it with his outstretched hands
as he placed them before him. Dropping now upon
his knees, he crawled along for several yards, until
his eyes were greeted by a stream of light which
came through a narrow aperture on the left. He
crawled through the opening, and entered an
apartment
some thirty feet in diameter by a hundred or
more in height.
Had Bradshawe possessed a taste for the grand
and beautiful in nature, the appearance of this
chamber might have arrested his attention. The
ceiling was fretted with stalactites; the walls hung
with a rich tracery of spar, which likewise, in a
thousand fantastic forms, encumbered the floor upon
which, in the course of ages, its broken fragments
had fallen. But a solitary lamp, fed with bear's fat,
which stood upon a truncated column in the centre,
dimly revealing the glistening objects around,
seemed
only to claim his attention as he eagerly
advanced
toward it. A bugle lay by the side of the lamp;
and, taking the latter only in his hand, he repassed
through the fissure which had admitted him into
the Warder's Room, as it was called by his
followers
,
and regained the low-arched passage from which
he had temporarily digressed.
Crawling now cautiously a few paces in advance,
he paused and, placing the bugle to his lips, blew
a blast which resounded through the cavern.
Several
minutes now elapsed; the last rumbling echoes
seemed to have traversed every chamber of the
cavern
which could send back a sound, and died away
at last in some unfathomable abyss remote from them
all. At last a sound like the dip of an Indian paddle
was heard. A shred of light then seemed to
flicker
upon the bottom of the cave, like a glow-worm
crawling along its floor toward him. A moment
after the feeble ray became stronger, and separated
itself into two dots of light, which were still
approaching
;
and then, again, from the brighter
reflection
upon the water as the taper now neared
Bradshawe, it could be seen that he was standing
upon the brink of a subterranean lake, and that a
canoe, with one solitary voyager, was approaching
him.
Valtmeyer, is he here, my good Charon?
asked
Bradshawe of the deformed half-breed that
steered
the canoe, as the man turned a rocky
promontory
on the left, and suddenly presented his features
in full view by the ruddy torchlight.
He is here, captain, replied the Hunchback,
respectfully.
And the lady?
I know nothing of the lady since the first day
she came down among us, when I carried her
along the River of Ghosts to the chamber at the
north end of the cavern, which our men call the
`Chapel.'
And has no one else been here?
Not a soul but Red Wolfert, and he seems to
go near her as seldom as possible.
It is well. Shove off.
There was a silence for a few moments as the
shallop kept her way over the deep and mysterious
flood; and Bradshawe, as he sat with folded arms
in the stern, seemed busied only in trying to pierce
with his eye the undiscoverable height of the black
vault above him.
Who of my band are here? he at length
resumed
,
abruptly.
Not those whom you value most; and some,
perhaps, who should never have been trusted with
the secret of the cave. But Syl Stickney says that
things are going so badly above, that we must find
hiding-places for our friends if we'd have them stick
to the cause, and Wolfert therefore forgave him
for bringing them down.
Syl Stickney and be dd to him! I must
pistol
that officious rascal some cold morning,
muttered
Bradshawe; and then added aloud, And have
these fellows seen the lady?
Neither they nor Syl. Syl only guesses that
there is some mystery shut up at the other end of
the cave; for Wolfert has forbidden that the
newcomers
should be told there is such a place as the
Chapel; and he swears he'll cut Syl's throat if he
approaches it.
Admirable Wolfert! said Bradshawe,
mentally
;
thou hast thus far been the truest of ruffians,
and well earned thy reward.
The boat had now reached the farther shore of
this Black Acheron, where a shelving
indentation
among the steep rocks affords a landing-place
to the voyager, who, having passed the gulf,
proposes
to penetrate the Cimmerian region beyond.
This enterprise, though unattended with danger, is
sufficiently awe-inspiring to any one who has been
ferried over that dark, still river, upon which no
beam of sunshine has ever fallen. But a man less
bold than Bradshawe might have shrunk from
adventuring
farther, if unfamiliar with the sounds
which now met his ear as he scaled a rough ascent
leading up from the water side; for never from
Tartarus
Vol. I.S
itself arose a wilder discord of horrid
blasphemy
,
intermingled with drunken laughter. The
strange, unearthly oaths, echoed from the hollow
depths around, seemed to tremble long in air, as if
it
thickened
with the damning sounds, and held them
there suspended as in their proper element. The
peals of eldrich merriment were first shrilly
reverberated
as in mockery from the vaulted roof; and
then, as if flung back into some lower pit, some
burial-house of mirth, died away in a sullen moan
beneath his very feet.
This strange confusion of sounds, however, lost
its effect upon the ear the moment Bradshawe had
entered the outlaws' banqueting hall, where he
suddenly
presented himself in the midst of his men,
who, in every variety of costume, were variously
grouped about the vast circular chamber. Some
were carousing deeply around a board well filled
with flagons; some, seated upon the ground, were
deep in a game of cards together; the rattling of
a dice-box betrayed the not dissimilar occupation
of two others; while some, more remote from the
rest, were amusing themselves with jumping for a
wager, and other feats of strength and agility. The
size of this apartment, which formed a rotunda forty
paces in diameter by fifty feet in height, afforded
ample room for all this diversity of occupation.
Syl Stickney and others of Bradshawe's Tory
followers
,
who were not willing to identify themselves
completely with Valtmeyer's especial band of
outlaws
,
though they had long consorted with them,
kept partially aloof; a herd of them being
collected
around the worthy Sylla himself, who, with a
tankard by his side and a pipe in his mouth, sat
upon a ponderous fragment of fallen spar,
discoursing
much to his own satisfaction, if not to that of
his hearers.
Why, do tell! he exclaimed, breaking off in
his discourse, if there aint the capting now! Did
I ever! Why, capting, I was jist saying to my
brother Marius and these gentlemen
Your brother Marius be dd. Keep your seats,
gentlemen. Stickney, where's Valtmeyer?
I guess, if you follow the turning to the right,
you'll find him in one of the chambers to the north
o' this, said the cool Syl, without ever moving from
his seat to salute or welcome his officer.
Nay, my good fellows, said Bradshawe, turning
to the others, who were beginning to explain how
they had become his guests in his absence, the
king's friends are always welcome to any shelter I
can afford them; and I ought, perhaps, to thank our
friend Stickney here for gaining such valuable
recruits
for my band in times like these.
Ought ye, raaly, capting? Well, now, that's
jist what I told Red Wolfert when he showed signs
of kicking up a muss, case, when I went up into
daylight one day to lift a rebel sheep or two, `
Wolfert
,'
says Ibut, by darn, the capting's cleared out
without speaking to one of the company but
ourselves
.
And, true enough, Bradshawe, seizing a
torch from a cleft in the rock, had glided out of the
apartment, unobserved by all save those who had
marked his entrance.
Taking now a northern direction, he soon
encountered
the outlaw in a long narrow passage
leading
from some secret chamber where arms and
munitions were said to be kept, but which
Valtmeyer
probably appropriated to the stowage of
booty; a matter which Bradshawe, who did not
care to mix himself up with the predatory doings
of his lieutenant, never inquired into. Valtmeyer,
exchanging but few words with his leader for the
present, led him back to the Outlaws' Hall, where
every one seemed to be too much engaged in their
own pastime to notice them, as, passing along the
wall on one side, Bradshawe entered a narrow
aperture
toward the south, leading to a distinct suite of
apartments. Here Valtmeyer soon brought him
the refreshment he so much needed after the toils
he had undergone.
In one of these chambers, where the air was ever
cooled and kept in motion by the dripping of water
from above, a thin plate of stone upon which it fell
emitted a sound not unlike that which proceeds
from the body of a guitar or other stringed
instrument
when the wooden part is lightly tapped by the
finger. These monotonous tones, varying only at
times to a higher and wilder key, as if the cords of
the instrument were swept by some unseen hand,
mingled strangely with the low murmur of their
voices as the two adventurers conversed together;
while the huge Cyclopean frame of the freebooter,
and fiery eye and reckless features of the Tory
captain
which
looked doubly wan by the blazing torch
that the other held before them while sitting in deep
shadow himselfformed one of those studies which
the old masters so loved to paint.
A few moments sufficed Bradshawe to despatch
his hasty meal, and possess himself of all the
information
which his zealous coadjutor had to
impart
;
and, repassing again through the Outlaws'
Hall, without pausing to make himself known to the
half-drunken revellers who were still grouped about
it much in the same attitudes in which they were
first introduced to the reader, he motioned silently
to the wierd-looking ferryman who had brought him
into these gloomy realms, and once more regained
the shores of the subterranean lake.
The black pool was then again crossed; and,
passing by the Warder's Room on the right, the two
pursued the arched passage which Bradshawe had
before traversed, until they came to the open space
in the cave where he had first reached the bottom
in descending from the region of daylight to these
grim abodes.
The cloistered arches above rose so loftily that
the roof was shrouded in impenetrable darkness;
and here, through a small aperture in the wall on
the left, was again heard the sound of water. It
seemed not to be a still, sullen lake, like that he had
just crossed, but a flowing river, whose waves
dashed
heavily and slowly against the cavernous rocks
which confined them on either side; and now, taking
a torch and paddle in his hands, and placing himself
in a recumbent posture in a boat barely large enough
to admit of its being pushed through the crevice,
Bradshawe, by the aid of the half-breed, entered
the opening in the curtain of rock, and launched
upon the stream beyond.
The subterranean voyager, who first pushed
himself
along with his hands only, soon found the vault
to enlarge above him, so that he could sit erect in
the boat and use his paddle. The water, so clear
that his torchlight gleamed upon the bottom some
thirty feet below him, was only broken at long
intervals
by a mimic cascade scarcely a foot in height,
over which he easily lifted his shallop, and
proceeded
upon his errand to the distant chamber where
Alida was immured. In this spacious apartment
Valtmeyer had partitioned off a dry place by
erecting
a bark shanty over it, and made other provisions
for the unhappy female, from whom, in the outlaw's
slang, it took its name of The Lady's Chapel. But
Bradshawe has now gained the threshold of that the
dreariest bower in which Beauty ever yet received
her suiter, and we must pause before venturing to
describe the strange and painful interview between
them.
S 2
CHAPTER V.
THE INTERVIEW.
Hernando
. Thou art here
Wholly within my power; now, as a guest,
Fair cousin, be less scornful.
Izidora
. Thou wouldst not dare to wrong me!
Hernando
. I would be
Loth to do that; I claim thy hand;
If thou dost scorn me, lady, then beware!
Velasco
,
by
Epes Sargent
.
The hallowed honour that protects a maid
Is round me like a circle of bright fire;
A savage would not cross it, nor shall you.
I'm mistress of my presenceleave me, sir.
Willis
.
The
ruffian Valtmeyer had not, as we have
hinted
,
been wholly unmindful of the comfort of his
captive when dragging her from the light of day
to become the tenant of this dungeon-like abode.
Whether this considerateness arose from motives
utterly selfish, or whether the outlaw had really
some latent sparks of kindness in his rude bosom,
it is impossible to say. But certainly he had been
at much pains in preparing the Chapel for its
occupant
before he ever brought her to the cave.
The spot which he had selected for her tent or
wigwam of birchen bark had been smoothed by
filling
up its inequalities with dry leaves; and these,
when covered by a piece of Indian matting,
afforded
an elastic and comfortable carpet. Hither he
had, too, with much troublefrom the difficulty of
transporting articles of any bulk through these
sinuous
vaultsconveyed bedding, a chair or two, a
tablewhich he was obliged to take to pieces, and
which cost him many an oath in reconstructing
and other household articles. Nor had he
forgotten
even the ordinary kitchen utensils when
preparing
one corner of the Chapel for the
accommodation
of the two coloured women who were to
attend
upon Alida.
It was probably owing to these arrangements
chiefly that the health of Miss De Roos was not
utterly prostrated by the long weeks she was
compelled
to pass in the gloomy vaults of Waneonda.
For though the air of this remarkable cavern is said
to be perfectly pure, and the temperature mild and
equable, yet such utter exclusion from the light of
day must always be more or less prejudicial,
especially
to one whose anxious spirit is so worn by
emotion that the frame needs all fostering care to
prevent its giving way and releasing the throbbing
tenant.
But the thought of Death, which, to most
characters
in her situation, would often have suggested
itself as a refuge, had perhaps never once occurred
to Alida de Roos. She neither wished for it nor
feared it. But she did fear that her bodily strength
might give way; her mind become enfeebled with
the decay of her health; that mind, upon whose
inborn
and conscious energies she so haughtily relied
in the last emergency to which she might be
driven
.
She did fear that the greatest trial of its
ascendency
and its powersfor she knew that she was
in Bradshawe's handsmight be deferred till her
faculties were impaired by suffering and her
hitherto
indomitable spirit overborne.
The thought that those faculties might fail their
mistress, and that she might fall irretrievably into the
power of Bradshawe, was maddening to her. She
revolted from it whenever it swept athwart her
brain. She tried to forget her sorrows; she refused
to entertain her griefs; she endeavoured to postpone,
as it were, reflecting upon the full horrors of her
situation; and she caught at every object within her
reach that could occupy her attention, if it did not
amuse her mind. She divided their duties with her
attendants, and assumed all those which appertained
immediately to the care of her own person; she
borrowed
her needle of the mulatto, who was glad of
an excuse for remaining unemployed, and sleeping
away the indolent and monotonous hours; and,
listening
for hours to her dotard prating, she drew
from the elder negress all the superstitious lore
which formed the only furniture wherewith the mind
of the decrepit crone was supplied.
Alida unwittingly thus attached these humble
companions to her; and as their simple-hearted
affection
more and more manifested itself, she began
at last to derive a certain solace from their
sympathy
which actually approached to pleasure in their
society. The dungeon-doomed captive, who, in
his solitary misery, has made friends of animals
that belong to the very lowest and most loathsome
orders of created beings, can alone, perhaps,
appreciate
this growth of friendship between a mind the
most gifted and refined, and those the least tutored
and liberalized.
On the dayif the phrase be allowable in regions
where night alone hath, since creation, reigned
on the day that Bradshawe came on his stern errand
to the Lady's Chapel, Alida had, from some slight
indisposition, remained withdrawn in her tent; and
the two blacks, for the purpose of washing some
household articles, had kindled a fire upon the brink
of the stream, within a few yards of its door, where
they sat watching a boiling kettle, and chattering
together after the manner of their loquacious race.
The sound of their voices prevented their hearing
Bradshawe's approach; and as he extinguished his
torch the moment he came within the guiding light
of their fire, he was wholly unobserved till he stood
suddenly before them.
The shriek they simultaneously uttered at the
apparition startled Alida from her couch, and she
sprang to her feet, lifting, at the same time, the
curtain
of her tent, so that the light of a lamp
suspended
from within fell brokenly across her loosely
arrayed
person.
Bradshawe, motioning with the back of his hand
as if he would cuff the negroes aside, pushed his
way at once rudely between them. Shut up, you
squalling black brutes, cried the ruffian, in a
characteristic
tone, which changed on the instant, as if
belonging to another voice, as, bowing low, he
saluted
Alida when he had approached a few paces
toward her.
I have come, said he, pausing in his advance,
and casting his eyes, as in respect to her, upon the
ground, I have come, unheralded and
unannounced
,
I fear, no welcome visiter.
Unheralded? Who but the savage Valtmeyer
is
your
fitting herald? Unannounced? What
better
than the terrors of this hideous dungeon could
announce its proper jailer! Waste not the soft
speeches that sit so idly on your lips, and are
thrown away in my ears. But tell me, tell me,
Walter Bradshawe, whence come you, why come
you? Tell me why I am here; for what monstrous
wickedness have I been kidnapped, kept for months
aloof from my friends and family, and brought to
this spot? and why do you stand there blasting
my eyes with your presence? Speak out, man;
out with it all, if words can syllable the foul
contrivings
of your heart!
Thus haughtily did Alida confront her spoiler;
and as she thus, in look as well as words, gave
vent to her outraged feelings, while Bradshawe,
standing on the declivity below her, seemed to stoop
and cower before her presence, she lookedhalf
emerging from the drapery of the tent, with the
pale light from within brightening the outlines of
her features and person, and leaving the rest in
deep shadowshe looked like some indignant spirit,
who, descending from a brighter world, had pierced
its way into these black realms to rebuke their
unhallowed
master.
By Jove, she'll unhitch lightning against me
next, said Bradshawe, mentally. She's a great
girl, and no mistake, this same Mistress
Bradshawe
;
and then, still preserving his obsequious and
almost reverential bearing toward her, he rejoined
aloud, I can bear this from you; this, and more,
Alida. My heart has not now, for the first time,
to be schooled in your unkindness. If you call it
kidnapping to rescue you from the horrors of Indian
captivity; if you call it outrage to provide a
secluded
and safe home for you, when the havoc of
civil war has made thousands shelterless, and your
own friends are either scattered or slain; if you
call it wickedness to snatch you from the
neighbourhood
of these scenes of horror as they thicken
through the land, and provide you here a retreat
which, rude and gloomy as I confess it is, still is
not without its comforts and advantages; if these
humble, but zealous and unwearying efforts of one
who has long since waived his right as a husband
to win your regard as a friend, can make no amends
for the one rash but well-meant act by which I
would have made you minethenthen, Alida
then
Then, sir! said the lady, scornfully, as he
paused a moment for a word; well, sir, and what
then?
I'm dd if
I
know, said Bradshawe to
himself
.
The jade looks so cursed cool that my
stump eloquence fails me. I must go it on some
other touch.
Why don't you finish your speech, sir?
repeated
Alida, noticing his hesitation. Why stop you
so short in your pleadings and specifications? Even
Mr. Bradshawe's enemies allow him the glibness, as
well as the guile, of a county-court attorney.
He did not reply, and the lady went on.
Bradshawe
,
you are a skilful actor, a most specious
hypocrite, though your selfish passions are too
fitful
and stormy to make you a consummate one.
But you must deem me credulous indeed when you
claim for yourself motives of disinterested kindness
which would give the lie to all I have known of
your character in long years gone by. The very
attachment with whose declaration this cruel
persecution
began, was
Was true, pure, disinterested, by Heaven!
exclaimed
Bradshawe, now really speaking from his
heart; was earnest and devoted as ever mortal
man bore toward your sex. No, no, Alida, chafe
me not with that. Had you but accepted my
honourable
proposals when first I dared to press my suit,
you might have made me what you would. Wild
and reckless as men called me, my mother's
gentleness
seemed born anew in my spirit whenever
it turned to you.
And where, said Alida, not wholly untouched
by this natural burst of feeling, yet shuddering as
she spoke the words which followed, where was
that spirit of gentleness when those horrid nuptials
were forced upon me; when, by your lawless
instruments
,
I was torn from my home, and my hand
to you in wedlock made the price by which alone
you consented to redeem me from the licentious
hands of that young barbarian with whom you, as
well as Valtmeyer, were colleagued? That fearful
night! oh God! oh God! And the now agitated
Alida covered her face with her hands, as if shutting
out some hideous spectre which her imagination
had conjured up for the moment.
You have never had reason, said Bradshawe,
coldly, to believe that I was privy to that deed of
violence; and though, for certain valuable political
services he has rendered, I have since taken
Valtmeyer
into my confidence, no man has ever dared
to whisper audibly that I was at that time colleagued
with him. No, Alida, though you
then
disbelieved
the tale, I can now only repeat the same story I told
you
then
. And what are the circumstances? I
had been some weeks from home in a remote
settlement
,
and, returning by a short road through the
wilderness, I stop to bait my horse at the solitary
lodge of an Indian missionary. I find the timid
man in the utmost anxiety about a female prisoner
that, within an hour, had been brought to the house
by a ferocious young savage, whose band is
hovering
near. His followers have called the spoiler
away for a few hasty moments, and left a white
desperado to stand guard over the captive. I ask
to see her, and, to my horror, discover that it is
Alida; she whom, a short month since, I had hoped
to call my Alida; she for whom still, as her rejected
lover, I cherished the deepest respect, the
tenderest
affection. In my wrath I threaten Valtmeyer
for the part he has played in this forced abduction.
He derides my anger, and points to the smoke of
the Indian fires near by, as seen through the
window
.
I entreat, I conjure him. I add bribes to
my entreaties, and he consents to hear me, but
rejects
the alternatives of flight or resistance as
equally
hopeless in rescuing the prisoner. There is but
one resort remains. I am not personally unknown
to Au-neh-yesh; I must plead to him. But will he
hear me in such a cause? He has already
avowed
to the Catholic missionary his intention to marry
the white woman; will he be dissuaded from his
course by words, when his deeds have just proved
the determination of his character. No! there is
no way of rescuing you from the ruthless hands of
that licentious son of Brant, but by convincing him
that you are already married; that, in a word, you
are my wife. Proofs are wanting; for, as you do
not bear my name, I must make it appear that the
espousals long since took place clandestinely. The
missionary is the only party at hand whose
testimony
will be believed; but he refuses to give it falsely.
He will not swear that we are married unless the
rite be solemnized; but he consents, if we accept
his ministry at once, to leave a blank in the
marriage
certificate, which I can antedate, so that
Au-neh-yesh
shall have no suspicion of being
over-reached
.
What remains to be told? You startle
from a stupor as you hear the dreadful sound of his
voice approaching from a distance; there is not a
moment to be lost; the service is hurried through;
you faint at the last response, but the ceremony is
finished, and the demi-savage foiled in his claim
before he makes his appearance at the door.
God of mercy! passionately exclaimed Alida,
clasping her hands together,
is
Thy truth like
human
truth? Not one word which that man has
spoken can I gainsay; yet, while the very scene
he describes passed before my eyesmy own eyes
I feel, I know, that it was all false; false,
fiendishly
false. A LIE; a living, breathing, moving
lie.'
Vol. I.T
She paused. Yet I did see that stony-eyed priest;
I did hear Bradshawe pleading with Valtmeyer; I
do remember leaping forward when I heard the
voice of that red barbarian, whose naked arm had
been around my waist an hour before.More I
remember
not till they showed me that fatal
certificate
;
but even then I did not think that this was
all a cruel inveiglement, and Bradshawe a specious
villain, a most accursed.When and whence, then,
came this firm conviction that I was foully dealt
withthat I was a blind victim in the toils of
demons
?
The ill-starred lady, while speaking thus, with
eyes intensely fixed on vacancy, pushed back with
her fingers the long tresses from her brow, as if her
intellectual as well as physical vision could thus be
cleared. Then shaking her head, from which the
dishevelled hair again fell slowly to her shoulders,
she turned and fixed on Bradshawe a look so
mournful
yet so piercing, that even his features of bronze
betrayed the uneasy and painful emotion it
awakened
.
But whether that emotion was one of alarm
for the future or of remorse for the past; whether
his guilty heart quailed beneath that penetrating
glance, or whether the grief-stricken mien of the
beautiful woman whom he had reduced to this
condition
of forlornness touched some latent feeling
of pity and regret, it was impossible to say. The
slight agitation passed rapidly from his
countenance
,
and, folding his arms with a composed but
dejected air, in which something of dignity was not
unmingled, he said,
Madam, it is in vain for me to attempt removing
these ungenerous, these monstrous suspicions. I
shall never attempt to combat with them more; nor
would I now have said what I have said, save that
I always attributed your horror of my legal claim
upon your hand to some painful impression upon
your mind, made during the fits of delirium which
marked the long illness that followed those
unhappy
nuptials. I therefore suspended that claim till
years should intervene and efface these frightful
imaginings. I for years avoided molesting you with
my hateful presence, though, unseen by you, I was
often hovering near. I kept secret the bond of
union between us. I thought that time might
soften
the bitterness of your aversion. I hoped to melt
at last that heart of obduracy. But I have
reasoned
vainly. An opportunity such as I have recently
availed myself of to prove my watchful affection
and devotedness, may never again occur; and if it
does, what will be my reward if I embrace it?
Scorn and contemptay, those are my wages
scorn for the feelings that prompted the service,
contempt for the claim I would thus purchase on
your regard.
The lady bowed her head and wept. The
borderer
saw he was gaining an advantage, and
determined
to pursue it. She spoke not, and he thus
went on:
Hear me, Alida: there was a time when, in the
full tide of youth, madly as I loved you, I would
never have taken you as a reluctant partner to my
bosom. But years of care and disappointment have
sobered this arrogance of all-exacting affection. I
am, alas! no longer young; and the freshness of both
our lives has passed away for ever. I never have
loved, I never can love, another than you; and you
you can never belong to another until my death
shall set you free. Why, then, oh why shall we both
continue to be miserable for our remaining years?
Why will you not make it my privilege, as it is
my right, to minister to your happiness, by
crowning
mine? Why not confide in the partner whom
Destiny has, for good or ill, allotted you, and
permit
me to announce you to the world as my wife?
These wars must soon be over, pursued the Tory
captain, gathering confidence as he proceeded; the
rebels are even now splitting into factions among
themselves; and when the king's friends come in
for honour and offices, and the forfeited estates of
heavy-pursed and rich-landed traitors, Walter
Bradshawe's
claims for the spoils that are won by loyalty
and valour will not be the feeblest among them.
Ay, and men do say that titles will not be
withheld
when success shall finally entitle us to the full
meed of royal bounty and graciousness. Wilt be
my Lady Bradshawe, fair Alida? And the wily
suiter, dropping not ungracefully on one knee, tried
that half frank, half humorous smile which had
made more than one village maiden pronounce him
positively handsome when his features wore it, and
which others of the sex, less innocent, had
called
the devil's own trick when they had learned
to rue its influence upon their hearts. But Alida
though she too might, in some sense, be numbered
among his victimswas made of different metal
from those whom Bradshawe had often moulded
to his purpose.
Kneel not to me, she cried, thou base and
sordid slave! thou wretched minion of power
debauched
and misapplied! thou most fitting tool of
drunken tyranny! Share thy name! thy
loyal
name,
thy honours, thy titles, forsooth! Vile parricide, I
thank thee for reminding me of my bleeding
country
,
which even now is convulsed with the throe of
casting out such wretches as thou from her bosom.
By Heaven, Bradshawe, I would rather these rocks
should close together and crush me where I stand,
or that yon black stream should float my senseless
corse to an abyss still lower than that in which your
villany has already buried my living frame; I would,
I would, rather than bear the name of your wife
before men for a single day!
There may be a fate reserved for you in these
vaults worse than either, said Bradshawe, in a voice
husky with passion, as he regained his feet and
stepped a pace or two backward. A sheathed
poniard
,
unnoticed by himself, slipped from his belt
as he rose, and lay upon the floor of the cavern
midway between him and Alida. Her quick eye
caught sight of the weapon in a moment; and,
almost
ere the dreadful import of the last words had
reached her ears, she had sprung forward, plucked
the dirk from the ground, and recovered her former
position. Bradshawe, recoiling first at the
impetuous
bound she had made toward him, now
actually
turned pale when he saw her slowly draw the
weapon from its sheath, and gaze with a cold smile
upon its gleaming blade. He would have spoken,
but horror kept him tongue-tied; he would have
leaped forward to snatch the deadly steel from her
hand, but the least motion on his part would
precipitate
the catastrophe which he verily believed
was impending. But the next movement of Alida
relieved the fearful suspense that agitated him.
She calmly, after feeling its point, passed the naked
dagger through her girdle, so as to secure it to her
person.
It is small, but it will do, she said, flinging the
sheath to the feet of Bradshawe. Your power
over me from this moment has its limit. The
instrument
of my deliverance is in my own hands;
and you can do no more than compel me to use it,
she added, with an air of determination, so quiet as
sufficiently to speak her resolve, even if the words
had not been significant enough to reveal her
purpose
.
T 2
I meant notI did not mean stammered
Bradshawe.
Our conference is over, sir; and it has a fitting
end, interrupted Alida, haughtily, waving her hand.
I would be alone, Mr. Bradshawe.
Another time, then, when my care for your
welfare, so far as I can study it in these dreary
retreats
,
shall have obliterated these ignominious
suspicions
,
this most ungenerous and unjust
misinterpretation
of every word I utter, I will come, Alida,
and in a few days, perhaps, may venture to
Come, sir, whenever you have made up your
mind to the moment my doom is sealed; but let
the victim be released from the presence of the
executioner
for the few hours that may yet be allotted
her.
The curtain of the tent dropped before her as she
pronounced these words; and Bradshawe, too much
stupified by the sudden turn which events had
taken, and confounded by the position in which he
had placed himself, withdrew sullenly to his boat,
without bestowing the least notice upon his gaping
slaves, who had been the mute and astonished
witnesses
of this singular scene.
What a cursed blockhead I was to threaten a
storm, when I had lots of time to circumvent, and
a thousand other ways to drive the garrison to
surrender
.
Wat Bradshawe, you are more of an ass
than most men believe you. You great boy you,
to let your blood get above your brain for a moment,
because a theatrical girl is mad enough to scoff at
you! She, too, wholly, at the moment, in your
power! Zounds! but my henhawk made a gallant
thing of it. That cursed dagger, too, slipping away
as it did. Well for me it was not a pistol, or the
Amazon had done for me at five paces. She's a
tall girl; a great piece of woman's flesh, that same
Mistress Bradshawe. I don't know whether it be
love or hatred that drives me on; but something
does drive me. If love, there's certainly a streak of
malice in it. If hatred, there must be some
wishy-washy
drippings of tenderness in the bitter waters,
for my heart beat the devil's tattoo when she pointed
that infernal bodkin so near to her bosom. Hallo,
Charon! mongrel half-breed! bowknot of twisted
man's flesh! hither, I say! Ah! my good Charon, I
dreamed not you were so near at hand.
And Bradshawe, terminating his amiable
soliloquy
as his deformed follower joined him at the
opening
in the rock where they had before separated,
the two soon afterward regained the Outlaws' Hall.
CHAPTER VI.
THE REFUGEES.
There's song and oath, and gaming deep,
Hot words and laughter, mad carouse;
There's naught of prayer and little sleep:
The devil keeps the house.
The Bucanier
.
An
injury may be forgiven by a proud spirit, but
an insult never. And what human being is
without
his share of pride? That miserable deformed
half-breed; that crooked mongrel of a man; that
dumb and uncomplaining slave of the gloomy mine
of Waneonda, had yet his human feelings, had still
his modicum of inward self-esteem, which brutal
words could wound and outrage. His vocation in
those tomb-like cells, though toilsome and humble,
was still one of the greatest trust; for he was alike
warder and seneschal of that subterranean castle,
whose moat and drawbridge were the black stream
and tottering skiff of the hunchback ferryman.
With these defences the renegade garrison had
always held themselves safe from hostile intrusion.
They might be starved out of their stronghold, but
it could never be carried by assault. For, however
the secret of the cave might become known, its
recesses
could never be penetrated by a stranger,
save through the treachery of the ferryman.
That poor wretch, whom we have only known by
the sobriquet of Charon, as Bradshawe had
nick-named
him, had always enjoyed his confidence,
and hitherto not undeservedly; though, while
Bradshawe
regarded himself as the patron of the
half-breed
,
and entitled to his gratitude, the other,
perhaps
,
had merely viewed their relations toward each
other as a mutual affair of give and take, which left
neither party under special obligations to the other.
The half-breed, who had originally been a
fisherman
by occupation, had, in former years, pointed
out the cave to Bradshawe when acting as his guide
to the trout-streams among the hills. Bradshawe,
learning that the spot had been hitherto known only
to the Indians, and, for some motive best known to
himself, wishing that a knowledge of it should be
extended to those white men only to whom he chose
to intrust it, determined instantly to take the
half-breed
into his service, upon condition of his keeping
the secret of the place.
Time passed on; the half-breed, carried to
another
part of the country, became a useless
hanger-on
of Bradshawe's establishment; nominally a
provider
for, but really a pensioner upon, Bradshawe's
kitchen; in short, one of that lounging, eel-catching
degenerates of the aborigines that may still be found
near some of the old families on Long Island,
incident
,
as it were, rather than belonging to the
establishment
.
The abduction of Miss De Roos, which
made it necessary for Valtmeyer, who played the
part of scapegoat in that affair, to disappear from
among men for a time, was the first thing that
called
the half-breed and his secret into actual use.
Since that time he had silently almost passed into
Valtmeyer's service, who sometimes for a month
together retained him in the cavern, of which he
was a perfectly contented tenant, and which grew
more and more like a home to him. Idle by nature,
yet always to be relied upon when any duty was
required of him, this inoffensive, taciturn creature
was one of the few human beings who had never
provoked the imperious insolence of Bradshawe's
nature when brought in familiar contact with him.
But his brutality did break out at last in the hour
that, foaming with rage and vexation, he called for
the service of the ferryman when returning from his
fruitless interview with Alida. The jeer at his
deformity
was resented by the half-breed even in the
moment it was uttered; for the means of vengeance
were at hand, and, as we shall soon see, he did not
hesitate to embrace them.
The goodly company to which Bradshawe was
now about to introduce himself in the Outlaws' Hall
might, in the slight glimpse we have had of them
in these deep cavern shades, have passed well
enough as a redoubtable crew of desperadoes, a real
melodramatic set of brigands. But the truth is,
that, though felon-loving old Salvator might have
picked out a head or two among them for his
savage
pencil, a majority of these worthies would have
formed a more suitable study for some American
Wilkieour own Richard Mount, perhapswhose
canvass, borrowing for the nonce some broader and
bolder shadows, might delight in preserving the
grotesque
array of characters.
Among Valtmeyer's immediate crew there were,
indeed, some as hideous-looking gentlemen as ever
said stand and deliver upon the highway. Faces
stolid yet ferocious; looks blended of sinister
malice
and sensual audacity; wild, rude, and
reckless-featured
men, with that dash of the genuine savage
in their aspect which is only acquired by pursuing
a career of crime upon the extreme borders of
society
,
where the practitioner incessantly vibrates
between civilized and barbarian life; a variety of
the robber species, in short, such as is only found
upon our Indian frontiers; such as the curious may
occasionally there light upon even at this day; but
such as only existed in perfection when the name
of Red Wolfert Valtmeyer was terrible in the land.
But, though these ill-omened visages glowered
here and there from beneath the wolfskin cap or
checkered handkerchief which swathed around the
brows, and, with some tawdry plume or Indian
medal
stuck in its folds, generally formed the headgear
in this portrait-gallery of infernals, yet there was
that both in the guise and features of many which
was hardly in keeping with their present
associations
.
The complexions and appointments of a few
betrayed them as city-bred and of luxurious
nurture
;
they were ill-disciplined youths, whom the
mad spirit of loyalty, or some home disgust, or
some silly boyish escapado, had driven from a
parent's
roof to the stormy border, where, in the whirl
of events, they had been hurled, with the
black-bearded
men around them, into this place of bad
spirits, where so many had huddled together for
safety.
Of others, the faces were coarse, but not
weather-beaten
,
and bloated in some instances, as if by
the loose debauch of the roadside tippling-house,
from which, perhaps, their swaggering air was
likewise
borrowed.
Here a red flannel shirt, breeches of corduroy,
and thick-soled brogans betrayed the quondam
village
tradesman; while there the coat of foxy black,
or tattered blue with tarnished metal buttons, and
shrunken underclothes of threadbare gray, might
have bespoken some bankrupt pedler (or travelling
merchant, as the country folk would more
reverentially
call him), save that the rusty-hilted
small-sword
by his side, bespeaking his oldfashioned claim
to gentility, might induce one to set him down as
an absconding attorney.
All of the motley group, however,
notwithstanding
these little discrepances, seemed to be close
confreres, who were upon the choicest terms of
fellowship
together; and though Syl Stickney's
contribution
of new-comers had been received at first
rather coolly by some members of the company,
they had all, doubtless, in other scenes and places,
often consorted in brotherhood of some kind to
establish
the harmonious sympathy which reigned
among them.
The tie of that brotherhood was political faith!
They were all possessed by that spirit which, next
to the old democrat
Death
, is your only true
leveller
,
bringing all men on whom it seizes, save only
kings and demagogues, upon the same platform.
Party spirit
had made them at first co-labourers,
and then co-mates together. But what mattered the
temporary inconvenience of so incongruous an
association
?
The disagreeableness and evils of their
state affected only themselves; and what mattered
such transient exposure when the well-being of
countless generations was concerned? Were they
not loyal subjects, banded together to sustain, not
merely the right of a crowned king, but to preserve
and fix the blessed precedence of rank, with all its
orderly succession of prerogative, by which alone
civilization can be sustained?
Thus reasoned some four or five small landed
proprietors or gentlemen farmers of undoubted
respectability
,
who, having compromised their safety
in the plots of their party by being seen riding home
from more than one Tory rendezvous, were now
compelled to take earth for a season, and share
this den with the lowest dregs of the faction to
which they belonged. These suffering partisans of
the royal cause had been now for so many weeks
crowded together in familiar contact with their
present comrades, that there was really little in their
bearing to distinguish them from the rest, though a
gray riding-frock and broad-leafed beaver, with a
feather in it of the same colour, or the uniform of
the royal Greens, in which some of them, who bore
a commission in the yeomanry militia, were dressed,
might have marked them as being better apparalled
than their comrades.
Ah! Bradshawe, cried one of these worthies,
Bradshawe, my ace of trumps, I am rejoiced to
see you; for there are so few faced cards in our pack
here, that some of us would throw up our hands
in very disgust were it not for the royal game we're
playing. But by what devilish legerdemain are we
all shuffled here together?
Yes, Bradshawe, exclaimed another, tell us,
is there no chance of our breaking away from this
cursed hole till the rebels come to unearth us?
If you know of any better
hole
to creep into,
gentlemen, there is nothing to prevent our parting
company at any moment that suits your pleasure,
dryly replied Bradshawe, at the same time saluting
the company with a formal courtesy.
His personal retainers, crowding tumultuously
around him the moment they heard the sound of his
voice, prevented any farther parley with the group
of gentlemen who had first accosted him, and with
whom, indeed, Bradshawe seemed disposed to
converse
as little as possible. The truth is, that, though
he had been more than once indebted to the
hospitality
of some of them, and would on no account
have been so impolitic as to treat any of them with
positive rudeness, yet the presence of these
royalists
of the more respectable class put a check upon
his conduct that filled him with chagrin and
vexation
.
More than one of these gentlemen had, in less
troublous times, been personally acquainted with
Vol. I.U
the family of the unfortunate Alida; and all of them
were men of that stamp who would not hesitate to
embroil themselves in deadly quarrel to succour a
lady so iniquitously dealt with as Miss De Roos had
been. Nor would his political faith or loyal services
have been any shield to Bradshawe had these
country
gentlemen dreamed of the villany he was
practising
against the daughter of an old neighbour well
known, and once universally beloved in the county.
Their wrath, had it been once really awakened,
Bradshawe would have laughed to scorn, and would
soon have made them feel, in their present
situation
,
the folly of chiding the lion when their heads
were in his mouth. But while, for very natural
reasons
,
not wishing that anything should create
disunion
between himself and his brother partisans, he
felt that, however idly their indignation might
explode
where they could be so easily overmastered
by his immediate crew, yet, to bring his affair with
Alida to a successful termination, the secret of the
cavern must not be extended to more than were
at present intrusted with it. It was therefore not
without an inward feeling of satisfaction that he
listened
to a proposition which one of the Tory
gentlemen
,
coming forward in behalf of the rest, made
him as soon as he was disengaged from receiving
the boisterous welcome that others gave him in the
Outlaws' Hall.
We pardon the coldness of your greeting,
Captain
Bradshawe, said this gentleman, in
consideration
of the kindness we have already received
from some of your servants; and because our some
days' experience of the difficulty of providing for
so many months in this place suggests that there
must be limits to your hospitality, and
Nay, my dear Fenton, said Bradshawe, seizing
both hands of the speaker, I beg you would not
mention
Pardon me, Captain Bradshawe, said the
Refugee
,
bowing somewhat stiffly as he withdrew his
hands from the familiar grasp of the other, there
are four or five of us here who have made up our
minds where to dispose of ourselves; and all that
we ask is a couple of your retainers, to act as guides
and packmen till we can make our way within the
borders of Ulster county, where we are sure of a
cordial reception at the house of a royalist
gentleman
of our acquaintance.
The men, Mr. Fenton, are entirely at your
service
,
if you insist upon thus abruptly taking leave
of the poor entertainment I have to offer you. But
why not, gentlemen, at the least, put off your
departure
till the morrow?
We had no idea of starting till to-morrow,
rejoined
one of the older royalists, bluntly.
Not at all, not at all, said Fenton, rather
hurriedly
,
and colouring at the same time as he
appreciated
Bradshawe's readiness to get rid of himself
and his friends; we'll be off within the hour if
your men can get ready.
Within the hour be it, since you
will
go,
replied
Bradshawe, turning at once upon his heel to
give the necessary order.
The churl! muttered Fenton.
What can you expect from a hog but a grunt?
echoed Sylla.
If you sit down with dogs, you must look for
fleas, rejoined his brother Marius, as the classic
pair stood listening to this colloquy of their betters.
I say, Squire Fenton, pursued Syl, I mistrust
Marius and I'll make tracks with you out of this
darned hole. A fellow'll turn into a woodchuck if
he burrows here much longer.
This accession to his party was gladly welcomed
by Fenton at the time, though, as it included
several
of Syl's immediate friends and cronies, it proved
subsequently disastrous from the undue confidence
it gave Fenton in his numbers, as will appear in the
sequel.
The arrangements for their departure were soon
completed. But the final exit of Fenton and his
followers was attended by circumstances which can
scarcely be understood unless we recur to other
actors
in the scene, athwart whose shadows a new and
strange form is but now flitting to mingle
mysteriously
with the rest.
We have already spoken of the feeling of bitter
exasperation which had been excited in the bosom
of the hunchback ferryman by the brutal language
of his master, but we have not told that the hour
which Bradshawe consumed in the Lady's Chapel
had seen a trial of the half-breed's fidelity which,
considering his Indian origin, was of the severest
kind.
Scarcely, indeed, had the Tory captain passed
through the opening in the rock and launched in his
boat upon the river beyond, before the Hunchback
found himself in contact with another authority than
that which had posted him there as sentinel.
Hearing
the fall of a pebble on the bottom of the cavern,
he stepped quickly forward, and threw the light of
his torch against the walls of the pit by which you
first descend into the cave. He could discover
nothing
.
Presently another pebble rolled to his feet.
It seemed to bound from a ledge of rock near him.
Still he could not fix the direction whence it came;
and he climbs half way up the zigzag shaft of the pit
to see if it can have been precipitated from without.
He lifts his torch aloft, so as to throw its light where
the rope ladder is wont to be suspended from the
crossed trees above. But all looks quiet there and
safe. The ladder has been, as usual, drawn in and
secured, a thin tendril of grapevine, passing over a
cross timber above, being left hanging to raise it
from within to its former place, when necessary.
Suddenly he sees the grapevine vibrate. The ladder
begins slowly to uncoil, and rise before his eyes.
He leaps forward, and with one blow of his
hunting-knife
severs the vine, and the rope falls by his
side.
Ugh! exclaims an Indian voice without, as the
swinging sliver comes burdenless to his hand.
The swart features of the Hunchback become
radiant
at the sound as he tosses his torch above his
head, and hails the stranger in the Mohawk tongue.
The vine is again let down. The Hunchback
quickly
attaches it anew to the ladder of rope. It is
drawn up from above. A towering figure darkens
the opening for a moment, and then Brant stands
beside the deformed outcast of his tribe.
My child, how fares he here with his white
father? said the chief, kindly.
`The Broken Tomahawk,' said the man,
calling
himself by his Indian name, has no father.
The Mohawk owns not him, he owns not the white
man. He is here on his own bidding, but will do
the will of Thayendanagea. And, speaking thus,
he was about to usher the chief farther into the
cavern
;
for Brant was known to him as the companion
in arms of Bradshawe, and, as such, the Hunchback
had no hesitation in farthering his ingress. The
Sachem, however, was by no means desirous of the
interview which the half-breed thought he was
seeking
,
and his errand here must be a brief one, if he
would despatch it at all. He ascertained that
Bradshawe had already arrived at Waneonda, and
assumed the personal charge of his captive, Brant's
U 2
only chance, then, of rescuing her, depended upon
the aid and connivance of the half-breed; and that
aid could only be secured by awakening the fellow's
Indian sympathies so strongly in favour of the
Mohawk
that they should overpower his fidelity to the
white man.
But the Hunchback, though evidently flattered by
the frank confidence which the chief seemed to
repose
in him, and listening with mute respect to the
claims which he urged upon his services, was
unflinching
in his trust. Brant could wring nothing
from him save a promise not to reveal this secret
visit to Bradshawe; and even this promise was
accompanied
with a condition which seemed
something
like a threat upon the part of the Hunchback.
Let the chief go, said he. Let
Thayendanagea
depart in secret as he has come. No bird shall
whisper that he has been here, and
Thayendanagea
will come no more.
There was nothing, therefore, to be done with
this stanch seneschal, unless Brant had chosen to
strangle him where he stood, or hurl him deathward
down the black pit whose entrance he guarded.
But it was not in the heart of Brant to crush in cold
blood a creature always so inoffensive, and now so
firm when he stood most exposed and defenceless.
Had he debated such a thing in his own mind,
however
,
there was now hardly time to effect it
successfully
;
for at this moment the enraged voice of
Bradshawe was heard shouting to the half-breed,
who waved his hand to Brant, as if motioning him
to ascend and leave the cave at once, and then
hurried
to wait upon the Tory captain.
Brant seized the opportunity to descend farther
into the cavern, with whose peculiarities he was
perfectly
familiar, and gained a recess of the rock not
far from the fallen tree just as Bradshawe brushed
by it in traversing the passage. The hand of the
Mohawk clutched the belt-knife, which was half
drawn from its sheath as the glare of the
Hunchback's
torch shone full upon him for a moment.
The life of Bradshawe turned upon a cast. But,
haply, he passed by unheeding the peril at hand;
and the person of Brant being thrown the next
instant
into deep shadow, the knife was shot back
into its sheath as he saw the danger of discovery
had passed away. That momentary gleam of light,
however, had revealed to Brant the features of the
Hunchback, and the feelings which agitated them;
for he had overheard the contumelious epithets
which Bradshawe applied to the unfortunate. Brant
scarcely doubted what their effect would be upon
the half-Indian nature of the Hunchback. If not a
provocation to revenge, they would at least cancel
all ties of kindness which bound him as a retainer
of Bradshawe.
Nor did the sagacious Mohawk err in his
judgment
;
for, following shortly afterward to the spot
where the others embarked upon the black lake to
cross to the threshold of the Outlaws' Hall, the
plashing of the ferryman's paddle had hardly died
away upon his ear before he again heard its faint
dip approach once more the shore from which he
had just parted. The Hunchback, neither by look
nor word, expressed his surprise at finding the chief
awaiting him, but mutely drew up his boat,
marshalled
Brant forward to the opening in the curtain
of rock, and aided him in launching upon the River
of Ghosts.
CHAPTER VII.
THE RESCUE.
His boat was nigh; its fragile side
Boldly the venturous wanderer tried;
Indeed, it was a full strange sight
To see in the track of the ghostly light
The swarthy chief and the lady bright,
On the heaving waves borne on;
While her wan cheek and robe of white
The pale ray played upon,
And above his dusky plumage shook;
Backward was flung his feathery cloak,
As his brawny arms were stretched to ply
The oars that made their shallop fly.
Sands
.
Alida
, to whom, haply, the story of her family,
desolated through the agency of Brant, was yet
unknown
,
did not hesitate to accept the deliverance
proffered at his hands; but the noble-hearted girl
insisted
upon the negroes, to whose kindness she was
so much indebted, being first removed from the
reach of Bradshawe's cruelty; for she knew that the
first outbreak of his wrath would be terrible, and that
it was upon these defenceless creatures it would fall.
The little shallop would contain but two persons at
a time, and many precious moments were
consumed
in ferrying the whole party to the chamber
where the Hunchback stood a sullen sentry.
The negroes have already found their way to the
outside of the cave without farther peril of
discovery
;
and now the swarthy chief and the bright lady
have embarked upon those ghostly waters. Their
frail boat has brushed safely through the flinty
chasm which walls in the sinuous tide. They have
reached the crevice in the curtain of rock, and have
gained a footing on the land, when suddenly the
distant reverberations of a horn are heard trembling
through the shadowy cells around. It is a
summons
to the Hunchback to assume his office of
warder
in facilitating the egress of Fenton and his
followers
.
In the scene which followed, even the coolness of
Brant, aided as he was by the presence of mind of
his companion, would hardly have availed them,
were it not for the ready offices of the Hunchback
in assisting Alida up the first ascent before the
foremost
of Fenton's party had fairly reached the spot
where the danger of discovery was most imminent.
And now, marshalled by torches formed of the
blazing knots of the yellow pine, Bradshawe's
parting
guests were congregated in the chamber from
which first commences the ascent to daylight
Bradshawe himself coming last to bid them
farewell
at their exit from the cavern, and make up, if
possible, for previous indifference by the warmth of
his adieus.
The two foremost of the party, who seemed more
closely muffled than the rest, had already, as it
appeared
,
surmounted the first ascent, and contented
themselves with waving him a backward adieu, as,
mounting beyond his reach, they stepped upon the
ladder which led up the second. The rest
successively
gave him each a hand as they passed up the
fallen tree before described.
About half had made the ascent of the first steep,
when the half-breed Hunchback, exclaiming that he
would steady the rope ladder for one of the party
who was somewhat infirm, mounted with the agility
of a cat to the ledge to which its lower end was
attached. Bradshawe took no note of his
officiousness
,
and the rest followed, till the two brothers
Stickney alone were left at the bottom.
Ho! treason! shouted Bradshawe, seizing the
luckless Syl by the collar, and flinging him upon
the flinty floor of the cave, as he was in the act of
moving forward in his turn. Charon! Valtmeyer!
ho there! Charon, you humpbacked knave, what
means this? Ten men, the number of Fenton's
party, have already gone up, yet these two Yankee
pedlers are still below.
Pedler yourself, Captain Bradshawe, cried the
sturdy Marius; and, in a moment, the indignant
Syl having sprung to his feet, the two
New-Englanders
had rushed together upon the Tory captain,
hurled him against the wall of the cavern, and
scrambled up to the landing-place where stood the
Hunchback, flinging his torchlight over the pit
below
.
Bradshawe, recovering himself, cocked a
pistol
and levelled it at Marius on the instant.
Hullo! capting, cried the undismayed Syl,
pressing down the head of his brother, so that the
rays of the torch passed over it, and left only his
own arm to aim at. Don't be such a darned fool,
capting, as to throw away your shot upon us, who
raaly have had nothing to do with this muss.
Humpy
here's your man, I reckon; and, if you wait a
moment, I'll pitch him down to you.
How far the doughty Syl might have succeeded
in a tussle with the active half-breed in such a spot,
it is impossible now to say; for the Hunchback
was about to prepare himself for the encounter,
which he did by quickly flinging the torch from his
hands into the abyss below. But the movement
that he makes in leaning over to hurl it at
Bradshawe
exposes the upper part of his person for an
instant, and the flash of Bradshawe's pistol
illuminates
the vault in the moment the blazing missile
leaves the hand of the Hunchback, who instantly
follows
it, shot to death, and tumbling from ledge to
ledge, a mangled corpse, at the feet of the Tory
captain.
Sylla, Marius, shouted Bradshawe, when the
reverberations had subsided, halt the party, and
tell them there is treason among us. But no
answer
came from the classic pair, who had already
made their exit from the cavern. Bradshawe, whose
presence of mind seems to have deserted him for a
moment, instead of at once following the retiring
party, groped his way to the Warder's Room,
eagerly
seized the lantern which was ever kept burning
there, ferried himself across the lake, summoned
Valtmeyer, with him recrossed the black pool once
more, and, leaving his worthy adjutant in the
chamber
where the Hunchback had found a tomb,
launched
himself upon the River of Ghosts, and wended
his way to the remote cell where Alida was immured.
The bats were now its only tenants, and the
voiceless
spot, with no light save the torch of the gloomy
voyager to illumine its dark walls, seemed dreary
and chill as it had never seemed before to his eyes.
The baffled Bradshawe rejoined his comrade.
Have that carrion flung out to the wolves; or, stay,
it may remain till to-morrow, when we will all move
away together.
Do we carry any woman's baggage with us?
asked Valtmeyer, keenly eying his superior.
No, Wolfert. I give you those niggers
wherever
you may find them.
And the farm?
Dn the farm, and you too, sir! Don't you
see, man, you are plucking at my heartstrings?
The girl's gone; lost to me, perhaps, for ever. Is
this a moment to remind me of the price I paid for
her? And Bradshawe ground another oath
between
his teeth that put a summary end to the
conversation
.
With the morrow's dawn the den of renegades
had vomited forth its tenants, a wierd and ghastly
crew, with beard unshorn and skin cadaverous from
long exclusion from the light of day. A fall of
snow had obliterated the tracks of those who had
departed the night before; and Bradshawe,
unwilling
to penetrate with such a body of men into the
settled country, where farther pursuit of Alida
would most probably lead him, made no effort to
recover Fenton's trail, but addressed himself to the
task of getting his band of followers out of this
Whig district as soon as possible. He then laid his
course for Oswego, whither great numbers of
Tories
had already flocked together, under the lead of
Colonels Claus and Butler, and where the royal
banner, guarded by a thousand Indian warriors
under
Guy Johnson, was still kept flying.
The Cave of Waneonda, which had so lately
rung with the wild peal of outlaw merriment, was
left to echo only the monotonous sound of its
black-rolling
waters. And though some hard-hunted
refugee
,
from time to time, had sought a shelter there
with the handful of outlaws it occasionally
harboured
,
it was not until after years that its hideous cells
again were fully peopled. Those dungeon vaults,
so silent now, what tales of wo and horror could
they tell? Tales of those times when the
Johnsons
came back on their mad errand of vengeance;
when they desolated the vale of Schoharie with fire
and sword, and Waneonda again disgorged a felon
crew to steep the land in crime and blood.
But let us now return to the wanderers who have
last emerged from these shadowy realms.
The surprise of Fenton, when his band was fully
mustered on the mountain's side and at some
distance
from the mouth of the cave, may be conceived
at finding strangers among their number. But Brant,
so well known to all the gentlemen of this region
from the civil offices he had held previous to the
present struggle, had only to reveal himself to be
warmly received by his brother partisan.
The winter's night was closing in rapidly, and
Fentonwhose indignation against Bradshawe was
fully roused upon hearing the story of Alida's
forcible
detention in the vaults of Waneondaassisted
her down the mountain as they hurried forward on
their journey. It was determined that she should
at once seek a refuge in the settlement of
Schoharie
,
which was at hand; and the whole party was
halted to designate some one who could be trusted
with the duty of placing her in the hands of her
friends. It would have been madness for Brant,
even upon such an embassy, to venture himself in
the hands of the patriots; and his own men would
not spare Fenton, who, although almost equally
obnoxious
as a virulent Tory, had still not been
charged with any stain of cruelty that would call
out personal vengeance.
While this discussion was taking place, the
attention
of the two leaders was distracted by a sudden
outcry near. Several of the more lawless
members
of the party, as it seemed, had pushed in
advance
of the rest, for the purpose of driving off
some horses that were grazing in a field near by.
The farmhouse to which the field belonged chanced,
at the moment, to be occupied by a patrol of
villagers
;
for the Whig militia, since Schuyler's march
upon Johnstown, had been industriously employed
in scouring the country and arresting every
person
suspected of Toryism upon whom they could
lay their hands. This patrol, hearing the clatter of
hoofs, now sallied out. The moon, which shone
Vol. I.X
brightly down over the snow-covered fields,
showed
that they were a mere handful of men, whom
Fenton's followers outnumbered; and, though
provoked
and incensed at the untimely occurrence,
Fenton could not resist the temptation to crush the
gang of rebellious boors, as he termed them. He
sprang from the side of Alida as Brant attempted
to seize his arm to prevent the mad movement,
drew his rapier, and rushed into the fray.
Alida, though now not unused to scenes of blood
and violence, had never stood before with hopes
and fears divided between her friends and
countrymen
engaged in personal conflict. She covered
her head with her mantle and cowered toward the
earth. There was a quick, irregular volley of
firearms
,
the shout of a sudden onset, followed by the
clashing of swords against the barrels of clubbed
rifles; and then came the trampling of many feet,
as of men borne down in a struggle or flying along
the frozen highway near her. She looked up;
Brant had disappeared from her side, and the
royalists
had been driven back past the spot where she
stood. Suddenly the Indian warwhoop arose wild
and shrilly from a thicket of evergreens at a turning
of the road; and now the patriots, as if seized by a
sudden panic, came flying back over the road where
they had just pressed the foe.
That's right, boys; git into kiver as soon as
you can; it's a regular ambush, exclaimed a
well-known
voice near her. We've peppered 'em
enough for one night's work. The spokesman,
however, seemed very slow in practising his own
recommendation, as, coolly loading his rifle, he
trudged along behind the rest.
Run, Balt, run, shouted a fugitive. The
Redskins
are upon us.
They won't lift my head-thatch this time, how
somedever. I'm looking for the chap whose gourd
I smashed so handsomely when he came pushing
his skewer through my jacket. By the Etarnal, if
it be not Squire Fenton, he suddenly exclaimed,
starting back from the body of that gallant and
unfortunate
gentleman.
Fenton! faintly ejaculated Alida, who was not
twenty paces distant. But her voice was unheeded
by Balt; unheeded, too, were the exclamations of
the group who quickly gathered around him,
retracing
their steps as they saw the last scattered
remains
of the Tory party, preserved by the ruse of
Brant, disappear over the hills.
Yes, boys, that's Squire Fenton, and no
mistake
,
said Balt, with something resembling a heavy
sigh; and he shall have as decent a grave as ever
a Christian laid in, if it took the best acre of ground
in the county to hold him. He was as true a
gentleman
as ever sat in the king's commission of the
peace among us. As kind and as brave a heart
He was a dd Tory, said a ruffian voice
among the crew, bringing the butt of his rifle
heavily
upon the frozen ground as he spoke.
Mister Bill Murphy, said Balt, no way
perturbed
,
you'll just please to take liberties with the
names of Tories of your own shooting, and let mine
alone. The devil knows that you've sent enough
on 'em to their last account, what with firing on
flags o' truce and sich like, Bill.
[9]
[9]
Is not this an anachronism? The famous rifle-shot and
desperado
whom tradition accuses of shooting down the bearers of
flags of truce upon several occasions during the relentless
conflicts
between the Whigs and Tories of this region, is not
mentioned
as thus feloniously signalizing himself until the last great
inroad of the refugees in the subsequent years of the war.P. D.
Murphy felt the rude compliment rather than the
reproach that was blended in this speech, and was
silent.
But who have we here? said Balt, now for the
first time noticing the crouched form of the
half-frozen
Alida. Who, in the name of the first
mother
of gals, is this missus that the Tories have left
behind them?
Alida, who had shrunk from claiming the
protection
of these rude and blood-stained men, while still
chafing around the warm remains of her friend, so
recently slaughtered, now dashed these shuddering
impressions from her mind, and gladly revealed
herself
to Balt.
The joy of the worthy woodsman was boundless
at beholding her again, though he would scarcely
trust his senses to believe that it was really Miss
De Roos who stood alive before him. He
approached
without uttering a syllable in reply to her,
turned her around as he raised her from the fallen
tree against which she had been reclining, threw
back the hood of the cloak which covered her head,
and bared her fair features to the moon; then
releasing
her hand, he stepped back a pace or two,
and, lifting his hat reverentially from his gray head,
made a deep obeisance as he exclaimed, The great
God be praised, Miss Alida, it is really you!
END OF VOL. I.An hour after midnight, be near the fallen
sycamore
which crosses the brook within a few paces
of your wigwam. The Indian girl will conduct you
to an interview with
A. D. R.